To
Navigation
change
To
Content
change
To
Service
change
Steinberg Media Technologies GmbH
Creativity First
Beim Strohhause 31
20097 Hamburg
Tel: +49 (0)40 210 35-0
Fax: +49 (0)40 210 35-300
Home
Privacy Policy
English
English
Deutsch
Español
Français
日本語
Steinberg Media Technologies GmbH
Support
MySteinberg
About
Privacy Policy
Data Privacy Policy
Legal Terms
Hardware Precautions
Steinberg privacy policy
We attach a great deal of importance to protecting your personal
data. Your personal data will be used exclusively in the context of the
statutory data protection regulations, such as the General Data
Protection Regulation (GDPR). Our employees and representatives are
obligated to comply with data protection regulations. Below, you will
find more detailed information about the nature, scope and purposes of
the collection and use of your personal data and the rights you are
entitled to. Please click on the individual headings to obtain further
information on the individual topics.
The controller’s and the data
protection officer’s contact details
Please contact us if you have any further questions relating to data
protection. If you have any questions relating to the collection,
processing or use of your personal data, or if you would like to request
access to or rectification, blocking or erasure of your data, and to
revoke your consent, please contact:
Controller responsible for data processing:
Steinberg Media Technologies GmbH
Beim Strohhause 31
20097 Hamburg
Germany
Email:
privacy@steinberg.de
You can contact our data protection officer by emailing:
privacy@steinberg.de
General data protection
information
General rights of data
subjects
According to the General Data Protection Regulation, you have the
right:
under Article 15 of the GDPR to request information about what
personal data we process about you (right of access);
under Article 16 of the GDPR to request rectification of
incorrect personal data or completion of incomplete personal data that
we store about you;
under Article 17 of the GDPR to request that we erase personal
data that we store about you (“right to be forgotten”);
under Article 18 of the GDPR to demand that we restrict
processing of your personal data;
under Article 20 of the GDPR to receive your personal data that
you provided us with in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable
format or to request transfer of the same to another
controller;
under Article 7 (3) of the GDPR, to revoke your consent that you
granted us at any time. This also applies to the revocation of
declarations of consent that you made to us before the General Data
Protection Regulation came into force (i.e. before May 25, 2018). If you
revoke your consent, we may no longer continue any processing based on
this consent in the future, without affecting the lawfulness of such
processing carried out based on such consent until the same is
revoked;
under Article 77 of the GDPR to lodge a complaint with a
supervisory authority.
To assert your statutory rights as a data subject, and for all other
questions relating to data processing, please contact Steinberg Media
Technologies GmbH in writing on the postal address given below or by
emailing
privacy@steinberg.de
.
You can exercise your aforementioned rights free of charge.
To have data erased and revoke consents granted, please contact:
info@steinberg.de
.
Right to object
In addition to the general rights of data subjects, we would like to
expressly draw your attention to your right to object in the following
cases:
Under Article 21 (1) of the GDPR, you have the right to object at any
time, on grounds relating to your particular situation, to the
processing of personal data concerning you based on Article 6 (1) (f) of
the GDPR. This also applies to profiling based on this provision. When
exercising this right to object, you must provide us with your personal
reasons as to why we should not process your personal data. We will
examine your objection and either cease or adjust our data processing
activities or demonstrate to you compelling legitimate grounds based on
which we may continue our processing activities.
If personal data concerning you is processed based on
Article 6 (1) (f) of the GDPR for the purpose of direct marketing, you
have the right to object to such processing of personal data concerning
you for the purpose of such marketing at any time without any need to
state your reasons for doing so under Article 21 (2) of the GDPR. This
also applies to profiling insofar as it is associated with such direct
marketing. If you object to processing for direct marketing purposes, we
will no longer process your personal data for such purposes.
To exercise your right to object, simply send an email to
privacy@steinberg.de
.
Specific technical options for exercising your right to revoke
consent or to object may exist for individual types of data processing.
We may have already pointed this out to you in our explanation of the
data processing measures in question.
Transferring data to third
countries
We select the services that we use on our website in such a way that
protection of your personal data is guaranteed in the best possible way.
In case of some services, we have no influence over whether the data
processed by these services is transferred to the parent companies in
the USA or to other third countries. If the European Union has not come
to a decision that such countries have a level of data protection
similar to that of the European Union (“EU adequacy decision”), we or
our contractual partner have concluded a separate contract or binding
corporate regulations that ensure this level of protection through
additional measures and guarantees. In this way, the provider
contractually ensures the protection of your personal data, even in case
of a transfer to the third country.
Data recipients
We only transfer your personal data to third parties if, for
example:
you have given your express consent to such disclosure under
Article 6 (1) (a) of the GDPR; or
doing so is necessary under Article 6 (1) (b) of the GDPR for
executing contractual relationships with you; or
we are legally obligated to disclose the data under
Article 6 (1) (c) of the GDPR; or
disclosure under Article 6 (1) (f) of the GDPR is necessary in
the context of our legitimate interests (e.g. for the establishment,
exercise or defense of legal claims) and you have no overriding
legitimate interest in your data not being disclosed.
External service providers and partner companies will only receive
your data if doing so is necessary to process your request. In these
cases, however, the scope of the data transferred is limited to the
minimum required. Insofar as our service providers come into contact
with your personal data, we ensure that they comply with the regulations
set out in data protection legislation in the same way. Please also note
the providers’ respective privacy policies. The service provider in
question is responsible for the contents of external services, whereby
we check the services to ensure that they comply with legal requirements
as far as is reasonable to do so.
We currently use service providers for hosting and marketing
activities, as well as for identification and access management, media
playback, support services and the blog.
The company listed below, Bright Market, LLC (trading as and
hereinafter referred to as “FastSpring”), is not a service provider that
Steinberg engages. Instead, it acts as an independent sales partner for
purchasing products over the website.
Erasure of data and duration of
storage
Your personal data will be deleted as soon as it is no longer
required for the purposes it was collected and processed for. Once the
purpose has ceased to exist, the data will be deleted unless storage is
necessary for compliance with a legal obligation or for the
establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims. Legal obligations
arise for us in particular from tax and commercial law, as well as from
other laws. For example, we must store accounting data such as order and
payment data or business correspondence for 10 years or 6 years,
depending on the applicable regulations under tax and commercial law.
Further information on any retention periods can be found in the
respective sections relating to the individual processing
operations.
Forum data and posts are valuable contributions within the Steinberg
customer community. That is why we store them until you either delete
your posts or your forum user account or until Steinberg deletes the
forum.
Modifications to this privacy
policy
We revise our data protection information when changes are made to
this website or on other occasions that make doing so necessary. You
should therefore visit this website regularly to check the current state
of the privacy policy.
When visiting our website
In the context of visiting our website, personal data is processed as
described below:
Visiting our website
When you visit our website, the browser used on your terminal device
automatically sends information to our website’s server and stores it
temporarily in what is known as a “log file”. The following information
is also collected during this process without your intervention and is
stored until it is automatically erased:
The date and time of access;
The URL (address) of the referring website;
The file retrieved;
The amount of data sent;
The browser type and version;
The operating system;
The IP address of the requesting internet-enabled
device.
The legal basis for processing the IP address is Article 6 (1) (f) of
the GDPR. Our legitimate interest results from the data collection
purposes listed below.
We use your terminal device’s IP address and the other data listed
above for the following purposes:
Ensuring that a smooth connection is established;
Ensuring that our website / app is convenient to use;
Evaluating system security and stability.
The data is stored for a period of 7 days and then automatically
erased. We also use cookies, analytics tools and targeting procedures
for our website, as explained in more detail below.
Our services for website
optimization and marketing
We use what are known as “cookies” on various pages to make your
visit to our website attractive and to enable the use of certain
functions. Cookies are small text files that are stored on your terminal
device. Some of the cookies we use are deleted again after the browser
session has ended (i.e. after you close your browser (“session
cookies”)). Other cookies remain on your terminal device and enable us
or our partner companies to recognize your browser the next time you
visit our website (“persistent cookies”). Cookies do not contain any
malware. They cannot be used to access other files on your computer or
to determine your email address. If you would like to learn more about
cookies in general and how to manage them, visit:
www.aboutcookies.org.
On our website, we make a distinction between technically necessary
(“essential”) cookies, functional cookies and marketing cookies. Since
you cannot use our website properly without essential cookies, they are
always activated. However, we only set functional and marketing cookies
with your consent.
Insofar as we use cookies that are technically necessary
(“essential”) for the provision of our website, the legal basis for
personal data processing using such cookies is Article 6 (1) (f) of the
GDPR.
Any further personal data processing by functional or marketing
cookies will only take place if you have given us your consent to this
effect. The legal basis in this case is Article 6 (1) (a) of the
GDPR.
You can revoke your consent at any time with effect for the future
and without any need to state your reasons for doing so in our cookie
consent tool. You can also find detailed information on all the cookies
used on this website (such as the cookie providers, the specific
processing purposes, the data collected and the cookie storage periods)
in the cookie consent tool. You can also give your consent here for the
first time or again.
In addition to using our cookie consent tool, you can also disable or
restrict the use of cookies by changing your web browser settings.
Cookies that have already been saved can be deleted at any time. This
can also be done automatically. If cookies are disabled for our website,
you may no longer be able to use all of the website’s functions in
full.
Below, you will find the services that we currently use to ensure the
needs-based design and continuous optimization of our website.
Our cookie consent tool
We use the aforementioned tool from Usercentrics GmbH, Sendlinger
Str. 7, 80331 Munich, Germany, on our website for the purpose of consent
management. The legal basis for the associated personal data processing
is Article 6 (1) (c) of the GDPR, as this is necessary to comply with
our legal obligation to provide proof of consent for the use of cookies
and similar technologies. Further information, such as the scope of
processing, including the data collected and the duration of processing,
as well as the provider’s own privacy policy, can be accessed at any
time in the cookie consent tool.
CloudFlare
To protect against attacks and malicious bots and to improve
performance, we use the services provided by CloudFlare Inc., 101
Townsend St, San Francisco, CA 94107 USA (“CloudFlare”) for our website.
CloudFlare provides a content delivery network (CDN) to increase the
transfer speed and also offers internet security services and
distributed domain name server (DNS) services that act as a reverse
proxy for websites.
When you visit our website, CloudFlare collects the following data to
perform the above-mentioned functions: the name of the web page visited,
the file, the date and time of access, the amount of data transferred,
the successful access notification, the browser type and version, the
user’s operating system, the referrer URL (the page visited beforehand),
the IP address, and the requesting provider.
The data is stored for 4 hours and then erased, provided that there
are no statutory retention periods or other grounds preventing
erasure.
The legal basis for data processing is the need to safeguard our
legitimate interests under Article 6 (1) (f) of the GDPR. These
legitimate interests lie in protecting our website from attacks and
increasing our website’s performance.
Cloudfront
To properly provide our website’s content, we use Amazon Cloudfront,
a service provided by Amazon Web Services LLC, 410 Terry Ave. North,
Seattle, Washington 98109, USA (“Cloudfront”). Cloudfront provides a
content delivery network (CDN) to increase the transfer speed.
Cloudfront collects the following data for this purpose: the usage
data, such as the name of the web page visited, the requesting provider,
the referrer URL (the page visited beforehand), the file, the date and
time of access, the amount of data transferred and successful access
notification, the browser type and version, the operating system, and
the accessing computer’s IP address.
The data will be erased as soon as it is no longer required for the
purpose it was collected for. The legal basis for data processing is the
need to safeguard our legitimate interests under Article 6 (1) (f) of
the GDPR. It is in our legitimate interest under the first sentence of
Article 6 (1) (f) of the GDPR not to operate a content delivery network
ourselves and yet to ensure modern and effective provision of our
website.
Bugherd
We use Bugherd, a service provided by Splitrock Studio Pty Ltd.,
Suite 12A, 80 – 82 Kerlor Road, Essendorn North, VIC 3041, Australia
(“Bugherd”) to make identifying and rectifying technical errors on our
website easier.
Technical errors on the website are tracked internally by means of a
cookie. The IP address and other data in connection with the malfunction
or crash are processed in this regard. The data collected in this way is
used to prevent such technical errors in the future so as to ensure that
the website works properly for visitors.
The data will be erased once the error analysis and evaluation is
complete, unless statutory retention periods prevent erasure on a
case-by-case basis.
The legal basis for processing is the legitimate interest under
Article 6 (1) (f) of the GDPR. Our legitimate interest is to display the
website in a technically perfect manner and to receive systemic feedback
in case of malfunctions.
Google Tag Manager
For reasons of transparency, we would like to point out that we use
Google Tag Manager provided by Google LLC, 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway,
Mountain View, CA 94043, USA. The controller for users in the EU, the
EEA and Switzerland is Google Ireland Limited, Google Building, Gordon
House, 4 Barrow St, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland.
We can use Google Tag Manager to integrate sections of tracking code
that we use on our website over a user interface without any programming
effort and to manage them more efficiently. These “tags” are small
elements of code that enable certain tools to measure traffic and
visitor behavior, to track the impact of online advertising and social
media channels, to set up remarketing and targeting, and to test and
optimize websites, to name but a few examples. We use Google Tag Manager
to integrate tracking and analytics services on our website (e.g. Google
Analytics, Snowplow or Hotjar). If you have disabled these services,
Google Tag Manager will take this into account.
Google Tag Manager does not set any cookies itself and does not
collect or store any personal data. It acts as a mere transport layer
for the implemented tags and scripts.
For more information on Google Tag Manager, see:
https://marketingplatform.google.com/intl/en/about/analytics/tag-manager/use-policy/
.
Google Analytics
This website uses Google Analytics, a web analytics service provided
by Google LLC, 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA
(“Google”). The controller for users in the EU / the EEA and Switzerland
is Google Ireland Limited, Google Building, Gordon House, 4 Barrow St,
Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland. Google Analytics uses cookies that enable
analysis of your use of the website. The information it generates about
how you use this website is generally transferred to and stored on a
Google server in the USA.
Our website uses Google Analytics with the “anonymizeIP” extension.
This means that Google will truncate your IP address collected by the
Google Analytics cookie within member states of the European Union or in
other states that are signatories to the Agreement on the European
Economic Area before transferring it to the USA. Only in exceptional
cases will the full IP address be transferred to a Google server in the
USA and truncated there. Google uses this information on our behalf for
the purpose of evaluating your use of the website, compiling reports on
website activities and providing the website operator with other
services relating to website and internet usage. The IP address that
your browser transfers in the context of Google Analytics will not be
merged with other data held by Google.
The legal basis for personal data processing using cookies is
Article 6 (1) (a) of the GDPR. You can revoke this consent at any time
as described above by adjusting your cookie settings.
Further information on terms of use and data protection can be found
at: https://marketingplatform.google.com/about/analytics/terms/us/ or
www.google.com/intl/en/analytics/privacyoverview.html
.
Matomo Analytics
Our website uses the open source web analytics service Matomo, a
service provided by “InnoCraft Ltd”, a company based at 7 Waterloo Quay,
PO625 Wellington, New Zealand. As InnoCraft is based outside the EU,
InnoCraft has appointed a representative in the EU: ePrivacy Holding
GmbH, Grosse Bleichen 21, 20354 Hamburg (
privacy@innocraft.com
).
This web analytics software is not used to recognize returning users,
but only to statistically evaluate how our website is used. In addition
to the pages visited and files accessed, data on the operating system
used (browser, browser plugins, screen resolution and approximate
location) and the time spent on the components of the website is stored.
We have taken the following measures to achieve this:
The IP address or other identifying data is anonymized.
Profiling does not take place.
No cookies are used.
No data is disclosed to third parties.
The legal basis for using Matomo is the first sentence of
Article 6 (1) (f) of the GDPR. The legitimate interest lies in
analyzing, optimizing and economically operating our website. If you
have set the “Do Not Track” option in your browser, Matomo will not
store any data about your visit to our website. However, if you have not
set the “Do Not Track” option and do not agree to Matomo storing data,
you can object to such storage in the window that appears.
The data that Matomo collects is erased as soon as it is no longer
required for processing purposes.
Snowplow
This website uses technologies provided by SnowPlow Analytics
Limited, 17 Bevis Marks, Floor 6, London, EC3A 7LN, United Kingdom (
www.snowplowanalytics.com
),
to collect data about your behavior when you visit the Steinberg
website. This may include the likes of the web browser used, the web
pages visited, the links clicked, the products viewed and how long you
stayed on our website. We use, analyze and store this data to optimize
our website and to improve marketing of our products.
We store this information in a pseudonymized user profile based on
the consent you granted previously (Article 6 (1) (a) of the GDPR). The
information is not used to identify individual users or merged with
other data about individual users. Steinberg stores this data until it
is no longer required for the above-mentioned marketing purposes.
Mouseflow
This website uses Mouseflow, a web analytics tool provided by
Mouseflow ApS, Flaesketorvet 68, 1711 Copenhagen, Denmark. Mouseflow is
a web analytics tool that enables us to collect and evaluate information
about how our website is used. For this purpose, Mouseflow processes
data such as mouse movements, clicks, scroll events and keystrokes
(entries in forms are not saved) that take place when visitors use our
website. Mouseflow either does not collect the assigned IP address at
all or only collects it in anonymized form, in addition to other
technical data that is generated when you visit our website, such as the
browser, operating system or screen resolution. Mouseflow processes the
data in European data centers (Amsterdam) only and on our behalf.
Some of this data is information that is stored on the terminal
device you are using. Mouseflow also uses cookies, which are used to
store and retrieve further information on the terminal device you are
using. Such storage of information by Mouseflow or access to information
that is already stored on your terminal device will only take place with
your consent. Consent can be revoked at any time and with effect for the
future by means of our cookie banner or using Mouseflow’s
opt-out function
.
The data that Mouseflow collects is erased as soon as it is no longer
required for processing purposes.
You can find more information on data protection at Mouseflow here:
https://mouseflow.com/legal/gdpr/
.
Google Ads, Remarketing and
Conversion Tracking
We use the Google Ads service on this website based on the consent
you granted previously (Article 6 (1) (a) of the GDPR). Google Ads is an
online advertising program provided by Google LLC, 1600 Amphitheatre
Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA. The controller for users in the
EU / the EEA and Switzerland is Google Ireland Limited, Google Building,
Gordon House, 4 Barrow St, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland.
This means that we place Google Ads text and video ads and also use
Google Remarketing and Conversion Tracking as part of this. The ads are
displayed after search requests are made on websites in the Google
advertising network. We also use ad remarketing lists for search ads.
This allows us to customize search ad campaigns for visitors who have
already visited our website. The services enable us to combine our ads
with certain search terms or to place ads for previous visitors (e.g.
advertising services that visitors have viewed on our website). This
allows us to display interest-based advertising to visitors to our
website on other websites within the Google advertising network (as a
“Google ad” in Google search results or on other websites).
Analyzing online user behavior is essential if we are to show
interest-based advertising. Google uses cookies to conduct this
analysis. When a user clicks on an ad or visits our website, Google sets
a cookie on their computer. The information collected by means of the
cookie in question is used for the purpose of addressing the user
specifically in a subsequent search request. Further information on the
cookie technology used can also be found in Google’s website statistics
information and in its privacy policy. With the help of this technology,
Google and we as a customer are notified that users have clicked on an
ad and have been redirected to our website. The information obtained in
this way is used exclusively for statistical analysis purposes to
optimize advertising. We do not receive any information that can be used
to identify visitors personally. Your IP address will be transferred to
Google, but as we use Google’s IP masking on this website as part of
using Google Analytics, your IP address will be anonymized. The
statistics that Google provides to us include the total number of users
who clicked on one of our ads and, if applicable, whether they were
redirected to a page on our website with a conversion tag. Based on
these statistics, we can track which search terms were clicked on our ad
particularly often and which ads lead to users contacting us using the
contact form.
YouTube videos
With your consent, we use the services provided by YouTube LLC, 901
Cherry Ave., San Bruno, CA 94066, USA, a subsidiary of Google Inc., 1600
Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA, on our website to
play video content. For those users who have their habitual residence in
the European Economic Area or in Switzerland, Google Ireland Limited
(“Google”), Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland, is the
controller who is responsible for your data.
The videos in question are stored on the service provider’s servers
and are retrieved from them as required. When you visit a page that a
YouTube video is embedded in, a connection to the YouTube servers is
established (provided you have given your prior consent), which also
requires your IP address to be transferred, and the content is displayed
on the website by notifying your browser. When you actively start the
video, this information is also transferred to YouTube.
If you are logged into YouTube at this time, the information about
the videos you have watched will be assigned to your YouTube account.
You can stop this from happening by logging out of your account before
visiting our website.
The data processing operations described above only take place with
your express consent under Article 6 (1) (a) of the GDPR.
Further information on YouTube’s data protection practices is
provided by Google at the following link:
https://www.google.de/intl/en/policies/privacy/
.
SoundCloud
We use an embedded media player from SoundCloud, an online audio
distribution platform and music exchange service provided by SoundCloud
Global Limited & Co. KG, Rheinsberger Str. 76/77, 10115 Berlin,
Germany, on our website. The SoundCloud media player uses cookies and
similar technologies to provide, protect and improve the SoundCloud
platform.
We use SoundCloud by embedding individual audio files or playlists
from the platform on our website as an “iFrame” so that they can be
played directly on our website. When you visit a subpage of our website
that an audio file is embedded in, a connection to the SoundCloud
servers is established and the audio file is made playable within our
website. This tells SoundCloud which web page you have visited. Your IP
address will also be transferred to SoundCloud. If you play an embedded
audio file, this information is also passed on to SoundCloud. If you are
logged in as a SoundCloud user, SoundCloud will assign this data to your
user account.
Steinberg has no influence over data processing at SoundCloud, in
particular over how long the collected data is stored for or over data
transfer. You can find information on this in SoundCloud’s cookie policy
at:
https://soundcloud.com/pages/cookies
.
Data is processed based on your consent (Article 6 (1) (a) of the
GDPR). You can revoke your consent at any time with effect for the
future.
Google Fonts
We use Google Fonts provided by Google LLC, 1600 Amphitheatre
Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA, to display fonts on our website
in a uniform manner. The controller for users in the EU / the EEA and
Switzerland is Google Ireland Limited, Google Building, Gordon House, 4
Barrow St, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland.
When you visit our website, the required data is loaded to your
browser cache to display texts and fonts correctly. This requires a
connection to Google’s servers to be established and may result in
transfer of personal data, in particular your IP address, to Google
LLC’s servers in the USA. Google Fonts are transferred to your browser’s
cache to avoid loading multiple times over. If your browser does not
support web fonts or blocks access, your computer will use a standard
font.
We use Google Fonts in the interest of displaying our website in a
uniform and appealing way. The legal basis is the need to safeguard our
legitimate interests under Article 6 (1) (f) of the GDPR.
Adobe Fonts (Typekit)
We use what are known as “web fonts” from Adobe Systems Software
Ireland Limited (Adobe Ireland) to display fonts in a uniform manner.
When you view a page, your browser loads the required web fonts to your
browser cache to display texts and fonts correctly. The browser you are
using must connect to Adobe’s servers for this purpose. Adobe thus
receives information that our website has been accessed using your IP
address. We use Adobe Fonts in the interest of displaying our website in
a uniform and appealing way. The legal basis is the need to safeguard
our legitimate interests under Article 6 (1) (f) of the GDPR.
Insofar as data is processed outside the EEA, where a level of data
protection corresponding to the European standard does not exist, such
data transfer takes place based on standard contractual clauses approved
by the European Commission.
Further information on data protection with regard to Adobe Fonts and
Adobe in general can be found at:
https://www.adobe.com/privacy/policies/adobe-fonts.html
and
https://www.adobe.com/privacy/policy.html
.
Facebook conversion tracking
pixel
We use the Custom Audiences service provided by Meta Platforms, Inc.,
1601 S. California Avenue, Palo Alto, CA 94304, USA (hereinafter
referred to as “Facebook”), as part of usage-based online advertising.
For this purpose, we use the Facebook Ads Manager to define target
groups of users based on certain characteristics who are subsequently
shown ads within the Facebook network. Facebook selects users based on
the profile information they provide and other data provided using
Facebook. If users click on an ad and then reach our website, Facebook
is notified that the users have clicked on the advertising banner using
the Facebook pixel integrated on our website.
In principle, a non-reversible and non-personal checksum (hash value)
that is transferred to Facebook for analytics and marketing purposes is
generated from your usage data. A Facebook cookie is set during this
process. It collects information on your activities on our website (e.g.
surfing behavior, subpages visited, etc.). Your IP address is also
stored and used to geographically control advertising.
We do not use Facebook Custom Audiences using the customer list or
the “advanced matching” function.
Please refer to Facebook’s privacy policy for further information
about the purpose and scope of data collection and Facebook’s further
processing and use of the data, as well as possible settings you can
make to protect your privacy. You can also make settings to control
which ads you are shown on Facebook in your Facebook account
settings.
The legal basis for data collection is your consent. You can revoke
your consent at any time with effect for the future.
We store the data that the Facebook conversion tracking pixel
collects for 90 days.
Joint controllership:
Steinberg Media Technologies GmbH and Meta Platforms Ireland Limited,
4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, D2 Dublin, Ireland, are joint
controllers who are responsible for data collection and transfer as part
of this process. We have concluded a corresponding agreement with
Facebook regulating our joint controllership. It is available here:
https://www.facebook.com/legal/controller_addendum. This defines the
respective responsibilities for complying with the obligation under the
GDPR with regard to joint controllership. The contact details and data
of Facebook’s data protection officer can be found here:
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy
.
TikTok Pixel
We use “TikTok Pixel”, a tracking and conversion tool provided by the
Chinese company ByteDance, on our website. The controller for users in
the EU / the EEA and Switzerland is TikTok Technology Limited, 10
Earlsfort Terrace, Dublin, D02 T380, Ireland (“TikTok”).
TikTok Pixel allows us to measure our ad performance and conversions,
and to build target groups for remarketing purposes. It also enables us
to display interest-based advertising to users of our website and to
measure and analyze their behavior on our website for statistical and
market research purposes.
Among other things, the IP address, a device ID, the device type and
the operating system, not to mention information on the activities on
our website (e.g. surfing behavior, subpages visited, etc.), may be
recorded. This data is transferred to TikTok. TikTok may use this
information to assign users of our website to a TikTok user account.
TikTok uses this data to display personalized advertising to its users
and to create interest-based user profiles.
If data is transferred to countries outside the European Economic
Area where a level of data protection corresponding to the European
standard does not exist, TikTok states that it uses standard data
protection clauses under Article 46 (2) (c) of the GDPR.
TikTok Pixel processes data based on your consent under
Article 6 (1) (a) of the GDPR. You can revoke this consent at any time
with effect for the future.
Further information on TikTok’s data processing operations can be
found in TikTok’s privacy policy:
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/privacy-policy-eea?lang=en
.
Optimizely
We currently use Optimizely, which is operated by Optimizely, Inc.,
631 Howard Street, Suite 100, San Francisco, CA 94105, USA, to improve
website design (A/B and multivariate tests).
This involves testing an original version of our website against a
modified version to find out which is more appealing and effective to
you. Optimizely uses cookies for this purpose. The data collected in the
cookie is generally transferred to and stored on an Optimizely server in
the USA. The cookies are valid for six months and do not collect any
personal data. When you visit our website, Optimizely also evaluates
technical information based on the data transferred by your browser
(e.g. browser type / version, operating system used, web pages visited
on our site, including length of stay, web page visited beforehand).
Your IP address is only processed in anonymized form. IP addresses are
thus truncated before they are transferred to a server in the USA. The
possibility of direct reference to individuals in connection with the
stored data is therefore generally excluded.
The purpose of data processing is to analyze user behavior for
optimization and marketing purposes. Pseudonymized usage profiles can be
created and evaluated from the collected data for the same purpose.
Optimizely’s privacy policy can be viewed here:
https://www.optimizely.com/privacy/
.
Data is only collected and stored with your express consent under the
first sentence of Article 6 (1) (a) of the GDPR. You can revoke this
consent at any time with effect for the future.
Reddit Pixel
We use the Reddit Conversion Pixel from Reddit, Inc., 548 Market St,
San Francisco 94104, USA (hereinafter referred to as “Reddit”) for
interest-based online advertising.
When you visit our website, this tracking pixel creates a direct
connection between your browser and the Reddit server. This means that
Reddit receives information from your browser, for example, notifying it
that our site has been accessed from your device. The purpose of this
embedding is to ensure that our ads are displayed as effectively as
possible on the Reddit platform and that we receive feedback on the
success of the ads we display.
By using the tool, IP address, type of device used, user agent string
with browser type and operating system, referrer URLs, device
information (e.g. device IDs), screen viewport, and event category are
being transmitted.
Reddit can use this information and a cookie which is stored on the
device to identify users of our website with a Reddit user account.
Reddit uses this data to display personalized advertising to its users
and to create interest-based user profiles. If you are registered with a
Reddit service, Reddit can assign the visit to your account. Even if you
are not registered with Reddit or have not logged in, it is possible
that the provider will obtain and store your IP address and other
identifying information.
For more information about the purpose and scope of the data
collection and the further processing and use of the data by Reddit, as
well as your settings options for protecting your privacy, please refer
to the Reddit
privacy
policy
. You can also adjust the ads displayed to you on Reddit in
your Reddit account settings.
If data is transferred to countries outside the European Economic
Area where the level of data protection is not in line with the European
standard, Reddit states that it uses standard data protection clauses in
accordance with Art. 46 (2) c GDPR.
The legal basis for the collection of the data is your consent in
accordance with Art. 6 (1) a GDPR. You can revoke your consent at any
time with effect for the future.
The data collected by the Reddit conversion tracking pixel is only
stored by us for the duration of the processing.
Directive on privacy and
electronic communications
Due to the Directive on privacy and electronic communications of the
European Union and its principles on consent to the storage of
information on terminal equipments, it should be noted that consent
within the meaning of Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a GDPR, which is mentioned as
the legal basis in the context of the processings listed in this privacy
policy, also means consent within the meaning of the other national laws
implementing the Directive on privacy and electronic communications. If
no consent is required for the processing of the information, for
example because access to information already stored in the end user's
terminal equipment is essential for the controller to provide you with a
digital service such as a website, the legal basis that implements the
provisions of the Directive on privacy and electronic communications at
national level is also applicable (e.g. § 25 of the Act on the
Regulation of Data Protection and the Protection of Privacy in
Telecommunications and Digital Services in Germany or § 165 of the
Telecommunications Act in Austria).
MySteinberg customer account /
Steinberg ID
You can apply for your personal Steinberg ID using our website and
thus gain access to a personal customer area (“MySteinberg portal”).
This customer area gives you access to an overview of your Steinberg
products and any updates or upgrades available for them, not to mention
direct access to our support services, Steinberg forums and other
functionalities.
To create such a customer account, you only need to provide a valid
email address, a secure password, your first and last name (so that we
can help you if you need to restore access to your customer account, for
example), and the corresponding license data if you are registering a
product. You can provide further information on a voluntary basis. You
must also be at least 16 years old or provide us with proof of parental
consent.
You need to create a customer account or to have your personal
Steinberg ID to download and activate or register your Steinberg
products, to receive support, updates and upgrades, or to voluntarily
use other Steinberg services (e.g. to take part in discussions on the
Steinberg forum). Registration is a prerequisite for using many
products. This is the only way we can protect our software and services
from unlawful duplication and use. Details on activating and licensing
our products can be found in the Steinberg EULA.
The legal basis for personal data processing associated with the
Steinberg ID and the MySteinberg customer account is the performance of
the contract concluded with you in this regard (Article 6 (1) (b) of the
GDPR).
The details of your customer account will be stored until it is
deleted. If you have provided voluntary information, you can delete or
change it yourself at any time in your customer area. Data collected as
part of a request to create a user account will be automatically deleted
no later than 48 hours after the customer account has been created,
unless the user has confirmed the setup of their customer account by
email by that time.
Your customer account data is hosted exclusively on servers within
Germany by a service provider.
When making purchases using our
website
If you decide to purchase one of the products shown on our website
during your visit, you will be taken to the website of FastSpring (our
sales partner) as soon as you click on the
“Add to shopping
cart”
button. FastSpring is the seller of the product in
question in the legal sense and becomes your contractual partner when
you place an order.
Data processing by our sales partner
As technology from FastSpring (our sales partner) is integrated into
the Steinberg website, only the data mentioned above under “Visiting our
website” and the product selection you have made will be
transferred:
The date and time of access;
The URL (address) of the referring website;
The browser type and version;
The operating system;
The IP address of the requesting internet-enabled
device.
This is absolutely necessary to be able to continue the ordering
process from a technical standpoint. The legal basis for data processing
is therefore the first sentence of Article 6 (1) (b) of the GDPR.
As you continue with the ordering process, further personal data such
as your name, address and payment details will be collected from you for
the purpose of recording and processing your order.
If you do not have a Steinberg ID for licensing or activating your
new Steinberg product, Steinberg will create a Steinberg ID for the
email address you used when you made your purchase and will guide you
through the process of using it from now on. You can find more
information about the Steinberg ID in the section entitled “MySteinberg
customer account / Steinberg ID”.
FastSpring (our sales partner) and Steinberg are joint controllers
for processing this data under Article 26 (1) of the GDPR. Steinberg has
concluded a corresponding agreement on joint controllership with the
sales partner. Please contact FastSpring if you have any data protection
concerns regarding purchase and payment. Please contact Steinberg at any
time if you have any further concerns or questions relating to data
protection.
Affiliate marketing
Steinberg works with various marketing partners to sell its products.
If you make a purchase on the Steinberg website via an affiliate link,
for example from an influencer, it is necessary to link the influencer's
link to the purchase made by you so that the affiliate can be paid the
contractual fees by our service provider and to avoid any misuse. As
part of this assignment, mainly technical data that is not personal is
transmitted to the service provider. However, the IP address used to
make the purchase is also transmitted. This transmission serves to avoid
the risk of misuse. The transmission of the IP address is based on the
controller's legitimate interest in accordance with Art. 6 (1) point f
GDPR, to ensure that misuse in the context of affiliate marketing is
prevented and that proper attribution can take place.
Support with licensing, activation and startup
If you buy a product from our online store, Steinberg will be happy
to help you with any questions you have relating to licensing,
activation and startup. For these support purposes, it may be necessary
for us to process your personal data to resolve your request.
The legal basis for this is the purchase contract for Steinberg
products that you concluded with FastSpring (our sales partner). We
store the data that we collect as part of our support services for as
long as is necessary to assist you with your request.
Statistical evaluations
We use data from your transactions on our online store to generate
statistical evaluations for further developing our products and (store)
website.
For this purpose, FastSpring (our sales partner) will provide us with
data relating to your purchase once you have completed a purchase with
it. We use this data, in particular the purchaser’s personal data, and
including their address and the products they purchased, to create
statistical evaluations.
These statistics are used to improve and further develop the products
and services we offer and to create sales forecasts. Personal data is
only used to create the evaluations to the extent that doing so is
necessary for the aforementioned purposes. The data is pseudonymized or
anonymized as far as possible before it is evaluated. The results of the
evaluations are used exclusively in aggregated form. Customer-related
evaluations are not carried out unless the customer has expressly
consented to this.
The legal basis for processing the data described above is the first
sentence of Article 6 (1) (f) of the GDPR. Our legitimate interests lie
in maintaining the competitiveness of our products and improving our
sales.
We have concluded a joint controllership agreement with FastSpring
(our sales partner). It transparently regulates who complies with which
obligations under the GDPR. Please contact us at any time to assert your
rights as a data subject.
If you would like to purchase an Education or Crossgrade
version
We must check your eligibility if you would like to purchase a
discounted Education version for pupils, students or teachers or a
Crossgrade version (for anyone who owns another qualifying product). For
that reason, we request that you log in with your Steinberg ID and
upload your school certificate in PDF form or proof of purchase for a
competitor’s product, for example. Once a Steinberg employee has checked
it, you will receive a link that you can use to purchase your desired
product at a reduced price.
The documents you uploaded will be deleted 30 days after they were
checked. The metadata for checking your eligibility will be stored for
support purposes until your Steinberg ID is deleted.
The legal basis for storing and processing the data and documents you
provided to prove your eligibility is Article 6 (1) (b) of the GDPR.
Trial and SE/AI/LE versions
We generally provide free trial or SE/AI/LE versions for some of our
software products. You can download these time-limited trial versions or
SE/AI/LE versions with limited functionality from our website after
creating a Steinberg ID. To create your Steinberg ID, all we need from
you is a valid email address, your first and last name, and a password
of your choosing (see above).
Together with your Steinberg ID, we store the fact that you have used
a specific trial version in our license management system. We do this
for a certain period of time to effectively eliminate the possibility of
unintended use of multiple trial versions. Your personal data is
processed in the context of providing trial and SE/AI/LE versions based
on Article 6 (1) (b) of the GDPR.
In case of trial versions, we reserve the right to exchange, evaluate
and process usage data for the purpose of product improvement. This is
based on a legitimate interest under Article 6 (1) (f) of the EU’s GDPR
for software improvement, with the possibility of objection with effect
for the future (e.g. in the product or in the Steinberg account). In
case of products acquired for free, such as SE/AI/LE versions, any
exchange, evaluation and processing of usage data serves the purpose of
product improvement and is based on the legitimate interest of
performing the contract under Article 6 (1) (b) of the GDPR.
VST Connect
VST Connect is a product from Steinberg Media Technologies GmbH that
allows you to invite other musicians to contribute to your project over
the internet.
VST Connect allows you and a third party to work together on an audio
project or to exchange audio and video messages over a peer-to-peer
connection with audio, video or MIDI data. To do this, you and the third
party you would like to work with must log in with your Steinberg ID. An
alias that the project partner can use to find you is created to
establish the connection. Steinberg can assign this alias to you as a
person. Steinberg also processes your IP address to establish the
connection. Steinberg has no access to the audio, video and MIDI
data.
The purpose of such processing is thus to establish a technical
connection for cooperation between you and third parties. No other
personal data is collected apart from the data mentioned here and the
data mentioned in the section entitled “Steinberg ID”.
Data in the context of VST Connect is erased after the connection has
been terminated or after the Steinberg ID that the data was assigned to
has been deleted. Please also refer to the “Steinberg ID” section of
this privacy policy.
The legal basis for such data processing is Article 6 (1) (b) of the
GDPR.
Product support
If you request assistance with your products using the support portal
(which is accessible within your customer account), the following
personal data must be transferred: your title, first name, last name,
request, email address, and consent data. This also applies if you
contact our Support team over the phone.
We create support tickets with the help of a service provider’s
product. Our employees and you as a registered user of our products can
use these support tickets to recap the status of your request at any
time (and our employees can use them to initiate further steps if
necessary). The legal basis for the associated personal data processing
is the safeguarding of our legitimate interest in providing fast and
efficient support for the users of our products (Article 6 (1) (f) of
the GDPR), as well as Article 6 (1) (b) of the GDPR, if the aim of your
request is to conclude a contract or if the processing is necessary for
the performance of an existing contractual relationship between us.
If you are based outside the EU / EEA, the regional sales partner in
whose territory you indicate your country of residence as being in in
the Steinberg customer area can view the data you have provided for the
requested support, all the while ensuring an adequate level of data
protection. If, in this case, you have to enter your data in a system
operated by our regional sales partner, an adequate level of data
protection is also guaranteed for your data.
Steinberg Forum
We operate a forum at
https://forums.steinberg.net/
,
where our users can discuss various topics from the world of Steinberg,
in particular our individual products. To register for the forum, you
need a Steinberg ID (see above) and a username of your choosing.
Additional information (biographical details, geolocation, date of
birth) can be added as an option.
When you submit posts, they are posted in the thread in question for
all forum visitors to see. Other forum users can reply, add likes, etc.
Your posts on our forums are always saved permanently. Processing of
your user data and the posts you publish on the forum is based on
Article 6 (1) (b) of the GDPR, for the performance of the contract
concluded with you on the use of your Steinberg ID.
Furthermore, when a post is published, your IP address is stored for
the purpose of identifying authors of inappropriate or illegal posts
(for which we as the site operator can be held responsible) if
necessary. The legal basis for this is Article 6 (1) (f) of the GDPR.
Our legitimate interests lie in preventing individual users from and, if
necessary, having them prosecuted for posting illegal content.
Further information on data protection at Civilized Discourse
Construction Kit, Inc. can be found at:
https://www.discourse.org/privacy
If you read and comment on our
blog
You will find a product subpage for our “Dorico” software at the URL:
https://blog.dorico.com
. This
subpage was created with WordPress and contains its own blog. This
results in the following special personal data processing operations,
which only relate to this Dorico subpage:
Blog function
In the context of the blog, users can comment on our articles and on
other users’ posts. To take part in the blog, all you need to do is
enter a username and a valid email address. Providing details of a
website is optional.
When you submit comments on an article (or a comment), they are
posted in the thread in question for all blog visitors to see. Other
blog users can reply to them. Your comments on our forums are always
saved permanently. Processing of your user data and the posts you
publish on the forum is based on Article 6 (1) (b) and Article 6 (1) (f)
of the GDPR. This necessary to provide the comments function you use in
the context of our website’s terms of use and to comply with our
legitimate interest in contacting you if third parties should object to
your comment as unlawful.
Furthermore, when a comment is published, your IP address is stored
for the purpose of identifying authors of inappropriate or illegal
comments (for which we as the site operator can be held responsible) if
necessary. The legal basis for this is Article 6 (1) (f) of the GDPR.
Our legitimate interests lie in preventing individual users from and, if
necessary, having them prosecuted for posting illegal content.
Gravatar
We use the Gravatar service provided by Automattic Inc., 60 29th
Street #343, San Francisco, CA 94110, USA, within our blog’s comments
function. A “gravatar” is a globally recognized avatar – a user image
available worldwide – that is assigned to an email address and can be
used in various online services. With the help of Gravatar, we offer you
the opportunity to personalize your posts with a profile picture.
To use Gravatar’s functions, you must first of all register with
Automattic Inc. (the provider) and enter the email addresses you wish to
use a gravatar for. When you submit a post on our blog, the email
address you use here is sent to Automattic’s servers in hashed form and
compared there with registered users’ hashed email addresses. If the
assignment is successful, the gravatar you have selected for the email
address in question will then be displayed in our blog. If you do not
want this to happen, you can also leave a comment using an email address
that is not registered with Gravatar. However, even then data (such as
technical and device-related data, and in particular your IP address)
will be transferred to the USA.
The legal basis for the personal data processing described above,
including transfer to the USA, is the consent you granted previously
under Article 6 (1) (a) of the GDPR. You can revoke this consent at any
time with effect for the future by unchecking the corresponding consent
checkbox.
Further information on Automattic’s processing of your personal data
can be found in its privacy policy at:
https://automattic.com/privacy/
.
Akismet anti-spam check
We use the “Akismet” service provided by Automattic Inc., 60 29th
Street #343, San Francisco, CA 94110, USA. With the help of this
service, we can make a distinction between comments made by real people
and spam comments. For this purpose, all comments are sent to an
Automattic server in the USA, where they are analyzed and stored for
four days for comparison purposes. If a comment is classified as spam,
the data will also be stored beyond this period.
The following information is processed: the name entered, the email
address, the IP address, the content of the comment, the referrer, the
browser used, the time of posting, and the terminal device’s operating
system. You can prevent data collection to some extent by not entering
your name or email address or by using a pseudonym when commenting.
Alternatively, you would have to refrain from commenting.
The legal basis for the aforementioned processing of your personal
data is your consent under Article 6 (1) (a) of the GDPR. Further
information on Akismet’s data collection and usage activities can be
found in Automattic’s privacy policy:
https://automattic.com/privacy/
.
Jetpack (WordPress Stats)
We use the Jetpack plugin (specifically the “WordPress Stats”
subfunction) provided by Automattic Inc., 60 29th Street #343, San
Francisco, CA 94110, USA, for the purpose of statistically evaluating
user visits. Jetpack uses what are known as “cookies”, which are text
files that are stored on your computer and enable analysis of your use
of the website.
The processed data can be used to create user profiles, whereby they
are only used for analytics purposes, not for advertising purposes. The
information that the cookie generates about your use of the Dorico pages
is stored on a server in the USA.
The legal basis for the personal data processing described above is
the consent you granted previously under Article 6 (1) (a) of the
GDPR.
Newsletter, online surveys,
social media fan pages
Newsletter
If you subscribe to our newsletter, we will inform you by email of
the latest news from Steinberg and of special offers, promotions and
events. The legal basis for sending the newsletter in question is your
consent under the first sentence of Article 6 (1) (a) of the GDPR. We
can also provide existing customers with relevant information by email
under the conditions set out in Section 7 (3) of the German Protection
Against Unfair Competition Act (UWG). Your data will not be disclosed to
third parties for advertising purposes.
We use what is known as the “double opt-in procedure” to register
subscribers to our newsletters. This means that, once you have
subscribed, we will send you an email to the email address you provided.
In this email, we ask you to confirm that you would like to receive the
newsletter. If you do not confirm your subscription, your information
will be automatically erased after 2 days.
We store your current IP address at the time of subscription, the
time of subscription and the confirmation for up to three years after
subscription (limitation period) – unless you have interacted with a
newsletter email in the meantime (see below for details). The purpose of
this procedure is to be able to prove your subscription in case of doubt
and, if necessary, to clarify any misuse of your personal data. The
legal basis for logging the subscription is our legitimate interest
under the first sentence of Article 6 (1) (f) of the GDPR in proving
previously granted consent. Also see Article 7 (1) of the GDPR.
You can revoke your consent to receiving the newsletter and
unsubscribe from it at any time. You can revoke your consent by clicking
on the link provided in every newsletter email.
To provide relevant information, we may combine newsletter opening
and clicking behavior with product activations, purchasing behavior and
visiting behavior on the website, and your details for newsletter
campaigns. For this evaluation, the emails sent contain what are known
as “web beacons” or “tracking pixels” and, if applicable, personalized
links that are stored on our server and are loaded when the newsletter
is opened or when you click on the link.
We use the data obtained in this way to create a user profile so we
can tailor the newsletter to your individual interests. We record when
you read our newsletters and which links you click on in them, and thus
draw conclusions about your personal interests. We link this data to
actions you perform on our website.
The legal basis for such data processing is your consent under the
first sentence of Article 6 (1) (b) of the GDPR.
You can revoke your consent at any time with effect for the future.
Simply click on the Unsubscribe link provided in every email.
Online surveys
From time to time, we conduct online surveys (e.g. by means of a link
on our forum, using the website or in our newsletter). We record your
answers to the individual questions as part of the survey. Participation
in the survey is voluntary, as is answering the questions.
We will process the data you enter in the survey to enable us to
analyze all the respondents’ responses. We hope that the analysis will
allow us to draw conclusions about the respective questions in the
survey.
We will retain your data for as long as doing so is necessary for the
purposes for which it was collected (in particular for marketing
purposes). The legal basis for processing your data as part of the
online survey is the consent you granted previously under
Article 6 (1) (a) of the GDPR, which you can revoke at any time with
effect for the future.
We use two tools in particular for the surveys:
Our surveys can be carried out using the QuestionPro tool.
QuestionPro is a product provided by QuestionPro GmbH, Friedrichstrasse
171, 10117 Berlin, Germany. If you take part in a survey, the
information you provide, the time of your participation and your IP
address will be processed by QuestionPro on our behalf. We have
concluded a processing agreement with QuestionPro (under Article 28 of
the GDPR).
To create and conduct surveys, we sometimes also use Google Forms
provided by Google Ireland Ltd, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4,
Ireland. The data collected with a Google Forms form is stored on a
cloud storage solution provided for us by Google. In addition to the
respective personal data that you enter in the forms, information about
your operating system, your browser, the date and time of your visit,
the referrer URL and your IP address is also collected, transferred to
the provider and stored on the provider’s servers.
Social media fan pages
The online platforms provided by some third-party providers (such as
SoundCloud, Facebook, Instagram, Twitter or YouTube) have their own
Steinberg profiles (fan pages), where users have the opportunity to
publish their own content relating to our products (e.g. comments they
have posted). We expressly refer to the terms of use applicable to the
third-party providers in question, in particular the corresponding data
protection provisions.
On our website, you will find links to our corresponding profiles
with these third-party providers (which are recognizable by the symbol
of the third-party provider in question). They are not what are known as
“social plugins”, but are rather simple links. So data is not exchanged
with the websites of these third-party providers when you merely visit
our website. Data is only exchanged when you decide to access the
third-party provider’s corresponding service by clicking on one of the
symbols. Please refer to the privacy policy of the provider in question
for information on how it processes your personal data.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://o.steinberg.net/en/extras/privacypolicy_leadads.html:
To
Navigation
change
To
Content
change
To
Service
change
Steinberg Media Technologies GmbH
Creativity First
Beim Strohhause 31
20097 Hamburg
Tel: +49 (0)40 210 35-0
Fax: +49 (0)40 210 35-300
Home
Data Privacy Policy
English
English
Deutsch
Español
Français
日本語
Steinberg Media Technologies GmbH
Support
MySteinberg
About
Privacy Policy
Data Privacy Policy
Legal Terms
Hardware Precautions
Data Privacy Policy
Steinberg Media Technologies GmbH uses the social platform Facebook
to publish advertising campaigns. If Facebook users are interested in
this service, Facebook offers a format called Facebook "Lead Ads". A
contact form for lead generation. The user can enter the requested
contact information into the form or - if the data is already available
within the Facebook account - it will be filled in automatically by
Facebook.
When using "Lead Ads", personal data will be processed. Please find
more detailed information about this below:
Who is responsible for the data
processing?
Both Facebook and Steinberg Media Technologies, as the advertiser,
are data controllers when using Facebook "Lead Ads".
Responsible for data processing using “Lead Ads” on Facebook is:
Meta Platforms Ireland Ltd. („Facebook“)
4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Ireland
In addition, and in particular for the processing of the data you
have entered yourself, the controller is:
Steinberg Media Technologies GmbH („Steinberg“)
Beim Strohhause 31
20097 Hamburg
Deutschland
Our data privacy officer can be contacted at:
privacy@steinberg.de
For which purposes and on what
legal basis will your data be processed?
When using Facebook, various data about you is collected, for example
user or contact data. Facebook does process this information even if you
use the contact option "Lead Ads". Please note that we do not have any
influence over this processing of data. On this matter, Facebook acts as
sole controller under data protection law. Facebook provides further
information on this at:
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/policy/?entry_point=data_policy_redirect&entry=0
Steinberg collects and processes the data requested in the "Lead Ads"
form solely for the purposes described in the form, in particular:
Name
E-Mail Address
Legal basis for the processing of your data is Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f)
GDPR. Our legitimate interest in processing this data is based on your
provided Data via the "Lead Ads" form.
How long will the data be
stored?
Facebook stores your data based on your user behaviour. Information
on the storage period can be found in the Facebook Privacy Policy under
"How long do we keep your information".
Steinberg stores your data collected within the "Lead Ads" form for
as long as it is required for the described marketing purposes. After
that, your data will be deleted immediately, provided there are no legal
retention periods requiring otherwise.
Who is the data transferred
to?
Steinberg has no control over with whom Facebook shares your data
with, and whether Facebook also processes personal data in third
countries, for example whether data is transferred to Facebook Inc. in
the USA.
Your Rights
The GDPR grants various rights to those affected by the processing of
personal data, which we will explain to you below. You have the
right:
to request access to information about whether we process your
personal data and, if so, which data is processed by us in accordance
with Art. 15 GDPR;
to demand the rectification of your incorrect personal data and
the completion of any personal data stored by us in accordance with 16
GDPR;
to demand the deletion of personal data concerning you without
undue delay in accordance with Art. 17 GDPR;
to request the restriction of your personal data in accordance
with Art. 18 GDPR;
to receive the personal data, that you have provided to us, in a
structured, commonly used and machine-readable format or to request its
transmission to another controller in accordance with Art. 20
GDPR;
to object under certain conditions to the processing of your
personal data on the basis of Art. 6 para. 1 lit. e GDPR (in the public
interest) or Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f GDPR (to safeguard a legitimate
interest), or to object to processing for direct marketing purposes in
accordance with Art. 21 GDPR;
in accordance with Art. 7 para. 3 GDPR, to revoke your consent at
any time. In consequence, we will no longer continue to process your
personal data. This does not affect the lawfulness of the processing
carried out on the basis of the consent until the revocation;
to submit a complaint to a supervisory authority in accordance
with Art. 77 GDPR.
In order to exercise the aforementioned statutory rights of data
subjects and for all other questions regarding data processing, please
contact Steinberg Media Technologies GmbH using the above-mentioned
address or send an email to
privacy@steinberg.de
.
Go to top
Sub-policy 1
http://www.google.com/intl/de/analytics/privacyoverview.html:
marketingplatform.google.com uses cookies from Google to deliver and enhance the quality of its services and to analyze traffic.
Learn more
.
OK, got it
Google is committed to advancing racial equity for Black communities.
See how.
Faster, smarter marketing
Introducing Google Marketing Platform, a unified advertising and analytics platform for smarter marketing and better results.
Sign in to Google Marketing Platform
Sign in to Google Marketing Platform
Easy-to-use tools for small businesses
Get free tools to make the most of your marketing, from site and app analytics to intuitive testing and more.
See small-business solutions
Advanced solutions for large enterprises
Make deeper customer connections to drive better marketing results with a complete set of advertising and analytics solutions.
See enterprise solutions
Our Adidas teams
work together in one environment
where we can see audience insights, what creative we’re running and where, how it’s performing, and make changes almost in real time.
Chris Murphy
,
          Head of Digital Experience,
              Adidas
GMP_Logo_analytics
Analytics
Understand your customers so you can deliver better experiences.
Learn more about Analytics
Analytics
Understand your customers so you can deliver better experiences.
Tag Manager
Manage all your tags without editing code.
Campaign Manager 360
Get a complete view of all your digital media campaigns.
Display & Video 360
Reach today’s always-connected audiences wherever they are.
Search Ads 360
Get real-time data and unified insights for your search campaigns.
1
Bain report: How top brands grow with timely customer connections.
New research from Bain shows how leading marketers are using platform integrations and technology to boost customer engagement by delivering more relevant experiences in the moment.
Read more
Case Study
Deckers Brands drives business growth with Google Marketing Platform and Google Cloud
Read more
Feature Brief
Control how data is used in Google Analytics
Read more
Guide
Meeting the data challenge with Google Marketing Platform and Google Cloud
Read more
1
See all resources
Let’s partner up.
Whether you’re looking for help with a single project or a bigger, long-term partnership, Google Marketing Platform Partners have the resources and expertise you need to help you achieve more with your marketing.
Find a partner
Help when you need it.
We’re here to support you every step of the way, whether you use a single product or the entire Google Marketing Platform.
Get support
Sub-policy 2
https://www.google.de/intl/en/policies/privacy/:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 3
https://www.adobe.com/privacy/policies/adobe-fonts.html:
Adobe Fonts
Last updated: November 05, 2021
The
Adobe Privacy Policy
describes the general privacy practices of
Adobe’s websites and applications
, including Adobe Fonts. More privacy-related information for Adobe Fonts is provided below.
Adobe Fonts is a service that provides you with access to a library of fonts for use in desktop applications and websites.
Adobe Fonts for Adobe applications
What information does the Adobe Fonts service collect when used with Adobe applications?
To provide the Adobe Fonts service within Adobe applications, Adobe may collect information about how fonts are used with those applications, such as the font used, when a document using the font is opened, and when a font is applied to a document. Adobe Fonts does not collect the content of documents using the fonts.
How does Adobe Fonts use the information it collects?
Adobe uses the information collected from Adobe applications to provide the Adobe Fonts service. For example, this information is used to calculate and pay usage royalties to the font foundries whose fonts are used, and to install and uninstall fonts based on their use. We share aggregate reporting with font foundries, but we do not share your personal information with font foundries.
Adobe Fonts for websites
How does the Adobe Fonts service for websites use Cookies?
In providing the Adobe Fonts website (
fonts.adobe.com
), we use
cookies
in accordance with our Privacy Policy. In providing the Adobe Fonts service for websites, we do not set or use cookies in order to serve our fonts.
What information is collected by the Adobe Fonts service for websites?
To provide the Adobe Fonts service for websites, Adobe may collect information about the fonts being served to your website. The information is used for the purposes of billing and compliance, and may include the following:
Fonts served
Web Project ID
Web Project JavaScript version (string)
Web Project type (string "configurable" or "dynamic")
Embed type (whether you are using the JavaScript or CSS embed code)
Account ID (identifies the customer the Web Project is from)
Service providing the fonts (e.g., Adobe Fonts)
Server serving the fonts (e.g., Adobe Fonts servers or Enterprise CDN)
Hostname of page loading the fonts
IP address - while the Fonts service receives IP address so that it knows where to deliver the font, it does not store it
How does the Adobe Fonts service for websites use the information it collects?
Adobe uses the information collected from websites using Adobe Fonts to provision the Adobe Fonts service and diagnose delivery or download problems. This information is also used to pay and fulfill our contracts with the font foundries whose fonts are used. We share aggregate reporting with font foundries and we may confirm to a font foundry that you have a valid license from Adobe, but we do not otherwise share your personal information with font foundries.
Home
Adobe Privacy Center
Policies
Adobe Fonts
Sub-policy 4
https://www.adobe.com/privacy/policy.html:
Adobe Privacy Policy
Last updated: June 18, 2024
The Adobe Privacy Policy describes the privacy practices of Adobe’s Services and Software (as defined in our General
Terms of Use)
and anywhere we display or reference this policy.
If you are a resident of North America, your relationship is with Adobe Inc. (Adobe U.S.) and the laws of California and the United States apply.
If you reside outside of North America, your relationship is with Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited (Adobe Ireland), which is the controller with regard to your personal information collected by Adobe, and the laws of Ireland apply.
Please note that in order to use our Services and Software, you acknowledge that Adobe will transfer your personal information across national borders and to other countries where Adobe and its partners and providers operate, including the United States. The privacy protections and rights of authorities to access your information in these countries may not be equivalent to those in your country. We will only transfer your personal information to these countries where permitted to do so by law and we will take steps intended to ensure that your personal information continues to receive appropriate protections. For more information, please see the section “
Does Adobe transfer my personal information across national borders?
”
If the content or information that you store in Adobe Services and Software contains personal information of other individuals, you must be legally permitted to disclose the personal information to Adobe.
Summary of Key Points
At Adobe we take data privacy seriously. We believe in transparency so you can control your data and make informed choices about how it is used. We are here to support and protect your privacy decisions wherever you use our products and services. Adobe prioritizes your control over the data you store in the cloud in the following ways:
This policy explains when we process personal information for our legitimate interests. You can ask us to stop processing this information.
Learn more about your rights and how you can exercise them.
This policy also explains when we will first get your consent before processing your personal information, including when doing so is required by law.
We use your personal information to enable you to register with Adobe and to provide you with our Services and Software, and other products or services that you request.
We provide interactive features that engage with social media sites, such as Facebook. If you use these features, these sites will send us personal information about you.
We use cookies and other technologies to track the use of our Services and Software. To learn about opportunities to choose not to allow cookies, click
here
. If you are using our website in a browser, this information is also available in our
Cookies Policy
.
There are several places within Adobe’s Services and Software that allow you to post comments, upload pictures, or submit content which will be publicly available where you choose to participate in these activities. We also disclose personal information to other companies in the Adobe family and with advertising and sales partners consistent with your choices. We also disclose information with third parties we engage to process personal information on our behalf or when such sharing is required by law, or in certain other situations.
We transfer your personal information to the US and other countries, which may be outside the country in which you live. We use government-approved contractual clauses such as European Commission approved Standard Contractual Clauses to help protect your personal information.
What does this privacy policy cover?
What information does Adobe collect about me?
How does Adobe use the information it collects about me, and what are the legal bases for these uses?
Does Adobe disclose my personal information to others?
Is my personal information displayed anywhere within Adobe's apps or websites?
Is my personal information secure?
Where does Adobe store my personal information?
Does Adobe transfer my personal information across national borders?
What rights do I have regarding my personal information and how can I exercise these?
What rights do I have in my state?
Withdrawing consent or otherwise objecting to direct marketing
What information is collected by companies using Adobe Experience Cloud solutions?
How long does Adobe retain my information?
Can children use Adobe websites and apps?
Will this privacy policy change?
Who can I contact with questions or concerns?
What does this privacy policy cover?
This privacy policy describes how Adobe (also referred to as "we," "us" or "our") will make use of your information in the context of:
Adobe websites; web-based services such as Behance; and web-based aspects of the Creative Cloud, Document Cloud and Experience Cloud (together referred to as "websites");
Services that display or include a reference to this policy;
Adobe’s marketing, sales, and advertising practices; and
The privacy practices of previously acquired companies, unless otherwise noted here.
Please note that websites and apps provided by some companies acquired by Adobe may operate under their own privacy policies until their privacy practices are integrated with Adobe's privacy practices. For a current list of these companies, click
here
. Additional privacy-related information for certain Adobe Services and Software can be found in the table below:
Adobe® Digital Editions
Acrobat Sign
Adobe Stock
Adobe Fonts
Flash® Player
Adobe Express Local Ambassador Program
Acrobat
Please also see the
Adobe Terms of Use
and any additional Terms of Use or
Product License Agreements
that may apply to the Services and Software you are using.
What information does Adobe collect about me?
Adobe ID, registration, and customer support
When you register to use an Adobe Service, create an Adobe ID, purchase a license to our Services and Software, or contact us for support or other offerings, Adobe collects information that identifies you. This includes:
Identifiers and contact information, such as:
Name;
Email address;
Telephone number;
Postal or Physical Address;
Country;
Commercial and transaction information, such as:
Payment/billing information (where an app or website is 'paid for');
Licenses purchased;
Eligibility information (e.g., student or teacher identification for student and teacher editions of apps);
Content of and information provided through customer support and other communications (e.g., recorded customer and technical support calls and stored content of your correspondence with us via our website, chat features, phone and video calls, emails, and other channels);
Types of Services and Software of interest.
Professional, education or other demographic information, such as:
Date of birth;
Company or school name;
Title;
Occupation;
Job function;
Expertise;
Company details, such as the size, industry, and other information about the company where a user may work (when the user has provided the company name);
Analytics or other electronic network activity, such as:
IP address;
Browser;
Mobile Device ID;
Browser extensions connected to your Adobe accounts.
Inferred Information
To help keep our databases current and to provide you the most relevant content and experiences, we may infer or generate information based on the information we collect or combine information provided by you with information from third party sources, in accordance with applicable law. For example, the size, industry, and other information about the company you work for (where you have provided company name) will be obtained from sources including, professional networking sites and information service providers. We may also infer, generate, or collect and receive information from third parties, including partners, and from publicly accessible sources, for purposes that include to detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraudulent, deceptive or illegal activity, misuse of our Services and Software, security or technical issues, as well as to protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Adobe and our employees, our users, children, or the public.
Adobe Services and Software
We collect information you provide to us (e.g., when you access and use our Services and Software) or permit us to collect (e.g., as part of a third-party integration). We also collect or generate information about how you access and use our Services and Software, including when you use a desktop or mobile app feature that takes you online (such as a photo syncing feature). Depending on the Services and Software you access and use, this information may be associated with your device or browser or it may be associated with your Adobe account or content. It includes:
Analytics or other electronic network activity, such as:
IP address;
Browser and device information, including browser and device type, settings, unique identifiers, version, language settings, and configuration;
Webpage that led you to an Adobe website;
Search terms entered into a search engine which led you to an Adobe website;
Use and navigation of Services and Software, including how you interact with Adobe websites (collected through cookies and similar technologies, or by Adobe servers when you are logged into the app or website);
Analysis of your use and navigation of the Services and Software;
Analysis of your content subject to your opt-out and consent rights.
Professional, Education or other demographic information, such as:
Profile information (e.g., account profile, public profile, Behance profile).
Commercial and transaction information, such as:
Content that includes personal information which is sent or received using an online feature of Adobe Services and Software, or which is stored on Adobe servers, such as documents, photos, videos, activity logs, direct feedback from you, metadata about your content, user generated requests such as search terms, prompts (e.g., text, images, videos, audio, etc.), inquiries, feedback, and other information you may disclose when you access or use our Services and Software as well as any information the Services and Software returns in response to such requests.
Sensitive personal information, such as:
Biometric identifiers or information as defined under US laws (e.g., faceprints and voiceprints from your user Content, as defined in the
Adobe General Terms of Use
) and precise geolocation. Where required by law, we will seek any required permissions from you prior to any such collection. See the "Adobe acting on your behalf" and "How we analyze your content to deliver features requested by you" sections below for more information.
The following links provide further information on:
Adobe product improvement program
;
Usage Data FAQ: Creative Cloud and Document Cloud Apps
Experience Cloud usage information FAQ
;
Adobe Genuine Software
Your
privacy choices
regarding how we use this information;
Adobe products and services licensed by
educational institutions
;
How Adobe uses
cookies and similar technologies
; and
How Adobe
analyzes your content
using techniques such as machine learning in order to improve our Services and Software, and how to
opt out
of this.
Adobe Software activation and automatic updates
When you activate your Adobe Software or when you install updates to the Software, we collect analytics or other electronic network activity information, such as: your device (manufacturer, model, IP address);
the Adobe Software (version, date of activation, successful and unsuccessful updates);
your product serial number (e.g., where this is required before you can start using your product).
You can learn more about app activation
here
.
Adobe emails
Emails we send you may include a technology (called a
web beacon
) that collects Analytics or other electronic network activity, such as whether you have received or opened the email, or clicked a link in the email. If you do not want us to collect this information, you can
opt out of receiving Adobe marketing emails
.
Adobe online advertising
Adobe advertises online in a variety of ways, including displaying Adobe ads to you on other companies' websites and apps and on social media platforms, such as Facebook and LinkedIn. Adobe websites use cookies, pixels, and similar technologies provided by our own company (
Adobe Experience Cloud
) and other companies that allow us to gather additional information to measure and improve the effectiveness of our advertising. We collect Analytics or other electronic network activity information such as:
Which ads are displayed;
Which ads are clicked on; and
Where the ad was displayed.
Learn more about
Adobe’s advertising practices
.
Buttons, tools, and content from other companies
Adobe Services and Software may include buttons, tools, or content that link to other companies’ services (for example, a Facebook "Like" button). We may collect information about your use of these features, such as content “liked” and address information in Google Maps. In addition, when you see or interact with these buttons, tools, or content, or view an Adobe web page or app containing them, some information from your browser may automatically be sent to the other company. Please read that company’s privacy policy for more information.
Adobe websites may implement Google reCAPTCHA Enterprise to help prevent spam and abuse. reCAPTCHA Enterprise collects hardware and software information, such as device and application data, and sends it to Google for purposes of providing, maintaining, and improving reCAPTCHA Enterprise and for general security purposes. Your use of reCAPTCHA Enterprise is subject to Google’s
Privacy Policy
and
Terms of Use
.
Adobe social networking pages and social sign-on services
You can sign into some Adobe Services and Software using a social networking account, such as a Facebook account. Where you give appropriate permissions, we will receive contact and identifier information about you from your social networking account, such as name, country, and basic demographic information.
Adobe has its own pages on many social networking sites (for example, the Adobe® Photoshop® team’s Facebook page). We will collect information which you have made publicly available on your social networking account, such as name and interests in our products and services, when you interact with our social networking pages. The social networking sites may provide statistics and insights to Adobe which help us understand the types of actions that people take on our pages. Where applicable, Adobe and the social media site(s) have entered into an arrangement which determines our respective responsibilities.
You can learn more about Adobe’s practices with respect to social networking pages and account sign-on services
here
.
Adobe acting on your behalf
In certain instances, Adobe is acting only on your behalf for personal information collected and processed by our services (for example, for the address book contacts shared by users when entering recipient information). In such cases, Adobe is acting only on your instructions in order to facilitate the Service requested by you, and you will be responsible for the information shared. In these instances, we will inform you through in-app notifications or other in-time communications. If you submit any information relating to other people to us or to our service providers in connection with your use of Adobe apps or websites, you represent that you have the authority to do so and to permit us to use the information in accordance with this policy.
How we process your content to deliver features requested by you
Adobe offers certain features that let you edit and organize your photographs, videos, and other types of content using characteristics like face and voice (e.g., you can group similar faces, places, and image characteristics within your collection), and such characteristics may be considered biometric identifiers or biometric information under certain US laws or other applicable privacy laws. When you choose to use these features, Adobe is acting only on your instructions in order to facilitate the service requested by you. These features are off by default and, should you choose to enable them, you can always disable these features. Where we process biometric identifiers or biometric information to deliver a feature requested by you, we delete this information once you turn off the feature, unless otherwise specified in the Software or Services.
Visiting our Physical Offices
When you visit an Adobe office, we will collect Identifiers and Contact information such as your name, company name, and email address; and Audio, electronic, visual, or similar information including facial images and voice information such as from CCTV video or voice recordings and photos.
How does Adobe use the information it collects about you, and what are the legal bases for these uses?
Adobe uses the information we collect about you for the following purposes:
To fulfill a contract, or take steps linked to a contract: this is relevant where you register to use an Adobe app or website (whether paid, or as a free trial). This includes:
Providing you with the Adobe Services and Software for which you have registered, and any other services or products that you have requested;
Administering product or platform skill/knowledge courses and other content, including testing and certifications (as applicable);
Verifying your identity;
Processing payments;
Sending you necessary communications (for example, related to payments or expiration of your subscription); and
Providing customer service or support.
As required by Adobe to conduct our business and pursue our legitimate interests:
Analyzing your
content
and its characteristics using automated techniques, in the following circumstances:
Operational Use
. Our Services and Software will access your content stored locally on your device (“Local Content”) and content that you have uploaded to our servers or create using our cloud-based Services (“
Cloud Content
”), to enable the normal running of the Services and Software.
Content Analytics with Cloud Content
. Subject to your opt-out rights, including those described
here
, we may perform analytics with Cloud Content to help us understand how our users are using our Services and Software to allow us to improve your Services and Software experience, provide recommendations to you, and customize your experience. Insights from Content Analytics may be used to inform our marketing to you, subject to your opt-out rights regarding our marketing.
Analyzing your
content
and its characteristics using automated techniques or with human review, in the following circumstances:
Illegal and Abusive Cloud Content
. Cloud Content may be automatically scanned to ensure we are not hosting illegal or abusive content, like Child Sexual Abuse Material. Human review may occur when your Cloud Content is flagged or reported as illegal or abusive.
Public and Shared Cloud Content
. All public and shared Cloud Content is subject to review for intellectual property issues and safety issues (for example, violence and nudity). If you choose to share your Cloud Content with others using our Software and Services, we may automatically review this shared Cloud Content to flag abusive behavior (such as spam or phishing). When you make your Cloud Content publicly available, additional human review may occur.
Providing you with the Adobe Services and Software for which you have registered and any other products and services you have requested;
Analyzing your use and measuring effectiveness of our Services and Software, including recordings, to better understand how they are being used so we can improve them and engage and retain users;
Sending you information about Adobe products and services, special offers and similar information, and sharing your information with third parties for their own marketing purposes, where your consent is not required;
Analyzing your use and navigation of our Services and Software, your profile information, your interaction with our communications (excluding your content), to:
Detect and prevent fraudulent, deceptive, or, illegal activity, or misuse of our Services and Software;
Improve our Services and Software, and the user experience, subject to your opt-out and consent rights, including those described here; and
Tailor and customize the Services and Software through marketing communications (
learn more
)
Diagnosing problems in our Services and Software;
Conducting surveys and market research about our customers, their interests, the effectiveness of our marketing campaigns, and customer satisfaction (unless we need consent to undertake such surveys, in which case we will only do this with your permission);
Investigating and responding to any comments or complaints that you may send us;
Checking the validity of the sort code, account number and card number you submit if you use a credit or debit card for payment, in order to prevent payment fraud or other illegal or deceptive payment practices (we use third parties for this – see “Does Adobe disclose my personal information to others?” below);
Sharing account information registered under a business email address with employers for account migration purposes;
Combining with other data we may have about how you interacted with our products and services when logged out or logged in, in order to provide a more seamless experience, show you the most relevant content and services, and for marketing purposes, with your consent where required;
If we merge with or are acquired by another company, sell an Adobe website, app, or business unit, or if all or a substantial portion of our assets are acquired by another company, your information will likely be disclosed to the prospective purchaser, our advisers and any other prospective purchaser's advisers and will be one of the assets that is transferred to the new owner; and
In connection with legal claims, compliance, regulatory and investigative purposes as necessary (including disclosure of information in connection with government agency requests, legal process or litigation).
Where we process your information based on legitimate interests, you can object to this processing in certain circumstances. In such cases, we will cease processing information unless we have compelling legitimate grounds to continue processing or where it is needed for legal reasons.
If legitimate interest is not an available legal basis in a particular jurisdiction, we will engage in the processing activities described above on a legal basis that is available in that particular jurisdiction.
Where required,
when you give Adobe your consent
or otherwise consistent with your choices:
Sending you information about Adobe products and services, special offers and similar information, and sharing your information with third parties for their own marketing purposes;
Placing cookies and using similar technologies in our Services and Software and in email communications, in accordance with our
Cookies Policy
and the information provided to you when those technologies are used;
Accessing information stored on your device for the following operational uses:
Information relating to your use of, and engagement with, Services and Software related to crash reports in order to fix the underlying problem causing the crash;
Information which you allow us to receive through device-based settings (e.g., photos, location and camera) in order to provide certain functionality within our Services and Software;
Analyzing your use and navigation of the Services and Software or your content and its characteristics using automated techniques or human review in order to:
Detect and prevent fraudulent, deceptive, or illegal activity or misuse of the Services and Software;
Improve our services and the user experience, such as through the Adobe Product Improvement Program as described
here
; and
Respond to your request (e.g., customer service).
Allowing you to participate in sweepstakes, contests, and similar promotions and to administer these activities.
On other occasions where we ask you for consent, we will use the information for the purposes which we explain at that time. Where we rely on consent to process information, you can withdraw your consent to such activities at any time.
For legal reasons:
Responding to requests by government or law enforcement authorities conducting an investigation.
Using or disclosing information as reasonably necessary to detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, potential deceptive or illegal activities, misuse of Services and Software, or technical issues and software piracy (e.g., to confirm that software is genuine and properly licensed), helping to protect you as well as Adobe.
Where this processing and these disclosures are not strictly required by law, Adobe may rely on its legitimate interests, where available, and those of third parties described above.
Does Adobe disclose my personal information to others?
Disclosing to other Data Controllers
We will disclose your personal information within the Adobe family of companies for the purposes identified above (see a list of
Adobe entities
and our
acquired companies
).
We will also disclose your personal information with other third-party data controllers with your consent (where necessary) or to provide any product or service you have requested (e.g., third-party integrations). The types of third parties your information may be disclosed to include: our resellers and other sales and advertising partners, retailers, advertisers, ad agencies, advertising networks and platforms, information service providers, fraud monitoring and prevention providers, and publishers. In some cases, in order to show you more relevant ads, we disclose with social media platforms and other advertising partners, information about actions you take on our websites and apps, such as which pages you visit and which ads you saw. These parties may be joint controllers for this processing. More information is available
here
.
Third-party data controllers may also use Adobe products and services to collect and process your personal information. If you are using an email address that is associated with a business domain (e.g.,
yourname@businessname.com
) to access Adobe's Services and Software, or if you were invited to use the Services and Software by a business, we may provide your personal information to that business.
Disclosing for Fraud Prevention, Safety and Security Purposes
We will disclose personal information to companies that help us run our business to detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, deception, illegal activity, misuse of Adobe Services and Software, and security or technical issues.
Additionally, we will disclose personal information to companies, organizations, government authorities, or individuals outside of Adobe if we have a good-faith belief that access, use, preservation or disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to detect, prevent, or protect against such fraudulent, deceptive, or illegal activity, misuse of our Services and Software, or security or technical issues, or where it is reasonably necessary to protect from harm the rights, property or safety of Adobe and our employees, our users, children, or the public as required or permitted by law.
Disclosing to Data Processors
We will also disclose your personal information to companies that help us run our business by processing personal information on behalf of Adobe for the purposes identified above. Such companies (including those that may record or store communications) include providers of customer support services, chatbots, session replay partners who provide services which recreate a web or app session showing meaningful insight into a visitor’s experience, providers of analytics technologies that record and analyze your interaction with our websites to help us improve your experience, providers of artificial intelligence technologies that record and analyze your content or communications, payment processing services, fraud monitoring and prevention, detecting and preventing deceptive or illegal activity or misuse of our Services and Software, email, social media, and other marketing platforms and service providers, and hosting services. We require these companies to protect your personal information consistent with this Privacy Policy.
Other Information Disclosure
Adobe may also disclose your personal information:
When you agree to the disclosure;
When we have a good faith belief that we are required to provide information in response to a subpoena, court order, or other applicable law or legal process (
learn more
), or to respond to an emergency involving the danger of death or serious bodily harm;
If we merge with or are acquired by another company, sell an Adobe website, app, or business unit, or if all or a substantial portion of our assets are acquired by another company, your information will likely be disclosed to the prospective purchaser, our advisers and any prospective purchaser's advisers and will be one of the assets that is transferred to the new owner.
We may disclose or publish aggregate information that doesn’t specifically identify you, such as statistical information about visitors to our websites or statistical information about how customers
use the Adobe Experience Cloud
.
Is my personal information displayed anywhere on Adobe’s websites or applications?
There are several places within Adobe’s Services and Software that allow you to post comments, upload pictures, participate in message boards or chats, engage with blogs, share technical information, or submit other content for others to see. Sometimes you can limit who can see what you share, but there are some places where what you share can be seen by the general public or other users of the service. Such information can appear in search engine results or through other publicly available platforms and can be “crawled” or searched by third parties. For example, when users post content on message boards, online chats, blogs, and Community Forums, the information posted by the user will become public. Some online content may remain accessible publicly even after Adobe fulfils a request to delete the poster’s personal information.
Please be careful when you share your personal information. Do not share anything you wouldn’t want publicly known unless you are sure you are posting it within an app or website that allows you to control who sees what you post. Please note that when you post messages on certain user forums on our websites and app, your email address or name and/or profile photo may be included and displayed with your message. You can find more information about managing your public profile
here
. To remove content you have shared on our Services and Software, please use the same feature you used to share the content. If another user invites you to participate in shared viewing, editing, or commenting of content, you may be able to delete your contributions, but usually the user who invited you has full control. If you have questions or concerns about this, please
contact us
.
Is my personal information secure?
We work hard to protect your personal information. We employ administrative, technical, and physical security controls where appropriate, such as encryption, 2-step verification, and appropriate contractual confidentiality obligations for employees and contractors.
Where does Adobe store my personal information?
Your personal information and files are stored on Adobe’s servers and the servers of companies we engage to provide services to us.
Does Adobe transfer my personal information across national borders?
The main locations where we process your personal information are the US and India, but we also transfer personal information to all other countries in which Adobe or its affiliates, providers, and partners operate. We carry out these transfers in compliance with applicable laws – for example, by putting data transfer agreements in place to help protect your personal information.
If you reside outside of North America, your relationship is with Adobe Ireland. Where Adobe Ireland transfers your personal information to a country which is not within the EEA and is not subject to an adequacy decision by the EU Commission, we rely on one or more of the following legal mechanisms: European Commission approved Standard Contractual Clauses and/or your consent in certain circumstances. A copy of the relevant mechanism can be provided for your review upon request, using the contact details provided at the end of this Privacy Policy. For more information about how Adobe Ireland transfers European personal information, please see
Cross-border data transfers.
Adobe and its U.S. subsidiaries Marketo Inc, Magento (X-commerce, Inc) and Workfront Inc. comply with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Adobe has also certified to the US Department of Commerce that it adheres to EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF (as does its U.S. subsidiaries Marketo Inc, Magento (X-commerce, Inc) and Workfront Inc.). Adobe has also certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF (as does its U.S. subsidiaries Marketo Inc, Magento (X-commerce, Inc) and Workfront Inc.). If there is any conflict between the terms in this policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. Adobe’s commitments under the Data Privacy Framework are subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the United States Federal Trade Commission. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/
.
As set out above Adobe uses a limited number of third-party service providers to assist us in providing our services to our users and business customers. These third parties may access, process, or store personal data in the course of providing their services. Adobe maintains contracts with these third parties restricting their access, use and disclosure of personal data in compliance with our Data Privacy Framework obligations, including the onward transfer provisions, and Adobe remains liable if they fail to meet those obligations and Adobe is responsible for the event giving rise to the damage).
The information above applies to Adobe users who are consumers. More information is available for our business customers that want to learn more about
Cross-border data transfers
.
What rights do I have regarding my personal information and how can I exercise these rights?
When provided for by applicable law, you have the right to ask us for a copy of your personal information; to correct, delete or restrict (stop any active) processing of your personal information; and to obtain the personal information you provide to us for a contract or with your consent in a structured, machine readable format, and to ask us to share (port) this information to another controller. You may be entitled to additional rights based on applicable data privacy laws in your jurisdiction.
In addition, you can object to the processing of your personal information in some circumstances (such as where we are using the information for direct marketing).
These rights may be limited, for example, if fulfilling your request would reveal personal information about another person, or if you ask us to delete information which we are required by law to keep or which we need to defend claims against us. In addition, Adobe websites recognize the Global Privacy Control available in some web browsers. If your browser is configured to send this signal, Adobe will opt you out of Adobe’s use of advertising cookies on that browser. You can learn more about Adobe’s
advertising practices
and your privacy choices
here
.
To exercise any of these rights (including deactivating your Adobe ID account), you can get in touch with us – or our data protection officer – using the details set out below. Additionally, many of our Services and Software allow you to edit your personal information by accessing the "
my account
," "my profile," or a similar feature of the service you are using. Likewise, you can delete files or photos you have stored in our Services and Software by logging in and using the deletion functions that are available.
If you have unresolved concerns, you have the right to report them to your local privacy regulator or data protection authority and, where applicable, you also have the right to lodge a complaint with Adobe Ireland's lead supervisory authority, the Irish Data Protection Commission.
When you are asked to provide personal information, you may decline. And you may use web browser or operating system controls to prevent certain types of automatic data collection. But if you choose not to provide or allow information that is necessary for certain services or features, those services or features may not be available or fully functional. For example, to register with Adobe, to create an Adobe ID, and to use some Adobe Services and Software, the provision of some information is mandatory: if relevant information is not provided, then we will not be able to administer an Adobe account to you, or provide you with the Services and Software requested. Other optional information, if not provided, may impact our ability to provide a personalized experience or tailored content or offerings.
What rights do I have in my state?
In addition to the rights above, see
Additional US State Privacy Rights
for more information.
Withdrawing consent or otherwise objecting to direct marketing
The Adobe family of companies (see list of
Adobe entities
and our
acquired companies
) and companies we hire to help market our Services and Software on our behalf may use your information to provide you with information and offers related to Adobe.
Where we rely on your consent, you will always be able to withdraw that consent, although we may have other legal grounds for processing your information for other purposes, such as those set out above. In some cases, we are able to send you direct marketing without your consent, where we rely on our legitimate interests. You have an absolute right to opt-out of direct marketing, or profiling we carry out for direct marketing, at any time by:
updating your preferences in your Adobe ID profile;
updating your preferences in your specific website or app accounts;
clicking the unsubscribe link at the bottom of our marketing emails; or
contacting us using the details provided at the end of this privacy policy.
Click
here
for further information on your choices regarding our marketing practices.
What information is collected by companies using Adobe Experience Cloud solutions?
Adobe Experience Cloud solutions help our business customers personalize and improve the performance of their websites, apps, and marketing messages. For example, these customers may use Adobe Experience Cloud solutions to collect and analyze information about how individuals use their websites (
learn more
). The information collected is stored in our services on behalf of and for use by these business customers.
How long does Adobe retain my information?
When you register for an account and create an Adobe ID, we process and keep most personal information we process on your behalf for as long as you are an active user of our Services and Software. We delete certain personal information we collect about you when we no longer have a business reason to retain it. Additionally, there is some personal information we need to retain even after you close your account to comply with business and legal requirements, such as personal information related to our contract and business transactions with you, which we retain for ten years after your last interaction with us.
Where we process personal information for marketing purposes or with your consent, we process the information until you ask us to stop and for a short period after this (to allow us to implement your requests). We also keep a permanent record of the fact that you have asked us not to send you direct marketing or to process your information so that we can respect your request in the future.
Can children use Adobe websites and apps?
Adobe Services and Software are not intended for children under the age of 13, except in limited situations where certain products, including Adobe Express and Creative Cloud All Apps, may be available to children for educational purposes under the direct supervision of a teacher. In these circumstances, Adobe is authorized to collect student data by the participating school, which has obtained appropriate consent, if needed.
Adobe’s Direct COPPA Notice
provides more information about the collection and use of student data.
All other Adobe Services and Software are not intended for use by children and certain products specifically prohibit users who are under a certain age. If you do not meet applicable age requirements, please do not use those Services and Software. If you are age 13 or over and meet applicable age requirements to use certain Services and Software, Adobe makes available
Privacy for Younger Users
page to provide information about our privacy practices in an age-appropriate format.
Will this privacy policy change?
Occasionally, we may update this privacy policy (or other documents in the Adobe Privacy Center) to allow Adobe to accommodate new technologies, industry practices, regulatory requirements or for other purposes. If we do, we will change the "last updated" date at the top of this policy and the revised policy will be posted to this page so that you are aware of the information we collect, how we use it, and under what circumstances we may disclose it. We encourage you to periodically review the
Adobe Privacy Center
for the latest information on our privacy practices. Under certain circumstances (for example with certain material changes or where it is required by applicable privacy laws) we will provide notice to you of these changes and, where required by applicable law, we will obtain your consent. Notice may be by email to you, by posting a notice of such changes on our Services and Software, or by other means consistent with applicable law.
Who can I contact with questions or concerns?
If you have a privacy question, concern, or request, please fill out a
privacy inquiry form
.
If you are outside North America, you can also get in touch with Adobe Ireland's data protection officer at
DPO@Adobe.com
or by postal mail at 4-6 Riverwalk, Citywest Business Park, Dublin 24, Ireland.
For practices that are covered by our
PRP Certification
, if you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
If you believe Adobe maintains your personal data in one of the services within the scope of our Data Privacy Framework certification, you may direct any inquiries or complaints concerning our Data Privacy Framework compliance by filling in our privacy inquiry form. If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://www.ana.net/content/show/id/accountability-dpf-consumers
. If neither Adobe nor our dispute resolution provider resolves your complaint, you may have the possibility to engage in binding arbitration through the Data Privacy Framework Panel. For more information on this option, please see Annex I of the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles.
https://main--cc--adobecom.hlx.page/cc-shared/assets/img/logos/svg/trust-seal.svg | Truste logo
Home
Adobe Privacy Center
Adobe Privacy Policy
Sub-policy 5
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy:
Privacy Center home
Search
Privacy topics
More privacy resources
Privacy Policy
What is the Privacy Policy and what does it cover?
What information do we collect?
How do we use your information?
How is your information shared on Meta Products or with integrated partners?
How do we share information with third parties?
How do the Meta Companies work together?
What is our legal basis for processing your information, and what are your rights?
How long do we keep your information?
How do we transfer information?
How do we respond to legal requests, comply with applicable law and prevent harm?
How will you know the Policy has changed?
How to contact Meta with questions
Legal basis information
Other policies and articles
Settings
Privacy Policy
How we use info for AI at Meta
Based on feedback from regulators, we’re still delaying our plans to use your information from Meta Products to develop and improve
AI at Meta
. We’ll let you know before we start using this information for this purpose, and how you can exercise your right to object.
Other updates
We're updating our Privacy Policy. The updates go into effect on April 7, 2025.
Read the new policy.
What is the Privacy Policy and what does it cover?
Effective November 14, 2024 |
View printable version
|
See previous versions
Highlights
We at Meta want you to understand what information we collect, and how we use and share it. That’s why we encourage you to read our Privacy Policy. This helps you use
Meta Products
in the way that’s right for you.
In the Privacy Policy, we explain how we collect, use, share, retain and transfer information. We also let you know your rights. Each section of this Policy includes helpful examples and simpler language to make our practices easier to understand. We’ve also added links to resources where you can learn more about the privacy topics that interest you.
It's important to us that you know how to control your privacy, so we also show you where you can manage your information in the settings of the Meta Products you use. You can
update these settings
to shape your experience.
Read the full Policy below.
What Products does this Policy cover?
Learn more in Privacy Center about managing your privacy
What information do we collect?
Highlights
The information we collect and process about you depends on how you use our
Products
. For example, we collect different information if you sell furniture on Marketplace than if you post a reel on Instagram. When you use our Products, we collect some information about you
even if you don't have an account
.
Here's the information we collect:
Your activity and information you provide
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
Information from partners, vendors and other third parties
What if you don’t let us collect certain information?
Some information is required for our Products to work. Other information is optional, but without it, the quality of your experience might be affected.
Learn more
What if the information we collect doesn’t identify individuals?
In some cases information is de-identified, aggregated, or anonymized by third parties so that it no longer identifies individuals before it’s made available to us. We use this information as described below without trying to re-identify individuals.
Take control
Manage the information we collect about you
Privacy Center
How do we use your information?
Highlights
We use
information we collect
to provide a personalized experience to you, including ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products), along with the other purposes we explain in detail below.
For some of these purposes, we use information
across our Products
from the accounts you choose to add to your Accounts Center, and
across your devices
. The information we use for these purposes is automatically processed by our systems. But in some cases, we also use
manual review
to access and review your information.
To use less information that’s connected to individual users, in some cases we de-identify or aggregate information or anonymize it so that it no longer identifies you. We use this information in the same ways we use your information as described in this section.
Here are the ways we use your information:
To provide, personalize and improve our Products
We use information we have to provide and improve our
Products
. This includes personalizing features, content and
recommendations
, such as your
Facebook Feed
,
Instagram Feed
, Stories and ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products). We use
information with special protections
you choose to provide for these purposes, but not to show you ads.
Read more about how we use information to provide, personalize and improve our Products:
How we show ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products)
How we use information to improve our Products
How we use location-related information
To promote safety, security and integrity
We use information we collect to help protect people from harm and provide safe, secure Products.
Learn more
To provide measurement, analytics and business services
Lots of people rely on our Products to run or promote their businesses or share content. We help them measure how well their ads and other content, products and services are working.
Learn more
To communicate with you
We communicate with you using information you've given us, like contact information you've entered on your profile.
Learn more
To research and innovate for social good
We use information we have, information from researchers and datasets from publicly available sources, professional groups and non-profit groups to conduct and support research.
Learn more
How is your information shared on Meta Products or with integrated partners?
Highlights
On Meta Products
Learn more about the different cases when your information can be shared on our
Products
:
People and accounts you share and communicate with
Content others share or reshare about you
Public content
With integrated partners
You can choose to connect with
integrated partners
who use our Products. If you do, these integrated partners receive information about you and your activity.
These integrated partners can always access information that’s public on our Products. Learn more about other information they receive and how they handle your information:
When you use an integrated partner’s product or service
When you interact with someone else’s content on an integrated partner’s product or service
How integrated partners handle your information
Take control
Learn more about audiences
Privacy Center
Manage apps and websites
How do we share information with third parties?
Highlights
We don't sell any of your information to anyone, and we never will. We also require
partners
and other
third parties
to follow rules about how they can and cannot use and disclose the information we provide.
Here’s more detail about who we share information with:
Partners
Advertisers and Audience Network publishers (if we show you ads on Meta Products)
Partners who use our analytics services
Partners who offer goods or services on our Products and commerce services platforms
Integrated partners
Vendors
Measurement vendors
Marketing vendors
Service providers
Service providers
Third parties
External researchers
AI integrations
Other third parties
We also share information with other
third parties
in response to legal requests, to comply with applicable law or to prevent harm.
Read the Policy
.
And if we sell or transfer all or part of our business to someone else, in some cases we’ll give the new owner your information as part of that transaction, but only as the law allows.
How do the Meta Companies work together?
Highlights
We are part of the
Meta Companies
that provide Meta Company Products.
Meta Company Products
include all the
Meta Products
covered by this Policy, plus other products like WhatsApp and more.
We share information we collect, infrastructure, systems and technology with the other Meta Companies.
Learn more
about how we transfer information to other countries.
We also process information that we receive about you from other Meta Companies, according to their terms and policies and as permitted by applicable law. In some cases, Meta acts as a
service provider
for other Meta Companies. We act on their behalf and in accordance with their instructions and terms.
Why we share across the Meta Companies
Meta Products share information with other Meta Companies:
To promote safety, security and integrity and comply with applicable laws
To provide optional features and integrations
To understand how people use and interact with Meta Company Products
See some examples
of why we share.
More resources
Review the privacy policies of the other Meta Companies
Facebook Help Center
What is our legal basis for processing your information, and what are your rights?
Highlights
Under applicable data protection law, companies must have a legal basis to process personal data. When we talk about "processing personal data," we mean the ways we collect, use and share your information, as we described in the other sections of this Policy above.
What is our legal basis?
You have the following rights under GDPR and other relevant data protection laws:
Access and correct information
Withdraw consent
Port your information
Download your information
Erase information
Object
Make a complaint
How long do we keep your information?
Highlights
We keep information as long as we need it to provide our Products, comply with legal obligations or protect our or other’s interests. We decide how long we need information on a case-by-case basis. Here’s what we consider when we decide:
If we need it to operate or provide our Products. For example, we need to keep some of your information to maintain your account.
Learn more
.
The feature we use it for, and how that feature works. For example, messages sent using Messenger’s vanish mode are retained for less time than regular messages.
Learn more
.
How long we need to retain the information to comply with certain legal obligations.
See some examples
.
If we need it for other legitimate purposes, such as to prevent harm; investigate possible violations of our terms or policies; promote safety, security and integrity; or protect ourselves, including our rights, property or products
In some instances and for specific reasons, we’ll keep information for an extended period of time.
Read our Policy
about when we may preserve your information.
How do we transfer information?
Highlights
Why is information transferred to other countries?
Where is information transferred?
How do we safeguard your information?
How do we respond to legal requests, comply with applicable law and prevent harm?
Highlights
We access, preserve, use and share your information:
In response to legal requests, like search warrants, court orders, production orders or subpoenas. These requests come from
third parties
such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
Learn more
about when we respond to legal requests.
In accordance with applicable law
To promote the safety, security and integrity of
Meta Products
, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
.
We may access or preserve your information for an extended amount of time.
Learn more
.
How will you know the Policy has changed?
We'll notify you before we make material changes to this Policy. You’ll have the opportunity to review the revised Policy before you choose to continue using our Products.
How to contact Meta with questions
You can learn more about how privacy works on
Facebook
and on
Instagram
, and in the
Facebook Help Center
. If you have questions about this Policy, or have questions, complaints or requests regarding your information, you can contact us as described below.
The data controller responsible for your information is Meta Platforms Ireland Limited, which you can
contact online
, or by mail at:
Meta Platforms Ireland Limited
ATTN: Privacy Operations
Merrion Road
Dublin 4
D04 X2K5, Ireland
Contact the Data Protection Officer
for Meta Platforms Ireland Limited.
You also have the right to lodge a complaint with Meta Platforms Ireland's lead supervisory authority, the Irish Data Protection Commission, or your local supervisory authority.
Legal basis information
Consent
We process information as described below when you have given us your consent to do so, which we may ask through in-product experiences, to enable particular features, or to enable device-based settings. The categories of information we use and why and how they are processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Processing information with special protections that you provide so we can share it with those you choose, to provide, personalise and improve our Products and to undertake analytics.  We’ll collect, store, publish and apply automated, or sometimes manual, processing for these purposes.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Any information with special protections that you choose to provide, such as your religious views, your sexual orientation, political views, health, racial or ethnic origin, philosophical beliefs or trade union membership, or as part of surveys you choose to participate in, and where you have given your explicit consent
Personalizing ads on the Meta Products:
If we show you ads on Meta Products, including Meta Audience Network, depending on your
settings
, we will use your information across the account(s) in your Accounts Centre to show you ads, including using cookies, to personalize your ads and measure how those ads perform.
If we show you ads on Meta Products, our ads system automatically processes information that we've collected and stored associated with you. In accordance with your Ad settings, our ads system uses this information to understand your interests and your preferences and personalize your ads across the Meta Products.
Learn more
about your Ad settings.
Our ads system prioritizes what ad to show you based on what audience advertisers want to reach. Then we match the ad to people who might be interested.
Learn more
about how our ads system works.
Learn more
about how we choose the ads that you see.
You can change your choice at any time in your “Ad Preferences”.
Your activity and information that you provide
:
Content that you create, such as posts, comments or audio
Content that you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content, including ads, that you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features that you use and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions that you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you're doing on your device, such as whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users'
Device signals
Information that you've shared through your device settings (e.g. GPS location)
Information about the network that you connect your device to
Location-related  information
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Using information from partners, vendors and other third parties to tailor the ads you see: If we show you ads on Meta Products, with your consent we’ll use information that partners, vendors and other third parties provide us about activity off the Meta Products and that we have associated with you to personalize ads that we show you on the Meta Products, and on websites, apps and devices that use our advertising services. We receive this information whether or not you’re logged in or have an account on our Products, see the
Cookies Policy
for more information.
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Sharing your contact, profile or other information with third parties upon your request when you use some of our Products. For example, when you direct us we share your email address or other information that you might choose to share with an advertiser so that they can contact you with additional information about a promoted product. The type of third party and categories of information shared depend on the circumstances of what you ask us to share.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like your contact, profile or other information, like posts or comments
Collecting information that you allow us to receive through the device-based settings you enable (such as access to your GPS location, camera or photos) which we use to provide the features or services described when you enable the setting.
App, browser and device information
:
Information from device settings
Verifying your identity or account, or helping to protect against suspicious activity including impersonation and identity misuse, using face analysis which may include facial recognition technology if you select it.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Your account information, profile photo, or
your photo or video selfie, if you choose to provide it
When we process information that you provide to us based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal. You also have the right to port that information you provide to us based on your consent. To exercise your rights, visit your device-based settings, and visit the Facebook settings and Instagram settings and our Help Centers.
Performance of a contract
For all people who have the legal capacity to enter into an enforceable contract (for example, by being the age of majority or above in their country of residence), we process information as necessary to conclude and perform our contracts with you (the
Meta Terms
and
Instagram Terms
, the
Supplemental Meta Platforms Technologies Terms of Service
, the
Supplemental Portal Terms of Service
, the
Meta AI Terms of Service
and the
Supplemental Meta View Terms of Service
, together, the “terms"). The purposes for which we process information for our contracts, the categories of information we use and how information is processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Personalising the Meta Products (other than ads): Our systems automatically process information we have collected and stored associated with you and others to assess and understand your interests and your preferences and provide you personalised experiences across the Meta Products in accordance with our terms. This is how we:
Personalise features and content (such as your
Facebook Feed
,
Instagram Feed
and Stories); and
Make suggestions for you (such as people you may know, groups or events that you may be interested in or topics that you may want to follow) on and off our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings (like GPS location)
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to
Reports about our Products’ performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing and improving our Meta Products: The provision of the Meta Products includes collecting, storing, and, where relevant, sharing, profiling, reviewing and curating, and in some instances not only automated processing but also manual (human) reviewing, to:
Create and maintain your account and profile,
Connect your Meta Products account, including your public profile information, to an integrated partner to sign in or share your information,
Facilitate the sharing of content and status,
Provide and curate features,
Provide messaging services, the ability to make voice and video calls and connect with others,
Provide and curate
artificial intelligence technology
in our Products, enabling the creation of content like text, audio, images and videos, including by understanding and recognising your use of content in the features,
Undertake analytics, and
Facilitate your purchases and payments on Meta Pay or other Meta checkout experiences.
We also use information we have to develop, research and test improvements to our Products. We use information we collect to:
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Your public information (including your name, username and profile picture)
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promoting safety, integrity and security on and across the Meta Products: The Meta Products are designed to help ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.  We process information we have associated with you and apply automated processing techniques and, in some instances, conduct manual (human) review to:
Verify accounts, identity and activity,
Find and address violations of our terms or policies. In some cases, the decisions we make about violations are reviewed by the
Oversight Board
,
Investigate suspicious activity,
Detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behavior, such as to review and, in some cases, remove content reported to us,
Detect and prevent spam and other bad experiences,
Detect and stop threats to our personnel and property, and
Maintain the integrity of our Products.
For more information on safety, integrity and security generally on Meta Products, visit the Facebook Security Help Center and Instagram Security Tips.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
To communicate with you: We use information you’ve given us (like contact information on your profile) to send you a communication, like an e-mail or in-product notice, for example:
We’ll contact you via email or in-product notifications in relation to the Meta Products, product-related issues, research or to let you know about our terms and policies.
We also use contact information like your e-mail address to respond when you contact us.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Contact information on your profile and your communications with us
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Transferring, storing or processing your information globally. We share information we collect globally, both internally across our offices and data centers and externally with our partners, third parties and service providers. Because Meta is global, with users, partners and employees around the world, transfers are necessary to:
Operate and provide the services described in the terms that apply to the Meta Product(s) you are using. This includes allowing you to share information and connect with your family and friends around the globe; and
So we can fix, analyze and improve our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
We'll use the information we have to provide these services; if you choose not to provide certain information (other than limited account information which is necessary to create a
Facebook account
or an
Instagram account
), your experience using the Meta Products may be affected. For example, you may see less relevant recommendations on the Products, or your use of the Products may be restricted.
When we process information that you provide to us as necessary for concluding or performing our contracts with you, you have the right to port it under the GDPR. To exercise your rights, visit the Facebook settings and Instagram settings, or learn more in our Help Centers.
Compliance with a legal obligation
The categories of information we use, why we process your information based on compliance with a legal obligation and how it’s processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
For processing information when the law requires it: Where we are under an obligation to disclose information such as, for example, if we receive a valid legal request for certain information (such as an Irish search warrant), we will access, preserve and / or share your information with regulators, law enforcement or others.
The way in which the information will be processed depends on the specific circumstances, see
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and integrity?
for more.
Information for Law Enforcement Authorities
provides information on the operational guidelines law enforcement needs to follow.
Examples of Irish and EU laws enforceable in Ireland that could give rise to an obligation requiring us to process the information we hold about you are:
Civil and commercial matters: where we are in receipt of a court order or otherwise required to disclose information for the purposes of court proceedings, such as under Regulation (EU) No 1215/2012 on jurisdiction and the recognition and enforcement of judgments in civil and commercial matters.
Criminal matters: to comply with requests from Irish law enforcement to provide information in relation to an investigation, such as under Section 10 of the Criminal Justice (Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1997 as amended by 6(1)(a) of the Criminal Justice Act 2006, or to take steps to report information to law enforcement where required.
Consumer matters: to comply with our obligations under consumer law such as the Competition and Consumer Protection Act 2014.
Corporate and taxation matters: to comply with our obligations such as the Companies Act 2014.
Regulatory matters: to comply with our obligations to engage with regulators, such as the Data Protection Commission under the General Data Protection Regulation and the Data Protection Act 2018.
Financial matters: to comply with our obligations under applicable financial services law such as the European Union (Payment Services) Regulations 2018
View the
current list of laws
which are enforceable in Ireland that give rise to a legal obligation for Meta which results in the processing of information. New laws may be enacted or other obligations may become binding on our processing of your information which may require us to process your information and we will update this list from time to time.
The categories of information depend on the specific circumstances of each mandatory request or obligation. Only the information necessary to comply with the relevant legal obligation will be processed. For example, for civil matters, this will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information). However, depending on the circumstances it could include the following:
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Legitimate interests
We rely on our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of a third party, where they are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms ("legitimate interests"). The categories of information we use, the legitimate interests relied on and why and how it’s processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Legitimate interests relied on
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)

        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
If you are a registered user of the Meta Products
For people under the age of majority (under 18, in most applicable countries) who have a limited ability to enter into an enforceable contract only, where we may be unable to process your information on the grounds of contractual necessity.
Personalising the Meta Products: Our systems automatically process information we have collected and stored associated with you and others to assess and understand your interests and your preferences and provide you personalised experiences across the Meta Products in accordance with our terms. This is how we:
Personalise features and content (such as your
News Feed
,
Instagram Feed
and Stories),
Make suggestions for you (such as people you may know, groups or events that you may be interested in or topics that you may want to follow) on and off our Products.
Learn more
about how we use information about you to personalise your experience on and across Meta Products and how we choose the ads that you see.
To create, provide, support and maintain innovative products and features that enable people under the age of majority to express themselves, communicate, discover and engage with information and communities relevant to their interests, build community and utilise tools and features that promote their well-being.
To share meaningful updates with our users under the age of majority about our Products and promoting our Products.
To provide, personalize and improve the Meta Products in a consistent manner while ensuring additional safeguards for those under their Member State's age of consent.
The legitimate interest of our users in being able to access the Meta Products and those Products being personalised to each user.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings (like GPS location)
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to
Reports about our Products’ performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
(other than using partner data to tailor ads to you)
Providing and improving our Meta Products: The provision of the Meta Products includes collecting, storing, and, where relevant, sharing, profiling, reviewing and curating, automated processing, and in some instances manual (human) reviewing, to:
Create and maintain your account and profile,
Connect your Meta Products account, including your public profile information, to an integrated partner to sign in or share your information,
Facilitate the sharing of content and status,
Provide and curate features,
Provide messaging services, the ability to make voice and video calls and connect with others,
Provide advertising products,
Provide and curate
artificial intelligence technology
in our Products, enabling the creation of content like text, audio, images and videos, including by understanding and recognising your use of content in the features, and
Undertake analytics.
We also use information we have to develop, research and test improvements to our Products. We use information we collect to:
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
To create, provide, support and maintain innovative products and features that enable people under the age of majority to express themselves, communicate, discover and engage with information and communities relevant to their interests, build community and utilise tools and features that promote their well-being.
To enable people under the age of majority to use and connect to the Meta Products in an easy and intuitive manner.
To provide, personalize and improve the Meta Products in a consistent manner while ensuring additional safeguards for those under their Member State's age of consent.
The legitimate interest of our users in being able to access the Meta Products and those Products being personalised to each user.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Your public profile information (including your name, username and profile picture)
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promoting safety, integrity and security on and across the Meta Products: The Meta Products are designed to help ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.  We process information we have associated with you and apply automated processing techniques and, in some instances, conduct manual (human) review to:
Verify accounts and activity,
Find and address violations of our terms or policies. In some cases, the decisions we make about violations are reviewed by the Oversight Board,
Investigate suspicious activity,
Detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behavior, such as to review, and in some cases remove, content reported to us,
Detect and prevent spam and other bad experiences,
Detect and stop threats to our personnel and property, and
Maintain the integrity of our Products.
For more information on safety, integrity and security generally on the Meta Products, visit the Facebook Security Help Center and Instagram Security Tips.
To secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, and to protect the safety of people under the age of majority, including to prevent exploitation or other harms to which such individuals may be particularly vulnerable.
In the interests of our users and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Communicating with you:
We use information you have given us (like contact information you’ve entered on your profile) to send you a communication, like an e-mail or in-product notice, for example:
we’ll contact you via email or in-product notifications in relation to the Meta Products, product-related issues, research or to let you know about our terms and policies.
We also use contact information like your email address to respond to you when you contact us.
To share meaningful updates with our users under the age of majority about our Products and promoting our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Contact information on your profile and your communications with us
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
For all people, including those under the age of majority
Providing measurement, analytics and other business services to businesses, and other partners:
Our systems automatically, as well as with some manual (human) processing, process information we have collected and stored about you and others. We use this information to:
Provide insights and measurement reports to businesses, and other partners to help them measure the effectiveness and distribution of their, or their client's content and services, to understand the kinds of people who are seeing their content and how their content is performing on and off the Meta Products, and
Provide aggregated user analytics and insights reports that help users, businesses, and other partners better understand things like the audiences with whom they may want to connect, as well as the types of people who use their products and services and how people interact with their content, websites, apps, products and services, including to connect to Meta Products, and the performance of their connection and networks and users’ experience with them.
In our interest to provide accurate and reliable reporting to our businesses, and other partners, to ensure accurate pricing and statistics on performance and to demonstrate the value that our partners realise using Meta Company Products, and to provide suitable payment and billing options to our other partners; and
In the interests of developers and other partners to help them understand their customers and improve their businesses, validate our pricing models and evaluate the effectiveness of their products, services, online content on and off the Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
If we show you ads on Meta Products:
Providing measurement, analytics and other business services to businesses, advertisers and other partners:
Our systems automatically, as well as with some manual (human) processing, process information we have collected and stored about you and others. We use this information to:
Provide insights and measurement reports to businesses, advertisers and other partners to help them measure the effectiveness and distribution of their, or their client's ads, content and services, to understand the kinds of people who are seeing their content and ads, and how their content and ads are performing on and off the Meta Products, and
Provide aggregated user analytics and insights reports that help businesses, advertisers and other partners better understand things like the audiences with whom they may want to connect, as well as the types of people who use their products and services and how people interact with their websites, apps, products and services, including to connect to Meta Products, and the performance of their connection and networks and users’ experience with them.
In our interest to provide accurate and reliable reporting to our businesses, advertisers, and other partners, to ensure accurate pricing and statistics on performance and to demonstrate the value that our partners realize using Meta Company Products, and to provide suitable payment and billing options to our advertisers and other partners; and
In the interests of advertisers, developers and other partners to help them understand their customers and improve their businesses, validate our pricing models and evaluate the effectiveness of their products, services, online content and advertising on and off the Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Communicating, engaging and sharing across the Meta Company Products:
To provide a seamless, consistent and richer, innovative, experience across the Meta Company Products and to enable cross app interactions, sharing, viewing and engaging with content, including posts and videos.
In our interest to provide seamless, consistent and richer, innovative communication, engagement and sharing experiences across Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Business intelligence and analytics:
To understand, in aggregate, your usage of and across our Products, to accurately count people and businesses; and
Validate metrics directly related to these, in order to inform and improve product direction and development and to adhere to (shareholder/earning) reporting obligations.
In our interest to measure the use of our Products and count the people who interact with our Products in order to inform and improve product direction and development and to enable provision of accurate and reliable reporting.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Location-related information
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing marketing communications to you:
Depending on your settings, we’ll share marketing communications with you.
We’ll collect and store your information and use it to send marketing communications to you, like an e-mail.
In our interest to promote Meta Company Products and send our direct marketing.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Information and content you provide, including your contact information like e-mail address
App, browser and device information
:
Device identifiers
Research and innovate for social good:
We carry out surveys and use information (including from researchers we collaborate with) to conduct and support research and innovation on topics of general social welfare, technological advancement, public interest, health and well-being.
For example, we analyse information that we have about migration patterns during crises. This helps relief organizations get aid to the right places.
We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation of information as well as manual (human) review, and share information, as necessary to research and innovate for social good in this way.
We support research in areas like artificial intelligence and machine learning.
Learn more
about our research programmes.
In our interest and those of the general public to further the state-of-the-art or academic understanding on important social issues that affect our society and world in a positive way.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Location-related information
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Anonymising your information
In some cases, we anonymise information we have about you, such as your activity on and off our Products, and use the resulting information, for example, to provide and improve our Meta Products, including ads.
In our interest to fund our provision of the Meta Products, provide relevant advertising to users, and improve ads delivery and Meta Products;
In the interests of advertisers to help them to reach relevant audiences who may be interested in their information, products or services;
In the interests of users that Meta practice data minimisation and privacy by design in respect of their information
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Share information with others including law enforcement and to respond to legal requests.
See
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and security?
for information on when we share information with law enforcement and others.
The categories of information we access, preserve, use and share depend on the specific circumstances. For example, responses to legal requests where not compelled by law, will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information).
However, the information we process will depend on the purposes, which could include the following:
In response to
legal requests
from third parties such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
To comply with applicable law or legitimate legal purposes.
To promote the safety, security and integrity of Meta, Meta Products, Products, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
about how we promote safety, security and integrity.
In our interest and the interest of the general public to prevent and address fraud, unauthorised use of the Meta Company Products, violations of our terms or policies, or other harmful or illegal activity; to protect ourselves (including our rights, Meta personnel and property or Meta Products), our users or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory enquiries; or to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Location-related information
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promote safety, integrity and security in limited circumstances outside of the performance of our contracts with you:
Our Meta Products are delivered to ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.
We apply automated processing, as well as manual (human) review to verify accounts and activity, combat harmful conduct, detect and prevent spam and other security matters as well as bad experiences of other types, maintain the integrity of our Products, and promote safety, integrity and security on and off Meta Products.
For example, we use information that we have to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, or to detect when someone needs help.
To learn more, visit the
Facebook Security Help Centre
and
Instagram Security Tips
.
In our interest to secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Company Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, and to investigate and take action in respect of suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies; and
In the interests of our users and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Sharing your contact, profile or other information with third parties upon your request:
You may choose to share your contact information, profile information and other data with our partners: The types of partners with whom information is shared depends on the features of our service that you use and the manner in which you choose to use them. For example, you may choose to share your email address, birthday, friends list, hometown or other information with a partner if you choose to connect your Facebook account to their app.
To deliver  quality experiences to users who use our partners’ apps, in our best interest and in the interest of our users.
To facilitate and improve users' experiences in their apps, in the interests of our partners who want to facilitate and improve consumers' experiences in their apps.
Information you provide (for example, your email address, birthday, friends’ list and hometown).
If you are using a device we cannot associate with a registered user of the Meta Products
Promote safety, integrity and security:
Our Meta Products are delivered in a manner to ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.
We collect and store information we have for this purpose and apply automated processing and manual (i.e. human) review to verify accounts and activity, combat harmful conduct, detect and prevent spam and other security matters as well as bad experiences of other types, maintain the integrity of our Products, and research and promote safety, integrity and security on and off Meta Products.
For example, we use information that we have to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, or to detect when someone needs help.
To learn more, visit the
Facebook Security Help Centre
and
Instagram Security Tips
.
In our interest to secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Company Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, and to investigate and take action in respect of suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies; and
In the interests of our users generally and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing marketing communications to you: We’ll collect and store your information and use it to send marketing communications to you, like an e-mail address.
In our interest to promote Meta Company Products and send our direct marketing.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Information and content you provide including your contact information like your e-mail address
Research and innovate for social good:
We carry out surveys and use information (including from research partners we collaborate with) to conduct and support research and innovation on topics of general social welfare, technological advancement, public interest, health and well-being.
We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation to information as well as manual (human) review as necessary to research and innovate for social good in this way.
We support research in areas like artificial intelligence and machine learning.
Learn more
about our research programs.
In our interest and in the interest of the general public to further the state-of-the-art or academic understanding on important social issues that affect our society and world in a positive way.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Share information with others including law enforcement and to respond to
legal requests
.
See '
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and security?
' for information on when we share information with law enforcement and others.
The categories of information we access, preserve, use and share depend on the specific circumstances. For example, responses to legal requests where not compelled by law, will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information).
However, the information we process will depend on the purposes, which could include the following:
In response to
legal requests
from third parties such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
To comply with applicable law or legitimate legal purposes.
To promote the safety, security and integrity of Meta, Meta Products, Products, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
about how we promote safety, security and integrity.
In our interest and the interest of the general public to prevent and address fraud, unauthorised use of the Meta Company Products, violations of our terms or policies, or other harmful or illegal activity; to protect ourselves (including our rights, Meta personnel and property or Meta Products), our users or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory enquiries; or to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Provide and improve our Products:
We use information we collect to:
Provide products and curate features
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
To improve the Meta Company Products in a consistent manner, to correct technical glitches, and to optimise functionality.
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
When we process your information as necessary to pursue our legitimate interests or those of a third party, you have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, such processing; to exercise your right, visit the
Facebook settings
and the
Help Center
and Instagram settings.
We will consider several factors when assessing an objection, including: our users' reasonable expectations; the benefits and risks to you, us, other users or third parties; and other available means to achieve the same purpose that may be less invasive and do not require disproportionate effort. Unless we find that we have compelling legitimate grounds for this processing which are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms or the processing is needed for legal reasons, your objection will be upheld, and we will cease processing your information. To learn more about the circumstances in which an objection may be successful, please visit the
Help Center
.
If you are under the age of majority in your country and there is no enforceable contract in place, we will take particular account of the fact that you are below the age of majority when conducting our assessment of our legitimate interests and the balancing  of your interests and rights. We provide specific protections for people below the age of majority to ensure that they are aware of the risks, consequences, safeguards and rights associated with the processing of their information.
Tasks carried out in the public interest
The purposes for which we anticipate processing your information as a task in the public interest, the processing we undertake, and the information we use is set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)

        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Undertaking research for social good:  We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation to information as well as manual (human) review as necessary to undertake research and other tasks in the public interest, such as sharing relevant research data with third parties like international organisations and academics both in and outside the EEA. The public interest is required to be laid down in Union law or Member State law or other applicable law to which we are subject. In this case, we rely on Articles 168 and 179 of the Treaty on the Functioning of the European Union.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
To promote safety, integrity and security: In limited fact specific circumstances, we will access, preserve and share your information with regulators, law enforcement or others where necessary to perform a task in the public interest. For example, we might share information with others for the purposes of combatting unlawful or harmful behaviour where it is in the public interest to do so and where the public interest is laid down in Union law or Member State law or other applicable law to which we are subject. In this case, we rely on Section 53 of the Data Protection Act 2018 and Regulation (EU) 2021/1232.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from Partners, vendors and third parties
When we process your information as necessary for a task carried out in the public interest, you have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, our processing. To exercise your rights, visit the
Facebook settings
and the
Help Center
and Instagram settings. In assessing an objection, we will consider several factors, including: our users' reasonable user expectations; the benefits and risks to you, us, other users or third parties; and other available means to achieve the same purpose that may be less invasive and do not require disproportionate effort.
Your objection will be upheld, and we will cease processing your information, unless we find that we have compelling legitimate grounds for this processing which are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms or the processing is needed for legal reasons. To learn more about the circumstances in which an objection may be successful, please visit the
Help Center
.
Protection of your vital interests or that of another person
The categories of information we use, why we process your information to protect your vital interests or those of another person and how it’s processed are set out below
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Protecting the vital interests of you and/or those of another person: We apply automated processing techniques, conduct manual (human) review and share information, including with law enforcement and others, in circumstances where someone’s vital interests require protection, such as in the case of emergencies. These vital interests include protection of your life, physical or mental health, wellbeing or integrity or that of others, and detecting, removing, and reporting illegal content. In protecting such vital interests we aim to combat harmful conduct and promote safety, integrity and security, including, for example, when we are investigating reports of harmful conduct or taking appropriate action, such as sharing information with relevant authorities, when someone needs help.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content,
subject to applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies
Sub-policy 6
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/privacy-policy-eea?lang=en:
Introduction
What Information We Collect
How We Use Your Information
How We Share Your Information
Our Legal Bases and How We Process Your Information
Your Rights and Choices
Data Security and Retention
Our Global Operations and Data Transfers
Younger Users
Privacy Policy Updates
Contact Us
EEA/UK/CH
Privacy Policy
Effective Date:
04 December 2024
Introduction
What Information We Collect
How We Use Your Information
How We Share Your Information
Our Legal Bases and How We Process Your Information
Your Rights and Choices
Data Security and Retention
Our Global Operations and Data Transfers
Younger Users
Privacy Policy Updates
Contact Us
Introduction
This privacy policy ("
Privacy Policy
") applies to the personal information that TikTok processes in connection with TikTok apps, websites, software and related services (the “
Platform
”), that link to or reference this Privacy Policy.
Data Controller
: If you live in the European Economic Area (“
EEA
”), the United Kingdom (“
UK
”), or Switzerland, TikTok Technology Limited, an Irish company (“
TikTok Ireland
”), and TikTok Information Technologies UK Limited (“
TikTok UK
”), a UK company, ("
TikTok
," "
our
," "
we
," or "
us
") are the joint controllers of your information processed in connection with this Privacy Policy.
What Information We Collect
We collect your information in three ways:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
. More detail is provided below.
Information You Provide
Account Information.
We collect information that you provide when you set up an account, such as your date of birth, username, email address and/or telephone number, and password. You can choose to add other information to your account, such as a bio or image.
User Content.
We collect the content you create, import, upload or publish through the Platform, such as photographs, videos, audio recordings, livestreams, comments, hashtags, feedback, reviews, and the associated metadata (such as when, where, and by whom the content was created). Even if you are not a user, information about you may appear in content created or published by users on the Platform. We collect
User Content
through pre-loading at the time of creation, import, or upload, regardless of whether you choose to save or upload that
User Content
, for example, to recommend music based on the video. We also collect content (such as text, images, and video) from your device's clipboard if you choose to copy and paste content to or from the Platform or share content between it and a third party platform. In addition, we collect location information (such as tourist attractions, shops, or other points of interest) if you choose to add the location information to your
User Content
.
Messages.
We collect the content of the messages you send and receive on the Platform and the associated metadata (such as the time the message was sent, received or read, as well as the participants in the communication). We also collect the messages you send or receive through our chat functionality when using our shopping feature to communicate with sellers or using virtual assistants.
Your Contacts and Other Connections.
If you choose to sync your contacts, we will collect information from your device’s phone book such as names, phone numbers, and email addresses, and match that information to users of the Platform. If you choose to find other users through your social network contacts, we will collect your public profile information as well as names and profiles of your social network contacts. We also collect information about the accounts you follow and that follow you.
Purchase Information.
When you make a purchase, a payment, or other transaction on or through the Platform, including when you buy TikTok Coins or purchase products through our shopping features, we collect information about the transaction, such as payment card information, billing, delivery, and contact information, and products you purchased.
Surveys, Research, and Promotions.
We collect
Information You Provide
if you choose to participate in a survey, research, promotion, contest, marketing campaign, or event conducted or sponsored by us.
Information When You Contact Us.
When you contact us, we collect the information you send us, such as proof of identity or age, feedback or inquiries about your use of the Platform or information about possible violations of our
Terms of Service
(our “
Terms
”),
Community Guidelines
(our “
Guidelines
”), or other policies.
Information From Forms and Features You Use
. We collect the
Information You Provide
when you fill in a form on the Platform. You can let TikTok fill in forms automatically with your account info, like your addresses or payment info.
Automatically Collected Information
Technical Information.
We collect certain device and network connection information when you access the Platform. This information includes your device model, operating system, keystroke patterns or rhythms, IP address, system language and device settings. We also collect service-related, diagnostic, performance information, including crash reports and performance logs. We automatically assign you a device ID and user ID. Where you log-in from multiple devices, we use information such as your device ID and user ID to identify your activity across devices to give you a seamless log-in experience and for security purposes.
Location Information.
We automatically collect information about your approximate location (e.g. country, state, or city) based on your
Technical Information
(such as SIM card and IP address). Also, where you enable location services for the TikTok app within your device settings, we collect approximate location information from your device. Click
here
to learn more about how we collect Location Information.
Usage Information.
We collect information about how you engage with the Platform, including information about how you interact with content and ads, the duration and frequency of your use, your engagement with other users, and your search history.
Content Characteristics and Features.
We detect and collect characteristics and features about the videos, images, and audio recordings that are part of your
User Content
, for example, by identifying objects and scenery, the existence or location within an image of a face or other body parts; and the text of words spoken in your
User Content
. We do this, for example, for content moderation and to provide special effects (such as video filters and avatars) and captions.
Inferred Information.
We infer your attributes (such as age-range and gender) and interests based on the information we have about you. We use inferences, for example, to keep the Platform safe (such as for content moderation), to show you relevant information, and, where permitted, to serve you personalised ads based on your interests.
Cookies.
We use cookies and similar tracking technologies to operate and provide the Platform. For example, we use cookies to remember your language preferences, make sure you don’t see the same video more than once, and for security purposes. We also use these technologies for marketing purposes. To learn more about our use of cookies, please see our
Cookie Policy
. We will obtain your consent to our use of cookies where required by law.
Information From Other Sources
Advertising, Measurement and Other Partners.
Advertisers, measurement and other partners share information with us about you and the actions you have taken outside of the Platform, such as your activities on other websites and apps or in stores, including the products or services you purchased, online or in person. These partners also share information with us, such as mobile identifiers for advertising, hashed email addresses and phone numbers, and cookie identifiers, which we use to help match you and your actions outside of the Platform with your TikTok account. Some of our advertisers and other partners enable us to collect similar information directly from their website or app by integrating our
TikTok Advertiser Tools
(such as TikTok Pixel). These partners are required to have the necessary rights and permissions to share your information with us before doing so. We process certain information that we receive from these partners as a joint controller with them.
Learn more
about our arrangements with these partners.
Sellers, Payment and Transaction Fulfillment Providers.
We receive information about you from sellers as well as payment and transaction fulfillment providers, such as payment confirmation details, and information about the delivery of products you have purchased through our shopping features.
Third Party Platforms and Partners.
Third party platforms provide us with information (such as your email address, authentication ID, and public profile) when you choose to sign up for or log in to the Platform using sign-in features provided by those third parties. We may also receive contact information that you hold or is held about you when contact information is synced with our Platform by you or another user. When you interact with any third party service (such as third party apps, websites or products) that integrate
TikTok Developer Tools
, we will receive the information necessary to provide you with features like cross-service authentication or cross-posting. For example, this will happen if you log in to another platform with your TikTok account or if you use TikTok’s “share” button on a third party platform to share content from there to the Platform. We may also receive information from third party providers which we use for safety purposes, including to protect users on the Platform and for content moderation.
Additional Sources.
We may collect or receive information about you from organisations, businesses, people, and others, including, for example, publicly available sources, government authorities, professional organisations, and charity groups. We also collect information about you where you are included or mentioned in
User Content
,
Messages
, in a complaint, appeal, request or feedback submitted by a user or third party, or if your contact information is provided to us by a user.
How We Use Your Information
We use your information to operate, provide, develop, and improve the Platform, including for the following purposes. You can find more detail in “
Our Legal Bases and How We Process Your Information
”.
Provide and administer the Platform, such as enabling you to create, share, and consume content, to interact with other users and their content, and provide user support.
Provide our shopping features (such as personalised shopping benefits) and facilitate the purchase and delivery of products, goods and services, including sharing your information with sellers, payment and transaction fulfilment providers, and other service providers in order to process your orders.
Personalise and customise certain features and content such as providing your “For You” feed and content creation tools.
Enforce our Terms, Guidelines, and other policies that apply to you. We review
User Content
and other information through a mix of technology (including through automated means) and human moderation to protect the safety and well-being of our community.
Provide certain interactive features, such as enabling your content to be used in other users’ videos,
Suggest your account to other users and suggest accounts of others to you to help connect you with other users.
Provide and improve our advertising services, including to serve ads (including personalised ads, where permitted).
Create analytics reports so that partners, sellers and creators can see how their content, ads or products are performing and to better understand their audience and buyers.
Maintain and enhance the safety, security, and stability of the Platform by identifying and addressing technical or security issues or problems (such as technical bugs, spam accounts, and detecting abuse, fraud, and illegal activity).
Review, improve, and develop the Platform, including by monitoring interactions and usage across your devices, analysing how people are using it, and by training, testing, and improving our technology, such as our machine learning models and algorithms.
Share your information with third party platforms to provide you with features, like content sharing at your request when you integrate your TikTok account with a third party service.
Facilitate research conducted by independent researchers that meets certain criteria.
Promote the Platform or third party services through marketing communications, contests, or promotions.
Facilitate the sending of marketing communications by sellers to you on our Platform. We act as a joint controller with the sellers in this scenario.
Learn more
about our arrangements with these sellers.
Comply with our legal obligations, or as necessary to perform tasks in the public interest, or to protect the vital interests of our users and other people.
Protect the Platform and defend our legal rights and commercial interests, and those of our affiliates, users and the public.
How We Share Your Information
Service Providers
We engage service providers that help us provide, support, and develop the Platform and understand how it is used. They provide services such as: cloud hosting, and content delivery, customer and technical support, content moderation, marketing, analytics, and online payments.
We share
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
with these service providers as necessary to enable them to provide their services.
Partners
Third Party Platforms and Partners.
We share limited information which may include
Information You Provide
,
Technical Information
, and
Usage Information
with third party platforms and partners whose platform or services are integrated with the Platform, or with whom we have a commercial relationship. We do this to give you a seamless experience, allow your content to be shared on other platforms, allow sellers to view and manage your orders through our shopping features, and enable third party platforms and partners to better authenticate users. Some examples include if you:
log-in to a third party platform using your account, we will share your basic account information and any other
Information You Provide
,
sign-up or log-in to the Platform using your account details from a third party platform (such as Facebook or Google), we will share certain
Technical Information
to facilitate this,
share
User Content
you publish on the Platform on other social media platforms, we will share your
User Content
and related information.
Advertisers.
We provide advertisers with reports about the performance of their ads and other content on the Platform in order to help them measure their effectiveness and understand their audience. These reports contain aggregate information of certain
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
. We don’t share information with advertisers that can be used to contact you (such as your name or email address) unless you give us your permission.
Measurement and Data Partners.
We share
Information You Provide
,
Technical Information
and
Usage Information
with third party measurement providers who create aggregate reports that help us measure advertising served on the Platform and help our advertisers understand their effectiveness and their audience.
Sellers and their Service Providers.
When you make a purchase through the shopping features on our Platform, we share
Purchase Information
related to the transaction with the sellers and service providers acting on their behalf. This includes order items, contact details and delivery information so that your order can be processed. We also share certain
Technical Information
about your device or connection with these parties to help ensure the security of the transaction. When making a purchase through our shopping features, please review the product and seller location details provided on the Platform for information about where your information will be sent.
Users of Our Analytics Services.
We provide aggregated statistics and insights to help people and businesses understand how people are engaging with the Platform. For example, creators, advertisers and sellers can receive information about the number of views, likes, comments and shares of their content, as well as information to understand their followers, buyers and the audience of their content. We create this aggregate information using
Information you Provide
and
Automatically Collected Information
. In certain circumstances, TikTok is a joint controller with TikTok account holders for this processing.
Learn more
about the joint processing for TikTok Analytics.
Our Corporate Group
As a global company, the Platform is supported by certain entities within our corporate group (“
Corporate Group
”). These entities process
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
for us, as necessary to provide certain functions, such as storage, content delivery, security, research and development, analytics, online payments, customer and technical support, and content moderation. See
Our Global Operations and Data Transfers
for additional information.
Others
We share your information in other limited scenarios as follows:
Users and the Public.
Based on your privacy settings, your information, including your
Account Information
,
User Content
, and
Usage Information
may be visible to other users and the public. For example, if you have a public account and have not restricted the visibility of your posts individually, your
Account Information
and
User Content
can be viewed or shared by anyone on or off the Platform, whether or not they have a TikTok account. Depending on your privacy settings, your
Account Information
and
User Content
may also appear on search engines, content aggregators, and news sites. You can learn about account types and privacy settings, including how to limit the audience for your videos
here
.
Independent Researchers:
We share your information with independent researchers to facilitate research that meets certain criteria as described in
Our Legal Bases and How We Process Your Information
.
Corporate Transactions.
Your information may be disclosed to third parties in connection with a corporate transaction, such as a merger, sale of assets or shares, reorganisation, financing, change of control, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business.
Legal Obligations and Rights.
We may access, preserve, and share the information described in "
What Information We Collect
" with law enforcement agencies, public authorities, researchers, copyright holders, or other third parties if we have good faith belief that it is necessary to:
comply with applicable law, legal process or government requests, as consistent with internationally recognised standards,
protect the rights, property, and safety of our users, copyright holders, and others, including to protect life or prevent imminent bodily harm. For example, we may provide information (such as your IP address) to law enforcement in the event of an emergency where someone’s life or safety is at risk,
investigate potential violations of and enforce our Terms, Guidelines, or any other applicable terms, policies, or standards, or
detect, investigate, prevent, or address misleading activity, copyright infringement, or other illegal activity.
To learn more about how we handle requests from law enforcement agencies and public authorities, see our
Law Enforcement Guidelines
.
Our Legal Bases and How We Process Your Information
We may only use your information when we have a “legal basis” to do so. We use different legal bases depending on why we use your information (in other words, the “purpose” of our processing). These legal bases are contractual necessity, legitimate interests (ours, yours or those of another party), consent, compliance with a legal obligation, performing a task in the public interest, and protection of vital interests.
Here we explain the legal bases we rely on when we process your information. This section also describes why we use your information, how this information is processed, the categories of information involved, and the associated rights (which always includes the right to access your information). For more information on how to exercise any of your rights, please check out the “
Your Rights and Choices
” section in the Privacy Policy.
Contractual Necessity
If you have the legal capacity to enter into an enforceable contract, we use
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
where it is necessary to perform the contract you enter into (our Terms) when you register for, access, or use the Platform. This means we use your information to:
Provide you with the Platform.
We use your information to allow you to access and use the Platform, including allowing you to create, share and consume content, interact with others, utilise social features, and provide you with products and services you purchase.
Personalise features and content.
We also personalise certain features and content such as providing your “For You” feed, which shows you videos that we think you would be interested in (see
here
for more information) and by suggesting accounts to you.
Product orders and deliveries.
We use your information to process orders, such as to facilitate the purchase and delivery of products, and communicate with you about your orders. This includes sharing
Purchase Information
with Sellers, Payment and Transaction Fulfilment Providers, and Other Service Providers
Enforce our Terms, Guidelines, or policies.
We use your information to enforce our Terms, Guidelines, and policies (including through automated means and human moderation). This may include age restricting or removing content, maintaining our For You feed eligibility standards, or suspending or banning your account if we determine that you are violating our Terms or Guidelines.
Administer the Platform.
We also use the information we have to administer the Platform, such as to communicate with you on service related matters, provide you with updates and support regarding any purchase you make on or through the Platform, and respond to and process your queries, claims or disputes (including when you tell us about a problem, or ask for a copy of your information).
Your Rights
: Whenever we use your information on the basis that it is necessary for the contract we have with you, you have the right to port information you have provided to us.
Legitimate Interests
We use your information where this is necessary to achieve legitimate interests - whether belonging to us, you, or a third party - provided these interests are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. We use the information we collect to:
Enable users to create content with interactive features
.
Interactive features, like Duet and Stitch, enable other users to include your videos in their videos (if you allow this in your settings).
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To provide users with tools to inspire creativity, collaboration, and enjoyment, and to create opportunities for users to reach new audiences.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
and
Automatically Collected Information
.
Suggest your account to other users
.
We may suggest your account to other users, including when a user chooses to sync their contacts with the Platform.
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To enable users to quickly and efficiently find and connect with other users.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Provide all users with generic advertising
.
We show all users generic ads, including those who have chosen not to receive personalised ads.
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: We show generic ads to keep the Platform free of charge. We process limited categories of your information to make sure our advertising service is useful to our advertisers (for example, to serve ads to users in a particular country or to users who speak the same language).
Information used
:
Information You Provide
and
Automatically Collected Information
.
Provide measurement and analytics services
.
We help creators, sellers and advertisers measure the effectiveness and distribution of ads and other content viewed on the Platform.
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To enable creators, sellers and advertisers to view and understand how their ads or content performed and the audience that viewed or interacted with their ads or content. This is so that they can make informed decisions (such as what kinds of ad campaigns they may want to run, the type of audience they want to reach and the types of content that users enjoy the most). This helps keep the advertising and other content we show users relevant and entertaining, and keeps the Platform free for all users.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Ensure the safety and well-being of our community
.
We use your information to ensure the safety and well-being of our community, including by reviewing
User Content
(and if permitted under applicable law,
Messages
and associated metadata) for breaches of our Terms, Guidelines, and other policies. We also infer your age range, and under certain circumstances, may ask you to provide additional information to confirm your age.
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To keep our community safe, review compliance with our Guidelines, and identify misuse of the Platform.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Ensure the security and stability of the Platform
.
We use your information to ensure the stability and security of the Platform, including by identifying and combating technical or security issues (such as technical bugs, spam accounts, and detecting abuse, fraud, and illegal activity).
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To ensure the ongoing stability and security of the Platform and to ensure it is continuously available and functioning.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Review, improve, promote, and develop the Platform
.
We use the information we have to understand how people are using the Platform and to develop, test, and make improvements to the Platform, including to develop and improve our technology, such as our machine learning models and algorithms. We also use this information to better understand and promote the Platform, popular topics, and emerging trends, and offer certain personalised features. We also review messages you exchange with customer support to improve technologies supporting such functions.
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To improve, promote, and develop the Platform in an informed way.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Facilitate independent research.
We share your information with independent researchers to facilitate research that meets certain criteria, including where such researchers have demonstrable experience and expertise in their area. Click
here
to learn more
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To facilitate independent research that aims to develop society’s collective knowledge, including in the areas of misinformation and disinformation, violence, cybercrime, and social trends.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
and
Automatically Collected Information
.
Share your information with third parties
.
We share your information with third parties whose platforms or services are integrated with, or otherwise made available on, the Platform.
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To optimise your experience, allow your content to be shared on other platforms, enable third parties to authenticate users, and to allow for the performance of commercial agreements.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Protect the Platform and defend legal rights
We may use your information in connection with preparing for, taking and defending actual or anticipated legal claims or proceedings (including investigating any potential claims we may have or be aware of).
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: to protect the Platform and defend the legal rights and commercial interests of us, our affiliates, our users and the public.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Marketing communications
.
We may send you marketing messages about the Platform and third party products and services where we think they will interest you. Where required, we will obtain your consent to send you such communications.
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To promote the Platform and third party products and services.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Your Rights
: Whenever we use your information on the basis that it is necessary for legitimate interests, you can object to, and request restriction of, such usage.
If you are under the age of majority (under 18 in most relevant countries), with a limited ability to enter into an enforceable contract only, where we may be unable to process your information on the grounds of contractual necessity, we rely on legitimate interests and use the information we collect to:
Provide you with the Platform
We use your information to allow you to access and use the Platform, including allowing you to create, share, and consume content, interact with others, utilise features, and provide you with products and services you purchase.
Legitimate Interests relied upon
: To provide, support, and maintain products and features that enable users who can’t enter into an enforceable contract with us to communicate, discover, and engage with content and express themselves. We also rely on the legitimate interest of our users in being able to access the Platform in an easy and intuitive manner..
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Personalise features and content
We use your information to personalise
certain
features and content
on the Platform, such as providing your “For You” feed, which shows you videos that we think you would be interested in (see
here
for more information) and by suggesting accounts to you.
Legitimate Interests relied upon
: To provide, support, and maintain products and features that enable users who can’t enter into an enforceable contract with us to communicate, discover, create and engage with content and users relevant to their interests. We also rely on the legitimate interest of our users who can’t enter into an enforceable contract with us in being able to access the Platform and content relevant to their interests.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Enforce our Terms, Guidelines, or policies.
We use your information to enforce our Terms, Guidelines, and policies (including through automated means and human moderation). This may include age restricting or removing content, maintaining our For You feed eligibility standards, or suspending or banning your account if we determine that you are violating our Terms or Guidelines.
Legitimate Interests relied upon
: To keep the Platform free of harmful or inappropriate content, to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our Terms, Guidelines, or policies and to protect the safety of users who can’t enter into an enforceable contract with us, including to prevent exploitation or other harm to which such individuals may be particularly vulnerable. It is also in the legitimate interests of our users who can’t enter into an enforceable contract with us, and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Administer the Platform.
We use the information we have to administer the Platform, such as to communicate with users and respond to and process queries, claims or disputes (including when you tell us about a problem, or ask for a copy of your information).
Legitimate Interests relied upon
: To share meaningful updates with our users who can’t enter into an enforceable contract with us about service-related matters, and process their queries, claims and disputes.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Your Rights
: Whenever we use your information on the basis that it is necessary for legitimate interests, you can object to, and request restriction of, such usage.
Your Consent
We ask for your consent to access or use your information for specific purposes. If we do, you’ll always be able to revoke your consent through your device permissions or in-app settings.
Personalised advertising
.
With your consent, we serve you with personalised ads based on your activity on and off the Platform. Click
here
to learn more.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
for this purpose.
Retain your payment card information.
With your consent, we store your payment card information to facilitate future transactions through our Platform.
Information used:
Information You Provide
Sellers’ marketing communications.
With your consent, we facilitate the sending of marketing communications to you by sellers on our Platform and/or share your email address with sellers for the purpose of sending marketing communications to you.
Information used:
Information You Provide
and
Automatically Collected Information
.
Device permissions.
We collect information that you allow us to receive through your device-based settings (such as access to your camera, photos and location services) which we use for subsequent purposes as described in this Privacy Policy.
Information used:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Your rights
: Whenever we use your information based on your consent, you can withdraw your consent at any time. However, your withdrawal of consent will not affect the lawfulness of processing your information based on your consent prior to your withdrawal of consent. You can withdraw your consent for applicable personalised ads related settings by following these
instructions
.
You also have the right to port information you have provided to us that we use based on your consent.
Compliance with a legal obligation
We may use your information including your
Account Information
or
User Content
where it is necessary to comply with a legal obligation. This includes situations where we have obligations to communicate with you, take measures to ensure the safety of our users, or comply with a valid legal request such as an order or disclosure request from regulators, law enforcement agencies or courts. We generally use
Information You Provide
and
Automatically Collected Information
, although it depends on the specific situation.
To perform a task in the public interest
We may use your information where it is necessary to perform a task in the public interest, including undertaking research, preventing and detecting crime, safeguarding children and promoting public safety, security, and integrity as laid down by applicable law. We generally use
Information You Provide
and
Automatically Collected Information
, although it depends on the specific situation.
Your rights
: When we use your information on the basis that it is necessary for a task carried out in the public interest, you have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, our usage.
To protect someone's vital interests
We may use your information where it is necessary to protect your or someone else's life, physical integrity, or safety. This could include providing law enforcement agencies or emergency services with information in urgent situations to protect health or life. We generally provide
Information You Provide
and
Automatically Collected Information
, although it depends on the specific situation.
Your Rights and Choices
You have rights and choices when it comes to your information. Some of these rights apply generally, while others will only apply in certain circumstances. Depending on the scenario, these rights may be subject to some limitations. TikTok Ireland will be responsible for responding to your request within the relevant periods provided by law. If necessary to resolve your request, TikTok Ireland will liaise with TikTok UK.
Access your information.
You can ask us, free of charge, to confirm what information we process about you, to provide certain information about the processing, and for a copy of your information. In-app controls enable you to:
access your information that is available to other users when you navigate to the "
me
" tab on your account.
request a copy of your information by using the “
Download your data
” tool. Click
here
for detailed instructions.
Delete your information.
You can delete or ask us to delete your information. In-app controls enable you to:
delete the content posted on your account, such as your
User Content
and your
Account Information
.
delete your full account. Click
here
for detailed instructions.
request the deletion of a particular piece of content using the in-app reporting feature (more information is available
here
).
Rectify your information.
You can change or ask us to change or correct your information where that information is not accurate. You can change or correct much of your information through the in-app controls and settings (such as your
Account Information
and video content).
Port your information.
You have the right to data portability in circumstances where we rely on contractual necessity or consent as our legal basis. This means that you have the right to receive your information in a structured, commonly used, and machine-readable format and to share it with a third party. You can exercise your right of portability by choosing to “
Download your data
” in your settings. Click
here
for detailed instructions. You can also port your TikTok data through TikTok’s Data Portability API. Click
here
for further information.
Object to the processing of your information
. You also have the
right to object
to the processing of your information in certain circumstances. This right applies when we are performing a task in the public interest, pursuing our legitimate interests or those of a third party, or when your data is processed for the purpose of facilitating scientific or historical research in certain circumstances. In submitting an objection request, please provide all relevant information, including the processing activity you are objecting to, why you want to object and how the processing activity affects you, and any additional information that you think will help us review your request. We will stop the particular processing if we don't have compelling legitimate grounds to continue that processing or don’t need it for legal claims.
Restrict the processing of your information
. You have the right to request the restriction of the processing of your information where (a) you are challenging the accuracy of the information, (b) the information has been unlawfully processed, but you are opposing the deletion of that information, (c) where you need the information to be retained for the pursuit or defence of a legal claim, or (d) you have objected to processing and you are awaiting the outcome of that objection request.
To exercise any of the above rights, please contact us through our
webform
. Before we can respond to a request to exercise one or more of the rights listed above, you may be required to verify your identity or your account details or provide additional information so that we can understand your request.
We encourage you to “
Contact us
” if you are not satisfied with how we have responded to any of your rights requests. You also have the right to lodge a complaint with the Irish Data Protection Commission (TikTok Ireland’s lead supervisory authority) or with your local supervisory authority.
In addition to these rights, you can control privacy settings for your account. Click
here
for more information.
Your choice regarding the use of information across different services.
If you are a user in the EU, we offer you the choice of whether to combine and cross-use your TikTok activity data with our affiliated services, like TikTok Shop, where legally required.
Learn more
.
Data Security and Retention
Security of your information is important to us. We maintain appropriate technical, administrative, and physical security measures that are designed to protect your information from unauthorised access, theft, disclosure, modification, or loss. We regularly review our security measures to consider available new technology and methods.
We retain information for as long as necessary to provide the Platform and for the other purposes set out in this Privacy Policy. We also retain information when necessary to comply with contractual and legal obligations, when we have a legitimate business interest to do so (such as improving and developing the Platform, and enhancing its safety, security and stability), and for the exercise or defence of legal claims.
The retention periods will be different depending on the type of information and the purposes for which we use the information. For example, when we process your information to provide you with the Platform, we keep this information for as long as you have an account. This information includes your
Account Information
,
User Content
, and
Messages
. If you violate our Guidelines or Terms, we may remove
Information You Provide
including your
Account Information
and/or
User Content
from public view immediately but keep your information as is necessary to process the violation.
Our Global Operations and Data Transfers
To support our global operations:
We store the information described in the “
What Information We Collect
” section in servers located in the United States, Malaysia and Singapore.
Certain entities in our Corporate Group, located outside your country of residence (see
here
), are given limited remote access to this information so they can provide certain functions, as described in the Our Corporate Group section in “
How We Share Your Information
”. This access is limited, secure and only granted where necessary under strict security controls and authorisation approval protocols.
We share “
What Information We Collect
” with service providers, partners and other third party entities, as described in “
How We Share Your Information
”. These third parties can be located outside your country of residence.
These entities commit to processing information in compliance with applicable privacy laws and to implementing appropriate security measures to protect your information.
When we transfer your information outside of the EEA, the UK, or Switzerland, we ensure it benefits from an adequate level of data protection by relying on:
Adequacy decisions. These are decisions from the
European Commission
under Article 45 GDPR (or equivalent decisions under other laws) where they recognise that a country offers an adequate level of data protection. We transfer your information as described in “
What Information We Collect
” to some countries with adequacy decisions, such as the countries listed
here
; or
Article 49. In the absence of an adequacy decision, We rely on Article 49 (1)(b) and (c) GDPR to transfer Purchase Information as described in “
What Information We Collect
” to sellers and transaction fulfilment providers in countries without an adequacy decision when necessary to provide shopping features to facilitate the purchase and delivery of products, goods and services, or to process your orders; or
Standard contractual clauses. The European Commission has approved
contractual clauses
under Article 46 of the GDPR that allows companies in the EEA to transfer data outside the EEA. These (and their approved equivalent for the UK and Switzerland) are called standard contractual clauses. We rely on standard contractual clauses to transfer information as described in “
What Information We Collect
” to certain entities in our Corporate Group (as described
here
)
and third parties in countries without an adequacy decision.
For a copy of these adequacy decisions or standard contractual clauses, please contact us via the details provided in the “
Contact us
” section below.
Younger Users
You must be at least 13 years old to use the Platform. If you believe that there is a user who is below this minimum age, please contact us using this
webform
.
To provide users younger than 18 with an age-appropriate experience, certain features are not available. Further details are available in our
Help Centre
.
If you are the guardian of a teen, our
Guardian's Guide
contains information and resources to help you understand the Platform and the tools and controls you or your teen can use, including “Family Pairing” features.
Privacy Policy Updates
We may amend or update this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will notify you of any material changes to this policy by a notice provided through the Platform or by other means. The “Last Updated” date at the top of this policy reflects the effective date of such policy changes.
Contact Us
You can contact us about this Privacy Policy through our
webform
. You can reach TikTok's Data Protection Officer
here
.
You can also contact us at the following postal address.
For users in the European Economic Area and Switzerland
: TikTok Technology Limited, The Sorting Office, Ropemaker Place, Dublin 2, Dublin, D02 HD23, Ireland.
For users in the United Kingdom
: TikTok Information Technologies UK Limited, Kaleidoscope, 4 Lindsey Street, London, EC1A 9HP, United Kingdom.
Sub-policy 7
https://www.optimizely.com/privacy/:
Privacy notice
V 2024-02. Published 12 February 2024
This Privacy Notice explains how information about you, that directly identifies you, or that makes you identifiable (“
personal information
” (also referred to as “
personal data
” in some jurisdictions)) is collected, used, disclosed, and otherwise processed by Optimizely. This Privacy Notice replaced Optimizely’s former Privacy Policy.
SUMMARY
Who Collects And Processes Your Personal Information?
Optimizely does, in the form of the respective legal entity, entity of the global group of the Optimizely group of companies. The Optimizely Privacy Notice describes in detail which processing activities of which Optimizely group entity apply.
What Personal Information Does Optimizely Collect?
Optimizely may collect various types of personal information about you when conducting its business, including (but not limited to):
personal contact information,
personal information related to your or your employer’s business relationship with Optimizely,
personal information Optimizely must collect due to legal- and compliance-related purposes,
personal usage, registration, and participation data which Optimizely may generate through your use of its web and online offerings,
special categories of personal information,
application-related personal information,
personal information which Optimizely may receive from third parties,
personal information Optimizely requires to ensure your or your employer’s satisfaction with our products, services and offerings.
The purposes Optimizely collects Your Personal Information?
Optimizely processes your personal information to:
pursue its business relationships with you, your employer, or your employer’s customers, including ensuring your satisfaction with and keeping you up to date on the latest news about our products and services,
develop and offer you its software products, cloud and other services,
protect the quality and safety of its premises, facilities, products or services,
secure and, if necessary, defend its protected legal assets against unlawful attacks, assert our rights or defend Optimizely against legal claims,
ensure compliance with statutory laws and regulations applicable to Optimizely,
operate Optimizely’s Internet pages, web offerings, or other online events including analyzing the behaviour of the users, enabling you to create a user profile, benefit from an identity service and to promote and continuously improve your user experience,
search you as a potential talent for Optimizely,
transfer it to recipients like other entities of the Optimizely Group, third-party service providers, Optimizely partners and others.
Rights of Access, Correction & Return
. You have the right to request from Optimizely access to, correction of, and/or the return or the deletion of your personal information. You may request from Optimizely to restrict the access to your personal information or to exclude it from further processing. You may revoke a once given consent or object to processing activities which Optimizely may intend to pursue in a given case. When you believe that Optimizely was processing your personal information not in accordance with this Privacy Notice or under breach of applicable personal information protection laws, you have the right to lodge a complaint with a relevant supervisory authority. The Privacy Notice describes each of these rights in detail, including how you can reach us to exercise any of these rights against Optimizely and how to identify, if necessary, the relevant personal information protection authority.
Country Specific Disclosures
. In
Schedule I
, Optimizely addresses several country specific aspects that must be explained in a privacy Notice under relevant country laws. The country-specific requirements include, but is not limited to those, from the EU and EEA, the United States of America (and specifically, the State of California) and the United Kingdom.
Intranet Sites.
This Privacy Notice does not apply to Optimizely internet-pages or web-services which present their own privacy Notice – (for example, at Optimizely Careers).
Learn More
. This summary does not replace or supersede the detailed explanations in the Optimizely Privacy Notice. In case of any doubt, please always refer to the relevant passage in the actual full Notice below. If you want to learn more about each of these purposes for which Optimizely may collect, transfer, and use your personal information, including for how long your personal information is being retained, please refer to the full Privacy Notice below.
______________________________
Definitions.
When we use -
“Optimizely”, “Optimizely Group”, “we”, “us”, or “our” in this Privacy Notice - we are referring to Optimizely North America Inc. and Optimizely AB and their respective affiliates. And “Local Optimizely’ means an applicable Optimizely Group company.
“Service” - we are referring to any of the services and product offerings that we offer as a controller, our websites
https://www.optimizely.com
and https://world.optimizely.com, or any other Optimizely Group product or service that posts or links to this Privacy Notice. Servicesmay include any of Optimizely’s on-prem and cloud software products, web services, apps, online-forums, webinars and events, non-marketing related newsletters, white papers, tutorials, trainings, as well as other offerings like contests or sweepstakes.
“personal information”, we are also referring to personal information and personally
identifiable information
Optimizely as a Data Controller
: This Privacy Notice applies only where Optimizely is the “data controller” (or similar term under applicable laws) and is responsible for and controls the processing of your personal information collected by Optimizely for Optimizely through your use of our Services.
Optimizely as a Data Processor
: In providing our Services, our customers may collect and process data in their utilisation of Services (“
Customer Data
”), or we may collect such data on their behalf, which may in either case include the personal information of our customers’ authorized users. Here, Optimizely is a “data processor” (or similar term under applicable laws), and we have contractually committed ourselves to our customers (typically in the form of our Software Subscription Agreement, and data processing agreement) to process that Customer Data (and personal information) under the instruction of the respective client, who is the data controller in these cases. As such, this Privacy Notice does not apply to the processing of Customer Data (including personal information), and we recommend you read the privacy notice of the respective client if their processing concerns your personal information.
Table of Contents
For What Purposes Does Optimizely Use Your Personal Information
What Personal Information Does Optimizely Collect And Use, And How To We Collect It
How Long Will Your Personal Information Be Stored & Used by Optimizely
Who May Optimizely Share Your Personal Information
Your Control of Your Personal Information
Your Control of Our Marketing Messages
How Can You Exercise Your Rights of Control?
Children
Region-specific Disclosures
Third Party Websites And Services
EU-US Data Privacy Framework
Changes To This Privacy Notice
Contact Us
Region and Country Specific Disclosures
1. For What Purposes Does Optimizely Use Your Personal Information
.
When conducting business and operating our various web presences and other communication channels, Optimizely collects limited personal information of the people it interacts with, including customers, partners, suppliers, vendors, candidates, and any other people with whom we interact. In any of these cases, Optimizely may use this personal information for one or more of the following business purposes:
To pursue business relationships with customers, partners, and others.
Optimizely may use personal information to pursue its business relationships with customers, partners, and other users to fulfill pre-contractual and contractual business relations. This may include satisfying requests, processing orders, delivering an ordered product or service, or engaging in any other relevant action to establish, fulfill and maintain our business relationships. When you purchase or intend to purchase Services from Optimizely on behalf of a corporate customer or are otherwise associated as contact person for the business relationship between Optimizely and a corporate customer or partner, Optimizely will use your personal information for this purpose. More specifically, Optimizely may use your personal information to confirm your opening of an account, manage the contract execution, send you disclosures as may be required by law, notice of payments, and other information about our products and services. Optimizely may respond to related inquiries, provide you with necessary support and process your feedback. In the context of your or your employers use of our Services, Optimizely may communicate with you by post, email, live chat, contact forms, phone or any other medium to resolve your, a user’s, or a customer’s question or complaint or to investigate suspicious transactions. In case of telephone calls or chat sessions, Optimizely may record such calls or chat sessions to improve the quality of Optimizely’s services after informing you accordingly during that call and, subject to applicable law, receiving your prior consent before the recording begins.
Customer Satisfaction
- Within an existing business relationship between you or your employer and Optimizely, Optimizely may use your personal information to help us understand how satisfied you are with the functionality and quality of our Services, to provide you with relevant information on our latest product announcements, software updates or upgrades, events, special offers, and other information about Optimizely’s Services that is relevant and useful to you.
To develop our Services.
To the extent permitted by applicable law, Optimizely may process your personal information for internal research, technological demonstration and development, and to help Optimizely create, develop, operate, deliver, improve, upgrade or enhance Optimizely’s products and services. Optimizely may process personal information to create anonymized data sets which may then be used to improve Optimizely’s Services.
To ensure legal compliance
.
Optimizely processes personal information to comply with statutory obligations. This includes Optimizely’s compliance with applicable export laws, trade sanctions and embargoes of various countries including, without limitation, those of the European Union and its member states, and of the United States of America. Optimizely may use personal information to the extent necessary to comply with these legal requirements. Specifically, Optimizely may use personal information to conduct automated checks against applicable sanctioned-party lists, to regularly repeat such checks whenever a sanctioned-party list is updated or when a user updates his or her information. In case of a potential match, Optimizely will block access to Optimizely’s services and systems and contact the user to confirm his or her identity. If necessary, Optimizely uses personal information to prevent or prosecute criminal activities such as any form of cybercrime, the illegal use of our products and services or fraud, to assert our rights or defend Optimizely against legal claims. To comply with data protection and unfair competition law related requirements. Depending on the country in which the relevant Optimizely Group company operates, and whether you have expressly consented to or opted out of receiving commercial information, Optimizely may process personal information necessary to accommodate your data protection and privacy choices for the receipt of such information and, when necessary to ensure compliance, exchange such information with the other entities of the Optimizely Group.
Technical and Organizational Security
.
Optimizely may use your personal information for the purpose of ensuring an adequate level of technical and organizational security of Optimizely's products, services, online events, facilities, and premises. Optimizely may take the measures necessary to verify or maintain the quality and safety of a product or service which is owned, manufactured by or for, or controlled by Optimizely. This may comprise the use of personal information for sufficient identification and authorization of designated users, internal quality control through auditing, analysis, and research, debugging to identify and repair errors that impair existing or intended functionality, account and network security, replication for loss prevention, detecting security incidents, protection against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, and prosecuting those responsible for such kind of activity. We may further process your name, likeness, and other contact or compliance related data when you visit an Optimizely Group office in the context of access management and video surveillance to protect the security and safety of our locations and assets.
To operate Optimizely internet pages, web-offerings, or other online events
.
Optimizely may use your personal information for the purpose of operating, providing to you and administering your use of Optimizely’s internet pages, web offerings, or other online events. This includes the following -
Creating user profiles
. Certain web offerings linked to Optimizely’s websites, including forums, blogs, and networks (for example @ https://world.optimizely.com), require you to register and create a user profile. Through the user profile you can share personal information about you with other users, such as your name, photo, social media accounts, postal or email address, telephone number, personal interests, skills, and basic information about your company. The user profiles serve to personalize the interactions between the users (for example, by way of messaging or follow functionality) and to allow Optimizely to foster the collaboration and quality of communication through such offerings. The profile settings of the relevant web offering allow you to determine which information you want to share.
Identity service
.
The user profile may be specific to a single web offering of Optimizely, but it also allows you to access other web offerings of Optimizely or of other entities of the Optimizely Group. It is your choice whether or not to use any of these additional web offerings. If you do, Optimizely will make your personal information available to such other web offerings to provide you with initial access. Kindly note that without your consent for Optimizely to create such user profiles, Optimizely will not be able to offer such services to you where your consent is a statutory requirement that Optimizely can provide these services to you.
Event profiling
. If you register for an event, seminar, or webinar of Optimizely, Optimizely may share basic participant information (your name, company, and email address) with other participants of the same event, seminar, or webinar to promote the interaction between the participants and to stimulate the communication and the exchange of ideas.
User experience improvement
. Optimizely processes information that relates to your visit to our web offerings to improve your user experience, identify your individual demand and to personalize the way we provide you with the information you are looking for. For this purpose, we collect information regardless of whether you register with a user profile or not.
Cookies and similar tools
. We and our third-party providers may use (i) cookies or small data files that are stored on an individual’s computer and (ii) other, related technologies, such as web beacons, pixels, embedded scripts, location-identifying technologies and logging technologies (collectively, “cookies”) to automatically collect this personal information. For more information about these practices and your choices regarding cookies, please see our
Cookie Notice
.
To Recruit.
Optimizely is collecting and using personal information of qualified individuals and people interested in our career opportunities from various sources. Job applicants and candidates are asked to apply via Optimizely’s Careers Portal, regardless of whether this is done initiatively or in response to an advertised posting. Optimizely collects personal information by means of the Careers Portal for the purposes of carrying out the application procedures and selecting applicants. You may find further information about how Optimizely collects and uses applicant’s personal information in the privacy notice specific to the Optimizely careers websites and portals.
To offer Optimizely’ Services
.
Optimizely collects and processes personal information for sales and marketing purposes. We aim to keep you updated on upcoming events and Optimizely’s latest products and services. If possible, we may contact you to discuss further your interest in Optimizely services and offerings. This sales and marketing purposes includes the following -
Request feedback, questionnaires and surveys
. To the extent allowed by applicable law, Optimizely may contact you for feedback regarding the improvement of the relevant material, product, or service. Optimizely may also invite you to participate in questionnaires and surveys. These will generally be designed so you can participate without having to provide information that identifies you as a participant. If you nonetheless provide your personal information, Optimizely will use it for the purpose stated in the questionnaire or survey or to improve its products and services.
To keep you up to date
.
Within an existing business relationship between you or your employer and Optimizely, Optimizely may use your personal information to inform you about Optimizely products or services which are similar or relate to products and services you or your employer have already purchased or used. Optimizely will inform you by email or phone about such news only as far as it is allowed by law, or if Optimizely has collected such information in the context of the business relationship. You are entitled to object to Optimizely’s use for this purpose at any time by selecting the opt-out option at the bottom of each marketing related approach.
Personalized Content
.
Optimizely processes information about your interactions with Optimizely across its various business areas and its offerings (your or your employers prior and current use of Optimizely products or services, your participation in and use of Optimizely’s web offerings, events, white papers, free trials or newsletters) to provide you with the requested products and services and to improve our personal communications with you. This data may also be used to efficiently operate Optimizely’s business, which also includes: the automation and aggregation of data to support various analytic and statistical efforts, performance and predictive analytics and data science to support your customer journey and to fulfill such requests. To the extent permitted by law, Optimizely may combine and use such information in an aggregated manner to help us understand your interests and business demands, develop our business insight and marketing strategies, and to create, develop, deliver, and improve our personalized communications with you. It may also be used by Optimizely to display relevant content on Optimizely owned or third-party websites.
Advertising ID’s
. If you consent or as permitted by applicable law, Optimizely may create a hashed user ID to provide to third party operated social networks or other web offerings (such as Twitter, LinkedIn, Facebook, Instagram or Google). This information is then matched against the third party’s own user database to display to you more relevant Optimizely content.
2. What Personal Information Does Optimizely Collect And Use, And How Do We Collect It
Optimizely processes various types of personal information about the people we interact with when conducting our business or operating our various web presences and other communication channels. When you interact with us, we are collecting personal information about you. Sometimes we collect personal information automatically when you interact with our Services and sometimes we collect the personal information directly from you. At times, we may collect personal information about you from third parties with a legitimate right to share it.
Depending on the individual case, this may comprise the following types of personal information:
Contact Information
.
Optimizely processes the following categories of personal information as contact information: first name, last name, email addresses, postal address/location (country, state/province, city), telephone numbers, and your relationship history with Optimizely.
Personal information related to the business relationship with Optimizely.
In the context of established business relationships, Optimizely processes the business partner’s company name, industry, your job title and role, department and function and your company’s relationship history to Optimizely. If you provide a credit card number or bank details to order products or services, Optimizely will collect this information to process your payment for the requested products or services.
Compliance related personal information.
If required by statutory law or regulation, Optimizely may process data categories like date of birth, academic credentials, identity cards or other ID numbers, geolocation, business partner relevant information about e.g., significant litigation or other legal proceedings, and other export control or custom compliance relevant information.
Information generated through your use of, or participation in, Optimizely’s internet pages, web, or online offerings
Usage information
.
Optimizely processes certain user-related information, e.g., info regarding your browser, operating system, or your IP address when you visit Optimizely’s web properties. We also process information regarding your use of our web-offerings, like the pages you visit, the amount of time you spend on a page, the page which has referred you to our page and the links on our sites you select.
Without limiting Usage Data collection,
we and our third-party providers and partners collect certain personal information automatically when you visit, interact with, or use our Service: (A) Log Data (including your internet protocol (IP) address, operating system, browser details such as type, ID, and configuration, unique identifiers, device type and version, the referring URL, date/time of your visit, the time you spent on our services and any errors that may occur during your visit to our Services; (B) Analytics Data (including the electronic path you take to our services, through our services and when exiting our services, UTM source, as well as your usage and activity on our services, such as the time zone, activity information (first and last active date and time), usage history (flows created, campaigns scheduled, emails opened, total log-ins) as well as the pages, links, objects, products and benefits you view, click or otherwise interact with. We may also analyse the interaction between you and your customer using our Services, (C) Location Data (including your general geographic location based on the IP address we collect, and (D) Platform data (if you have an account to use the services we offer as a processor, we may in addition also collect your name, phone number, email address, company information, status in the sales cycle, lead and commercial details (like platform specifics, initial marketing channel), and user and account ID and other identifiers (such as Salesforce ID and Optimizely ID), NPS/account sentiments, Optimizely Academy user profile/history data, account health status, event attendance, status as lead/account, integrations. We and our third-party providers may use (i) cookies or small data files that are stored on an individual’s computer and (ii) other, related technologies, such as web beacons, pixels, embedded scripts, location-identifying technologies and logging technologies automatically collect this personal information. For more information about these practices and your choices regarding cookies, please see our
Cookie Notice
.
Registration information
.
Optimizely may process your contact data as set out above and other information which you may provide directly to Optimizely if you register for any of Optimizely 's events or other web services.
Participation information
.
When you participate in webinars, virtual seminars, events, or other Optimizely web services, Optimizely may process your interactions with the relevant webservice to organize the event including its sessions, polls, surveys, or other interactions between Optimizely and/or its participants. Depending on the event and subject to a respective notification of the participants, Optimizely may collect audio and video recordings of the event or session.
Special categories of personal information.
In connection with the registration for an event, Optimizely may ask for your dietary preferences or information about potential disabilities for purposes of consideration for the health and well-being of our guests. Any collection of such information is always based on the consent of the participants. Kindly note that if you do not provide such information about dietary preferences, Optimizely may not have the opportunity to respond to such requests at the time of the event.
Personal information received during an application for a job at Optimizely.
Optimizely processes personal information of individuals applying for a job at Optimizely as set out in the privacy notice at Optimizely’s career websites and portals.
Personal information received from our partners.
In some circumstances, we also collect, or our partners provide us with, publicly available information which may contain Personal Data that you have published or that has been made available online. The way in which our partners collect this is detailed in their own privacy policies, available on their websites.
Personal information received from other third-parties, including publicly available sources.
Optimizely aims to collect personal information directly from the data subjects. If you or applicable law allows Optimizely to do so, Optimizely may obtain personal information also from third party sources. These third-party sources may include:
(i)
your employer in the context of its business dealings with Optimizely and/or the Optimizely Group,
(ii)
third parties you directed to share your personal information with Optimizely, and
(iii)
third party sources and publicly available sources like business oriented social networks or information broker. When we collect personal information from third party sources, established internal controls aim to ensure that the third-party source was permitted to provide this information to Optimizely and that we may use it for this purpose. Optimizely will treat this personal information according to this Privacy Notice, plus any additional restrictions imposed by the third party that provided the personal information to Optimizely or by applicable national law.
Personal information necessary for customer satisfaction
. To the extent permitted by law or based on your consent, Optimizely may combine the information we collect either directly or indirectly about specific users to ensure the completeness and correctness of the data and to help us better tailor our interactions with you and determine the information which best serves your respective interest or demand.
Our collection of your personal information can also include the following:
(i)
personal information you provide in connection with our Service – for example, account creation and profile information for any Optimizely account or Optimizely ID, and this information includes your email and password, company name, company URL, office phone number and office address, and you may also add or confirm your name, company industry, tax ID, billing address, time zone and source of contact/lead;
(ii)
Contract Information - if your company enters into a contractual relationship with us, we may collect your name, job title, email address, signature (if wet signed or a copy of their autograph is used), customer name and address, and information how you heard about us
; (iii)
payment and transaction Information - if you sign up for one of our Services requiring payment, we collect the information provided in connection with such payment using a third party payment processor to process your payments and as such, all such information is provided directly by you to our third-party processor and that payment processor’s use of your personal information is governed by their privacy notice, although we will only receive the last 4 digits of the credit card number along with transaction-related information (i.e., payment date, amount, device type, IP address and card type), and if any custom billing is arranged, then the account contact’s name, email, job title, company and address may be collected as well;
(iv)
communications - when you contact us through any method of communications, including through one of our website “Contact Us”, “Chat” or “Support” functions or you request information about, or a demonstration of, our Services, we may collect your name, email address, mailing address, phone number, company/company URL, account ID, type of inquiry, or any other personal information you choose to provide to us, such as how many contacts you have/your company has, which products interest you, what platform is currently being used, and meeting dates and times;
(v)
Newsletter, Marketing Emails, and Blog - if you sign up to receive news or alerts from us, or subscribe to our blog, we may collect your email and applicable interests and communication preferences;
(vi)
Optimizely educational resources if you sign up for courses or training at the Optimizely Academy (powered by Intellum) - you will be asked for your user’s name, email, and password, and you may be able to add a profile picture, and when using that platform, a user’s history on registrations, courses taken, scores, and product certifications, survey responses and lead status as well as unique identifier are captured;
(vii)
Optimizely World Communities
.
if you wish to participate in the Optimizely network with other account holders and developers, and find resources, insights and further support from other used, you may participate in various Optimizely communities. In this case we may collect the following information: your account credentials, your Optimizely account ID, email address and partner ID, and your account will also show classifications based on your involvement in the relevant Community and badges showing your based on your involvement/accomplishment (both of which can be manages in the profile settings to be visible or not visible to other users of the applicable Community) as well as all content you share via the Community function, and you may be able to add your name, username, job title, city, country, profile picture, social media (Instagram and Twitter), and bio/signature details that may be visible to the other users of the relevant Community; and
(viii)
Events, Surveys, Feedback and Promotions (including Contests, Sweepstakes, Webinars, and Training Sessions) - if you fill out any forms or otherwise provide your information to us in connection with Optimizely events, surveys, or other promotional events (including contests, sweepstakes, webinars, and trainings), as well as when you provide feedback to us, we may collect your contact information (such as your name, email, and phone number), your organization company, your job title, the office address and any other information you provide to us.
We may also collect your personal information from:
(A)
within the Optimizely Group - we may receive your personal information from within Optimizely Group
; (B)
Optimizely Business and Marketing Partners - we may also disclose personal information with other business and marketing partners with whom we jointly offer products or services, co-market or host events, or who are part of our partner ecosystem, and the information we disclose may include your name, phone number, email address, company name and address, opportunity/interest details of your company, and information on whether your company is a current client of our partner;
(C)
Social Media
– when an individual interacts with us through various social media networks, such as when someone “Likes” us on Facebook or follows us or shares our content on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram or other social networks through, for example, the social media buttons embedded into our website, we may receive some information about individuals that they permit the social network to share with third parties, and this information we receive is dependent upon an individual’s privacy settings with the social network. Individuals should always review and, if necessary, adjust their privacy settings on third-party websites and social media networks and services before sharing information and/or linking or connecting them to other services, and (iv) Service Providers - our service providers that perform services solely on our behalf, such as chat services, payout processing, and marketing providers, collect personal information and often share some or all of this information with us.
3. How Long Will Your Personal Information Be Stored & Used by Optimizely
Optimizely will only process your personal information only for as long as it is required:
to make Services requested by you or your employer available to you;
for Optimizely Group to comply with statutory obligations to retain personal information, resulting inter alia e.g. from applicable export, finance, tax or commercial laws;
to fulfill Optimizely’s legitimate business purposes as further described in this Privacy Notice, unless you object to Optimizely’s use of your personal information for these purposes;
until you revoke a consent you previously granted to Optimizely to process your personal information.
Optimizely may process your personal information for Service development until this no longer necessary or Optimizely is informed that your relationship with the Optimizely customer has changed.
Optimizely may retain your personal information for additional periods if necessary for compliance with legal obligations to process your personal information or if the personal information is needed by Optimizely to assert or defend itself against legal claims. Optimizely will retain your personal information until the end of the relevant retention period or until the claims in question have been settled.
To learn more about how you may revoke consent, please refer to Your Control of Your Personal Information sections below, How Can You Exercise Your Rights of Control, and Contact Us sections below.
4. Who May Optimizely Share Your Personal Information
We may also share, transmit, disclose, grant access to, make available, and provide your personal information as described below.
Optimizely Group
: As Optimizely is making available its Services to its customers only via local business relationships, Optimizely may transfer your personal information to the locally relevant Optimizely Group entity for the purpose and to the extent necessary to conduct a business relationship. Other entities of the Optimizely Group may also receive or gain access to personal information either when rendering group internal services centrally and on behalf of the Optimizely Group or when personal information is transferred to them on a respective legal basis. These companies will use your personal information in the same way as we can under this Privacy Notice. If you would like to find out which Optimizely Group entity is responsible for the business relationship with you or your employer, please contact us at
privacy@optimizely.com
Service Providers
: We may share your personal information with third party contractors and service providers, that are subject to reasonable confidentiality terms, and which may include processing payments, providing web hosting and maintenance services, technology support providers, email and messaging communications providers, analytics providers, data storage providers, and web and video hosting providers and developers. Any such service providers will be subject to confidentiality provisions, and be bound to only process the information on our behalf and under our instructions, unless such service providers act as their own controllers (e.g., in the case we seek advice from consultants).
Business and Marketing Partners:
We may also disclose personal information with other business and marketing partners with whom we jointly offer products or services, co-market or host events, or who are part of our partner ecosystem. We may obtain your consent where required by applicable law. Our business and marketing partners will use your information in accordance with their own privacy notices.
Advertising Partners:
We may share certain personal information (including information collected through cookies) with our advertising service providers and vendors in order to advertise our Services to you. For more information on how we collect and share this information, please see the Online Advertising section below.
Corporate Transaction:
We may transfer any information we collect in the event we sell or transfer all or a portion of our business or assets (including any shares in the company) or any portion or combination of our products, services, businesses and/or assets. Should such a transaction occur (whether a divestiture, merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, dissolution, reorganization, liquidation, change of control or similar transaction or proceeding), we will use reasonable efforts to ensure that any transferred information is treated in a manner consistent with this Privacy Notice.
Legal Obligations and Rights:
We may disclose personal information to third parties, such as legal advisors and law enforcement agencies, regulators, other authorities and other third parties for legal reasons if we reasonably believe that such action is necessary:
in connection with the establishment, exercise, or defense of legal claims;
to comply with laws or to respond to lawful requests and legal process;
to protect our rights and property and the rights, personal safety and property of others, including to enforce our agreements and policies;
to detect, suppress, or prevent fraud; or
as otherwise required by applicable law.
The Public/Other
Optimizely World Community users
: when you post content on any Optimizely World Community portion of the website: Remember, our websites allow you to connect and interact with others. In that case, your personal information may be visible to others as set out above under “Optimizely World Community”.
With Your Consent:
We may disclose personal information about an individual to certain other third parties or publicly with their consent or direction. For example, with an individual’s consent or direction we may post their testimonial on our website or service-related publications.
5. Your Control of Your Personal Information
You can manage and control our use of your personal information as outlined in this Privacy Notice.
In addition, If you have a Optimizely account with us, you have the ability to modify certain information in your account (e.g., your contact information and profile picture) through the “Settings” tab in your Optimizely log-in account. Not all personal information is maintained in a format that you can access or change. If you would like to request access to, or correction or deletion of personal information, you may send your request to us by messaging support in the support portal through your Optimizely account. We will review your request and may require you to provide additional information to identify yourself, but we do not promise that we will be able to satisfy your request.
Please direct any requests to exercise your rights to
privacy@optimizely.com
.
6. Your Control of Marketing Messages
You can manage our marketing messages to you.
Email Communications
. From time to time, we may send you emails regarding updates to our Services, products or services, notices about our organization, or information about products/services we offer that we think may be of interest to you. If you wish to unsubscribe from such emails, simply click the “unsubscribe link” provided at the bottom of the email communication.
Note that you cannot unsubscribe from certain services-related communications (e.g., account verification, confirmations of transactions, technical or legal notices).
Messaging Platforms
. We may use personal information we collect to communicate with individuals via messaging platforms (such as WhatsApp), including to market to you or offer you information and updates on products or services we think you may be interested in. You can unsubscribe from these messages at any time by replying STOP in one of our messages.
SMS Text Messaging
. We may use personal information we collect to communicate with individuals via text message, including (with your consent) to market to you or offer you information and updates on products or services we think you may be interested in. You can unsubscribe from marketing text messages at any time by replying STOP or clicking the unsubscribe link (where available) in one of our messages.
If you do not want to receive any marketing communications from us, you can also at any time go to our ‘unsubscribe’ page @
https://pages.optimizely.com/UnsubscribePage.html
Our customers are solely responsible for their own marketing emails and other communications and we cannot unsubscribe you from their communications. If you believe any of our customers or partners has engaged in unsolicited sending of mass email (or SPAM) and that they are using our Products and Services to do so, please contact our Data Protection Officer at
DPO@optimizely.com
, and the Privacy Office at
privacy@optimizely.com
.
7. How Can You Exercise Your Rights of Control?
Please direct any requests to exercise your rights to
privacy@optimizely.com
Optimizely will take steps to ensure it verifies your identity to a reasonable degree of certainty before it will process the information protection right you want to exercise. When practical and commercially reasonable, Optimizely will match personal information provided by you in submitting a request to exercise your rights with information already maintained by Optimizely. This could include matching two or more data points you provide when you submit a request with two or more data points that are already maintained by Optimizely. Optimizely will not process requests that are manifestly unfounded, excessive, fraudulent, represented by third parties without duly representing respective authority or are otherwise not required by local law.
8. Children
Our Services are not directed to, and we do not intend to, or knowingly, collect or solicit personal information from children under the age of 16. If an individual is under the age of 16, they should not use our Services or otherwise provide us with any personal information either directly or by other means. If a child under the age of 16 has provided personal information to us, we encourage the child’s parent or guardian to contact us to request that we remove the personal information from our systems. If we learn that any personal information we collect has been provided by a child under the age of 16, we will promptly delete that personal information.
9. Region-Specific Disclosures
This Privacy Notice is designed to apply to our website visitors, users of our Service, and other companies and users on a global basis. Please refer to
Schedule I
for additional disclosures that may be applicable to you:
10. Third Party Websites And Services
The Services may contain integrations or links to third party websites or services, including those of our business partners. By interacting with these third parties, you are providing information directly to the third party and not Optimizely. Please note that Optimizely is not responsible for the privacy practices of these third parties or any entity that it does not own or control. We encourage you to review the privacy notices and online terms of those third parties to learn more about how they handle your personal information.
11. EU-US, US-UK and Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework
Optimizely complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (collectively, the “
Data Privacy Frameworks”
or “
DPFs
”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce (
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
) regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal information transferred to the U.S. from the European Union (EU), United Kingdom (UK) and /or Switzerland respectively. Optimizely has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that will adhere to the DPF Principles with respect to such information (“
DPF Principles
”), and accordingly, Optimizely is subject to the regulatory enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission with respect to personal information received or transferred pursuant to those Data Privacy Frameworks and the DPF Principles. Furthermore, Optimizely shall be liable to you for any third-party agent to which Optimizely transfers your personal information and that processes such personal information in a manner that violates the DPF Principles, unless Optimizely can demonstrate that it is not responsible for the resulting damages. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Notice and the DPF Principles, the DPF Principles shall prevail and govern. To learn more about any Data Privacy Framework program, and to view our certifications, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
In compliance with the Data Privacy Frameworks, Optimizely commits to resolve complaints about our collection or use of your personal information. EU, UK and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our Data Privacy Framework policy should first contact Optimizely at
privacy@optimizely.com
.
Optimizely has further committed to refer unresolved Data Privacy Framework complaints to (i) the American Arbitration Association at the International Centre for Dispute Resolution (‘ICDR AAA’) or to (ii) JAMS (
formerly known as,
Judicial Arbitration and Mediation Services), as alternative dispute resolution providers. The ICDR AAA and JAMS are both located in the United States. Either is available to you, at your choice. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint from us, or if we have not reasonably addressed your complaint to your satisfaction, please visit ICDR AAA at
https://go.adr.org/dpf_irm.html
or JAMS at
https://www.jamsadr.com/dpf-dispute-resolution
for more information or to file a complaint. Those services are made available to you at no cost to you.
Alternatively, for European residents, the
EU Data Protection Authorities
(EU DPAs), and for United Kingdom residents, the
Information Commissioner’s Office
, are also available to serve as an independent recourse mechanism for the dispute resolution arising from our collection, use, and retention of your personal data transferred to the United States. You may contact your UK ICO
here
, local EU DPA
here
and for Swiss individuals, the Swiss Federal Data Protection office
here
for more information. Those services are also made available at no cost to you.
Optimizely also commits to cooperate and comply with advice of the panel established by the EU data protection authorities (DPAs), and the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO), and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of human personal data received in reliance on Data Privacy Frameworks.
In certain circumstances, the Data Privacy Frameworks provide you with the right to invoke binding arbitration by the Data Privacy Framework Panel. For more information on this option, please see refer to the DPF Principles.
12. Changes To This Privacy Notice
We reserve the right to change this Privacy Notice from time to time in our sole discretion. We will notify you about material changes in the way we treat personal information by adequately informing you via your account, by placing a prominent notice on our website, or through other appropriate communication channels. It is your responsibility to review this Privacy Notice periodically. All changes shall be effective from the date of publication unless otherwise provided.
13. Contact Us
If you have any questions or requests in connection with this Privacy Notice or other privacy-related matters, please send an email to
privacy@optimizely.com
.
Region Specific Disclosures
________________________________________________
Where Optimizely is subject to privacy requirements in the EU, EEA and other GDPR relevant countries, and the United Kingdom and Switzerland
.
Optimizely Group maintains operations in Europe and may direct our services to individuals located in the EEA, UK and Switzerland. In these instances, the following additional disclosures apply to our processing of personal information. When we use the term “
personal data
”, we mean personal information – that is, information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person.
Controllers.
Subject to your location, either Optimizely North America Inc or Optimizely AB. is the controller of your personal data. In addition, the Optimizely Group entities are each jointly responsible with Optimizely North America Inc and Optimizely AB to process your personal data for the following reasons: to perform our contractual services, as further described below.
Legal Bases For The Processing
.
Regularly, we use your personal data based on the following legal grounds according to the Regulation (EU) 2016/679 (the “
EU GDPR
”) or, where applicable, the “
UK GDPR
” as it forms part of the law of England and Wales, Scotland and Northern Ireland by virtue of section 3 of the UK European Union (Withdrawal) Act 2018 GDPR:
Perform our contractual services, including prior to entering into a contract with you
: If you order Services from us or if you contact us to request our Services, we use your personal data to provide you with these Services, including for account and contract management, to facilitate user benefits and services, including customer support, and evaluate your candidacy for employment and to facilitate the onboarding process.
Justified by our legitimate interests
: The usage of your personal data may also be necessary for our own business interests. For example, we may use some of your personal data to send gifts to you; market our Services to individuals; administer, improve and personalize our Services, including by recognizing an individual and remembering their information when they return to our Services and analyzing our client-base; Process payment for our Services; conduct market research; opportunity tracking, conversion and lead generation; test, enhance, update and monitor the Services, or diagnose or fix technology problems; help maintain the safety, security and integrity of our property and Services, technology assets and business; enforce our
Website Terms of Use
and other online terms for our Services resolve disputes, carry out our obligations and enforce our rights, and protect our business interests and the interests and rights of third parties; and prevent, investigate or provide notice of fraud or unlawful or criminal activity.
Consent
: In some cases, we may ask you to grant us separate consent to use your personal data.
Compliance with legal obligations
. We are obligated to retain certain personal data because of legal requirements, for example, tax or commercial laws, or we may be required by law enforcement to provide personal data on request. We do not use your personal data for automated individual decision-making.
How Long Will We Store Your Personal Data.
We will usually store the personal data we collect about you for no longer than necessary for the purposes as set above, and in accordance with our legal obligations and legitimate business interests. The criteria used to determine the period for which personal data about you will be retained varies depending on the legal basis under which we process the personal data:
Contract
.Where we are processing personal data is based on contract, we generally will retain your personal data for the duration of the contract plus some additional limited period of time that is necessary to comply with law or that represents the statute of limitations for legal claims that could arise from our contractual relationship.
Legitimate Interests
.Where we are processing personal data based on our legitimate interests, we generally will retain such information for a reasonable period of time based on the particular interest, taking into account your fundamental interests and your rights and freedoms.
Consent
.Where we are processing personal data based on your consent, we generally will retain your personal data until you withdraw your consent, or otherwise for the period of time necessary to fulfil the underlying agreement with you or provide you with the applicable service for which we process that personal data.
Legal Obligation
.Where we are processing personal data based on a legal obligation, we generally will retain your personal data for the period of time necessary to fulfil the legal obligation.
Legal Claim
. We may need to apply a “legal hold” that retains information beyond our typical retention period where we face threat of legal claim or intent to establish a claim. In that case, we will retain the information until the hold is removed, which typically means the claim or threat of claim has been resolved.
In all cases, in addition to the purposes and legal bases, we consider the amount, nature and sensitivity of the personal data, as well as the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your personal data.
Marketing And Advertising
.
From time to time we may contact you with information about our services, including sending you marketing messages and asking for your feedback on our Services. Most marketing messages we send will be by email or via messaging platform. For some marketing messages, we may use personal data we collect about you to help us determine the most relevant marketing information to share with you. We may send you marketing messages if you have given us your consent to do so or where we have relied on the soft opt-in rule (where applicable). If you wish to unsubscribe from such communication, please see the details set out under “Your Rights In Respect Of Your Personal Data”.
Storing And Transferring Your Personal Data
Security
.
We implement appropriate technical and organizational measures to protect your personal data against accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, change or damage. All personal data we collect will be stored by our cloud hosting provider on secure servers. We will never send you unsolicited emails or contact you by phone requesting credit or debit card information.
International Transfers of your Personal data
. The personal data we collect may be transferred to and stored in countries outside the EEA, UK and Switzerland in countries where we and our third-party service providers have operations, including in the United States, where Optimizely North America Inc. is located. In the event of a transfer by Optimizely, we ensure that: (i) the personal data is transferred to countries recognized as offering an equivalent level of protection; or (ii) the transfer is made pursuant to appropriate safeguards, such as standard contractual clauses adopted by the European Commission. If you wish to enquire further about these safeguards used, please contact us using the details set out under the Contact Us section of the main Privacy Notice.
Your Rights In Respect Of Your Personal Data.
In accordance with applicable privacy law, you may have the following rights in respect of your personal data that we hold:
Right of access
. You have the right to obtain certain information about our processing of your personal data which includes:
confirmation of whether, and where, we are processing your personal data;
information about the categories of personal data we are processing, the purposes for which we process your personal data and information as to how we determine applicable retention periods;
information about the categories of recipients with whom we may share your personal data; and
a copy of the personal data we hold about you.
Right of portability
. You have the right, in certain circumstances, to receive a copy of the personal data you have provided to us in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format that supports re-use, or to request the transfer of your personal data to another person.
Right to rectification
. You have the right to obtain rectification of any inaccurate or incomplete personal data we hold about you without undue delay.
Right to erasure
. You have the right, in some circumstances, to require us to erase your personal data without undue delay, such as if the continued processing of that personal data is not justified.
Right to restriction
. You have the right, in some circumstances, to require us to limit the purposes for which we process your personal data, such as where the accuracy of the personal data is contested by you.
Right to withdraw consent
. There are certain circumstances where we require your consent to process your personal data. In these instances, and if you have provided consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time. If you withdraw your consent, this will not affect the lawfulness of our use of your personal data before your withdrawal.
Right to Object
. You also have the right to object to any processing based on our legitimate interests where there are grounds relating to your particular situation. There may be compelling reasons for continuing to process your personal data, and we will assess and inform you if that is the case. You can object to marketing activities for any reason at any time
.
You also have the right to lodge a complaint to your local data protection authority. If you are based in the EU, information about how to contact your local data protection authority is available
here
. If you are based in the UK or Switzerland, your local data protection authorities are the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (
https://ico.org.uk/global/contact-us/
) and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (
https://www.edoeb.admin.ch/edoeb/en/home/deredoeb/kontakt.html
).
If you wish to exercise one of these rights, please submit a request by completing our
Privacy Rights Request Form
. You can also always contact our Data Protection Officer at
DPO@optimizely.com
, and the Privacy Office at
privacy@optimizely.com
.
.
Due to the confidential nature of data processing, we may ask you to provide proof of identity when exercising the above rights.
Cookies And Similar Technologies.
Our European Services and emails use cookies and similar technologies such as pixels and Local Storage Objects (LSOs) like HTML5 (together “
cookies
”) to distinguish you from other users of our Services. This helps us to provide you with a good experience when you use our Services and also allows us to monitor and analyse how you use and interact with our Services so that we can continue to improve our Services. It also helps us and our partners to determine products and services that may be of interest to you. Please see our
Cookie Notice
for more information about these practices and your choices regarding cookies. You can also always contact the Privacy Office at
privacy@optimizely.com
for more information.
________________________________________________
Where Optimizely is subject to privacy requirements in the United States, the following also applies.
U.S. Children’s Privacy
.
Optimizely does not knowingly collect the personal information of children under the age of 13. If you are a parent or guardian and believe Optimizely collected information about a child, please contact Optimizely as described in “Contact Us” section of the main Privacy Notice. Optimizely will take steps to delete the information as soon as possible. Given that Optimizely websites and online services are not directed to users under 16 years of age and in accordance with the disclosure requirements of the CCPA, Optimizely does not sell the personal information of any minors under 16 years of age.
California residents.
These California disclosure provide additional information about how we collect, use, disclose and otherwise process personal information of individual residents of the State of California, either online or offline, within the scope of the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018, as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act (collectively, the “
CCPA
”) – (“
CA Disclosures
”). Unless otherwise expressly stated, all terms in these CA Disclosures have the same meaning as defined in our Privacy Notice or as otherwise defined in the CCPA. When we use the term “personal information” in this CA Disclosure, we mean information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household.
Collection and Use of Your Personal Information
.
Optimizely collects personal information from and about you for a variety of purposes, as described in previous sections of this Privacy Notice.
Categories of Personal Information Collected
.
In the last 12 months, we have collected the following categories of personal information: (i) identifiers, such as your first, middle and last name, email address, username, or other similar identifiers; (ii) CA customer categories, such as your name, phone number, and postal address; (iii) commercial information, such as records of services purchased, obtained or considered; (iv) internet/network Information, such as device information, logs and analytics data; (v) geolocation data, such as approximate location data generated based on your IP address or other information; (vi) sensory information, such as recordings of any phone calls or video calls (with your permission, as applicable) between you and Optimizely; (vii) professional/employment information, such as the business or organization you represent, your title with that business or organization and information relating to your role with the business or organization, job application information and other details contained in your resume; (viii) inferences about your interests and preferences, generated from your use of our sites; and (ix) other personal information, including information you submit into the feedback form and any communications between you and Optimizely, as well as information we receive from social networking sites. We collect this information from the following sources: (i) directly from you, (ii) from our business partners and affiliates, (iii) from your browser or device when you visit and / access and use any of our Services, or (iv) from third parties that you permit to share information with us. Please see the
What Personal Information Does Optimizely Collect And Use, And How Do We Collect It
section above for more information about the sources of personal information we collect.
Disclosure of Personal Information
. Optimizely may share your personal information with third parties for business purposes. The categories of third parties to whom we disclose your personal information for a business purpose include: (i) within the Optimizely Group; (ii) our service providers and advisors; (iii) analytics providers; (iv) marketing and strategic partners; and (v) social networks. In the previous 12 months, we have disclosed all of the categories of personal information we collect, explained in the
Collection and Use of Personal Information
section above, to third parties for a business purpose, as described in the
What Purposes Does Optimizely Use Your Personal Information, What Personal Information Does Optimizely Collect, Use and How we Collect It,
and
Who May We Share your Personal Information
sections in this Privacy Notice.
Sale Of Personal Information.
As further described in the
What Purposes Does Optimizely Use Your Personal Information, What Personal Information Does Optimizely Collect, Use and How we Collect,
and
Who May We Share your Personal Information
sections of the Privacy Notice, we may “sell” or “share” your personal information (as those terms are defined by the CCPA) to third parties, subject to your right to opt out of those sales or sharing (see the
Exercise Your Right To Opt Out
section below). In the last 12 months, we have sold or shared the following categories of personal information for the purposes described in our Privacy Notice, subject to your settings and preferences and your Right to Opt-Out: (i) identifiers, such as your name and email address, (ii) CA customer categories, such as your name and phone number, and (iii) commercial information, such as records of services purchased, obtained or considered. The categories of third parties to whom we may sell or share the personal information include: (A) business and marketing partners, (B) online advertising networks and analytics providers, and (C) Social Networks. We may also disclose personal information to third parties at your direction or upon your request, in connection with a corporate business transaction, or to comply with legal or contractual obligations, as described in our Privacy Notice.
Your California Privacy Rights
.
As a California resident, you may be able to exercise the following rights in relation to the personal information that we have collected about you (subject to certain limitations at law): (A) The Right to Access/Know, (B) The Right to Request Deletion, (C) The Right to Correction, (D) The Right to Opt-Out of Sales or Sharing of Personal Information, (E) The Right to Limit Use and Disclosure of Personal Information, (F) The Right to Control Over Automated Decision-Making / Profiling, (G) The Right to Non-Retaliation, and (H) to “Shine the Light”.
Your Right to Access/Know
means that you have the right to request any or all of the following information relating to your personal information we have collected and disclosed in the last 12 months, upon verification of your identity: (i) the specific pieces of personal information we have collected about you; (ii) the categories of personal information we have collected about you; (iii) the categories of sources of the personal information; (iv) the categories of personal information that we have disclosed to third parties for a business purpose, and the categories of recipients to whom this information was disclosed; (v) the categories of personal information we have sold about you (if any), and the categories of third parties to whom the information was sold; and (vi) the business or commercial purposes for collecting or, if applicable, selling the personal information.
Your Right to Request Deletion means you have the right to request the deletion of personal information we have collected from you, subject to certain exceptions.
Your Right to Correction means you have the right to request that any inaccuracies in your personal information be corrected, taking into account the nature of the personal information and the purposes of the processing of your personal information.
Your Right to Opt-Out of Sales or Sharing of Personal Information means you have the right to direct us not to “sell” your personal information to third parties for monetary or other valuable consideration, or “share” your personal information to third parties for cross-context behavioural advertising purposes. If you are under the age of 16, you have the right to opt in, or to have a parent or guardian opt in on your behalf, to such sales.
Your Right to Limit Use and Disclosure of Personal Information means you have the right to direct us to limit the use of your sensitive personal information to certain purposes, subject to certain exceptions.
Your Right to Control Over Automated Decision-Making / Profiling means you have the right to direct us not to use automated decision-making or profiling for certain purposes.
Your Right to Non-Retaliation means you have the right not to receive retaliatory or discriminatory treatment for exercising these rights. However, please note that if the exercise of these rights limits our ability to process personal information (such as in the case of a deletion request), we may no longer be able to provide you our products and services or engage with you in the same manner.
Your “Shine the Light” right means that California residents that have an established business relationship with us have rights to know how their information is disclosed to third parties for their direct marketing purposes under California’s “Shine the Light” law, or the right to opt out of such practices (Civ. Code §1798.83).
How To Exercise Your California Privacy Rights.
To exercise your Right to Access, Right to Know, Right to Correction, or your Right to Deletion: please submit a request by completing our
Privacy Rights Request Form
. You can also always contact our Data Protection Officer at
DPO@optimizely.com
, and the Privacy Office at
privacy@optimizely.com
.
Before processing your request, we will need to verify your identity and confirm you are a resident of the State of California. In order to verify your identity, we will generally either require the successful authentication of your account, or the matching of sufficient information you provide us to the information we maintain about you in our systems. This process may require us to request additional personal information from you, including, but not limited to, your email address, phone number, and/or date of last transaction on our Services.
In certain circumstances, we may decline a request to exercise the rights described above, particularly where we are unable to verify your identity or locate your information in our systems. If we are unable to comply with all or a portion of your request, we will explain the reasons for declining to comply with the request.
Exercise Your Right to Opt-Out of Personal Information Sales or Sharing for Targeted Advertising.
Unless you have exercised your Right to Opt-Out, we may disclose or “sell” your personal information to third parties for monetary or other valuable consideration, or “share” your personal information to third parties for cross-context behavioural advertising purposes. The third parties to whom we sell or share personal information may use such information for their own purposes in accordance with their own privacy policies. You do not need to create an account with us to exercise your Right to Opt-Out. However, we may ask you to provide additional personal information so that we can properly identify you to track compliance with your opt-out request. We will only use personal information provided in an opt-out request to review and comply with the request. If you choose not to provide this information, we may only be able to process your request to the extent we are able to identify you in our data systems. To exercise the Right to Opt-Out of personal information “sales,” you may submit a request as outlined below Additionally, as is common practice among companies that operate online, we permit third party advertising networks, social media companies and other third party businesses to collect and disclose your personal information (including preferences, geolocation, commercial information and internet, network and device information) directly from your browser or device through cookies or tracking technologies when you visit or interact with our websites, use our apps or otherwise engage with us. These third parties use this information for the purposes of serving ads that are more relevant, for ad campaign measurement and analytics, and for fraud detection and reporting and may sell or share that information to other businesses for advertising and other purposes. To learn more about how third parties collect information through tracking technologies and what other choices you may have in relation to those activities, please see our
Cookie Notice
.
To exercise the Right to Opt-Out of the sharing of your personal information for cross-context behavioural advertising purposes (targeted advertising).
You may submit a request by completing our
Privacy Rights Request Form
, and you can also always contact our Data Protection Officer at
DPO@optimizely.com
, and the Privacy Office at
privacy@optimizely.com
.
Authorized Agents.
In certain circumstances, you may permit an authorized agent to submit requests to exercise your California Privacy Rights on your behalf. The authorized agent must provide a letter signed by you confirming the agent has permission to submit a request on your behalf or must provide sufficient evidence to show that the authorized agent has been lawfully vested with power of attorney. For security purposes, we may need to verify your identity and confirm directly with you that you have provided the authorized agent permission to submit the request, and it may take additional time to fulfil agent-submitted requests. We may deny a request in the event we are not able to verify the authorized agent’s authority to act on your behalf. Please note that for privacy and security reasons, we will direct future communications to the data subject on whose behalf the request was made.
“Shine the Light” Disclosures.
The California “Shine the Light” law gives residents of California the right under certain circumstances to request information from us regarding the manner in which we share certain categories of personal information (as defined in the Shine the Light law) with third parties for their direct marketing purposes. To opt out of this type of sharing, please submit a request by completing our
Privacy Rights Request Form
, and you can also always contact our Data Protection Officer at
DPO@optimizely.com
, and the Privacy Office at
privacy@optimizely.com
.
Notice of Financial Incentives.
In addition, we may offer you financial incentives for the collection, sale, retention, and use of your personal information as permitted by the CCPA that can, without limitation, result in reasonably different prices, rates, or quality levels. The material aspects of any financial incentive will be explained and described in its program terms. Please note that participating in incentive programs is entirely optional, you will have to affirmatively opt-in to the program and you can opt-out of each program (i.e., terminate participation and forgo the ongoing incentives) prospectively by following the instructions in the applicable program description and terms. We may add or change incentive programs, and/or their terms by posting notice on the program descriptions and terms linked to above, so check them regularly. Each financial incentive or price or service difference related to the collection and use of personal information is based upon our reasonable, good-faith determination of the estimated value of such information to our business, taking into consideration the value of the offer itself and the anticipated revenue generation that may be realized by rewarding brand loyalty. We calculate the value of the offer and financial incentive by using the expense related to the offer.
Minors.
We do not sell the personal information and do not have actual knowledge that we sell the personal information of minors under 16 years of age. Please contact us at
privacy@optimizely.com
, to inform us if you, or your minor child, are under the age of 16. If you are under the age of 18 and you want to remove your name or comments from our website or publicly displayed content, please contact us directly at
privacy@optimizely.com
. We may not be able to modify or delete your information in all circumstances.
Nevada residents.
This Nevada disclosure provide additional information about how we collect, use, disclose and otherwise process personal information of individual residents of the State of Nevada, either online or offline, within the scope of the Chapter 603A of the Nevada Revised Statutes – (“
NV Disclosures
”). Unless otherwise expressly stated, all terms in these NV Disclosures have the same meaning as defined in our Privacy Notice or as otherwise defined in the Chapter 603A. Chapter 603A of the Nevada Revised Statutes permits a Nevada resident to opt out of future sales of certain covered information that a website operator has collected or will collect about the resident. To opt out of this kind of future sales, please submit a request by completing our,
Privacy Rights Request Form
, and you can also always contact our Data Protection Officer at
DPO@optimizely.com
, and the Privacy Office at
privacy@optimizely.com
.
Colorado, Connecticut, Utah and Virginia residents.
In accordance with applicable privacy law and the jurisdiction in Colorado, Connecticut, Utah and Virginia
,
residents of those states may be able to exercise some or all of the rights as detailed under the CA Disclosures in respect of your personal information that we have collected (subject to certain limitations at law).
________________________________________________
Where Optimizely may be subject to privacy requirements in Australia, the following also applies.
Australian residents.
These additional disclosures for Australian residents (“
Australian Disclosures
”) supplement the information contained in our Privacy Notice and applies solely to individuals lawfully resident in Australia (“
you
”). These Australian Disclosures provide additional information about how we collect, use, disclose and otherwise process personal information of individuals in Australia, either online or offline, within the Australian Privacy Act 1988 (Cth) and the Australian Privacy Principles (“
APPs
”) found in Schedule 1 of the Privacy Act. Unless otherwise expressly stated, all terms in these Australian Disclosures have the same meaning as defined in our Privacy Notice or as otherwise defined in the Privacy Act. When we use the term “personal information” in this Australian Disclosures notice, we mean information or an opinion about an identified individual or an individual who is reasonably identifiable, whether the information or opinion: (i) is true or not; and (ii) is recorded in a material form or not.
How We Collect Your Australian Personal Information.
The various ways in which your personal information is collected are described in the main Privacy Notice. We may also collect your personal information if we record any phone calls or video calls (with your permission) between you and Optimizely.
Overseas Transfers From Australian Of Your Personal Information.
Your personal information may be transferred to and stored in locations outside Australia where we and our third-party service providers have operations, including in the United States, where Optimizely North America Inc. is located, United Kingdom, where Optimizely Ltd is located, and Sweden, where Optimizely AB is located. In the event of a transfer by Optimizely to a location outside Australia, we ensure that: (i) personal information is transferred to countries recognised as having an equivalent level of privacy protection to Australia; or (ii) the transfer is made pursuant to appropriate safeguards, such as contractual obligations.
Storing Your Australian Personal Information.
We implement appropriate technical and organizational measures to protect your personal information against accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, change or damage. All personal information we collect will be stored by our cloud hosting provider on secure servers. We will never send you unsolicited emails or contact you by phone requesting credit or debit card information.
YOUR AUSTRALIAN PRIVACY RIGHTS.
You have various rights under the APPs.
You have the right to request access to and/or the correction of your personal information held by Optimizely. You can exercise these rights by contacting our Privacy Office at
privacy@optimizely.com
. We will respond to your request within a reasonable time. If your request is refused, you will be provided with written reasons for the refusal and information about the mechanisms you can use to complain about the refusal.
To exercise your right to access, right to know, right to correction, or your right to deletion: please submit a request by completing our
Privacy Rights Request Form
.
You have the right to make a privacy complaint to our Privacy Office at
privacy@optimizely.com
. Our Privacy Office will first consider your complaint to determine whether there are simple or immediate steps which can be taken to resolve the complaint. Our Privacy Office will endeavour to complete the investigation into your complaint promptly. You may be asked to provide further information about your complaint and the outcome you are seeking. Our Privacy Office will then typically gather relevant facts, locate and review relevant documents, and speak with individuals involved. In most cases, our Privacy Office will investigate and provide a written response to your complaint within 30 days of receipt of the complaint. If the matter is more complex or the investigation may take longer, our Privacy Office will let you know.If you are not satisfied with Optimizely’s response to your complaint, a complaint may be made to the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner (“
OAIC
”). The OAIC can be contacted by telephone on 1300 363 992 or by using the contact details on the website
www.oaic.gov.au
.
Your privacy
We use cookies to improve your experience, including to personalise content, provide useful features, analyse traffic, and measure ad performance.
By closing this banner, you agree to our use of cookies.
See more details in our policy
Settings
Reject All
Accept all
Sub-policy 8
https://www.reddit.com/policies/privacy-policy:
Skip to main content
Reddit Privacy Policy
We value your privacy
Reddit and its partners use cookies and similar technologies to provide you with a better experience. By accepting all cookies, you agree to our use of cookies to deliver and maintain our services and site, improve the quality of Reddit, personalize Reddit content and advertising, and measure the effectiveness of advertising. By rejecting non-essential cookies, Reddit may still use certain cookies to ensure the proper functionality of our platform.
              For more information, please see our
Cookie Notice
and our
Privacy Policy
.
Reddit Privacy Policy
All
User Agreement
Reddit Privacy Policy
Reddit Rules
Moderator Code of Conduct
Cookie Notice
Econ Terms
Previews Terms of Use
Creator Terms
Developer Terms
Data API Terms
Embeds Terms of Use
Responsible Disclosure / Bug Bounty Program
Trademark Use Policy
Transparency
Guidelines for Law Enforcement
Reddit's Anti-Slavery And Human Trafficking Statement
Earn Policy
Earn Terms
English (US)
Deutsch
English (US)
Español (ES)
Español (MX)
Français (FR)
Dutch (NL)
Italiano
Polski
Português (BR)
Português (PT)
Svenska (SE)
हिंदी
বাংলা
Filipino
ไทย
Revisions
August 16, 2024
February 15, 2024
July 31, 2023
November 15, 2022
September 12, 2021
October 15, 2020
January 10, 2020
June 8, 2018
December 12, 2017
Reddit Privacy Policy
Effective: August 16, 2024. Last Revised: August 16, 2024.
Introduction
At Reddit, we believe that privacy is a right. We want to empower our users to be the masters
      of their identity. In this privacy policy, we want to help you understand how and why Reddit
      (“Reddit,“ “we“ or “us”) collects, uses, and shares information about you when you use our
      websites, mobile apps, widgets, APIs, emails, and other online products and services
      (collectively, the “Services“) or when you otherwise interact with us or receive a
      communication from us.
We want this privacy policy to empower you to make better choices about how you use Reddit.
      We'd love for you to read the whole policy, but if you don't, here is the TL;DR:
Reddit is a public platform.
Reddit is a public platform. Our communities are largely public and anyone can see your
      profile, posts, and comments.
We collect minimal information about you.
We collect minimal information that can be used to identify you by default. If you want to
      just browse, you don't need an account. If you want to create an account to participate in a
      subreddit, we don't require you to give us your real name. We don't track your precise
      location. You can even browse
anonymously
. You can share as much or as little about yourself as you want when using Reddit.
We only use data to make Reddit a better place.
Any data we collect is used primarily to provide our Services, which are focused on allowing
      people to come together and form communities. We don't sell your personal data to third
      parties, and we never work with data brokers.
All of our users get privacy rights - not just those in select countries.
Privacy rights are for everyone. At Reddit, anyone can request a copy of their data, account
      deletion, or information about our policies.
If you have questions about how we use data, just ask.
We've tried our best to make this as easy to understand as possible but sometimes privacy
      policies are still confusing. If you need help understanding this policy or anything about
      Reddit,
just ask
.
Reddit Is a Public Platform
Much of the information on the Services is public and accessible to everyone, even without an
    account. By using the Services, you are directing us to share this information publicly and
    freely.
When you submit content (e.g., a post, comment, or chat message) to a public part of the
    Services, any visitors to and users of our Services will be able to see that content, the
    username associated with the content, and the date and time you originally submitted the
    content. That content and information may also be available in search results on Internet search
    engines like Google or in responses provided by an AI chatbot like OpenAI’s ChatGPT. You should
    take the public nature of the Services into consideration before posting.
Your Reddit account has a profile page that is public. Your profile contains information about
    your activities on the Services, such as your username, prior posts and comments, karma,
    trophies received, profile display name, about section, and social links, avatar or profile
    image, moderator, contributor, and Reddit Premium status, communities you are active in, and how
    long you have been a member of the Services (your cake day).
We offer social sharing features that let you share content or actions you take on our Services
    with other media. Your use of these features enables the sharing of certain information with
    your friends or the public, depending on the settings you establish with the third party that
    provides the social sharing feature. For more information about the purpose and scope of data
    collection and processing in connection with social sharing features, please visit the privacy
    policies of the third parties that provide these social sharing features (e.g.,
Tumblr
,
Facebook
, and
X
).
Reddit allows moderators to access Reddit content using moderator bots and tools. Reddit also
    allows other third parties to access public Reddit content using Reddit’s developer services,
    including Reddit Embeds, our APIs, Developer Platform, and similar technologies. We limit
    third-party access to this content and require third parties to pay licensing fees for access to
    larger quantities of content. Reddit’s
Developer Terms
are our
    standard terms governing how these services are used by third parties. Please review our public
    content policy
here
for more information about how your public content is publicly available and accessible to
    anyone with access to the internet.
What Information We Collect
Information You Provide to Us
We collect information you provide to us directly when you use the Services.
                      This includes:
Account information
You don't need an account to use Reddit. If you create a Reddit account,
                        your account will have a username, which you provide or which is
                        automatically generated. Your username is public, and it doesn't have to be
                        related to your real name. You may need to provide a password, depending on
                        whether you register using an email address, Single Sign-On (SSO) feature
                        (such as Apple or Google), or phone number. If your account does not have a
                        password, we may send you a SMS message for verification purposes. We may
                        also ask you to select interests during account creation (for example,
                        history, nature, sports) to help generate a home feed for you, or to select
                        communities (such as, r/technology) to join.
When you use Reddit, you may also provide other information, such as a bio,
                        gender, age, location, profile picture, or social link. This information is
                        optional and may be removed at any time.
We also store your user account preferences and settings. We may ask for
                        such information prior to you creating a username or account to help improve
                        your experience exploring Reddit.
Non-Public Content You Submit
In addition to the public content you submit to the Services, we also
                        collect non-public content. This includes your saved drafts of posts or
                        comments, your messages with other users (such as private messages, chats,
                        and modmail), and your reports and other communications with moderators and
                        with us. Your content may include text, links, images, gifs, audio, videos,
                        software, and tools.
Actions you take
We collect information about the actions you take when using the Services.
                        This includes your interactions with the platform and content, like voting,
                        saving, hiding, and reporting. It also includes your interactions with other
                        users, such as following, and blocking. We collect your interactions with
                        communities, like your subscriptions or moderator status.
Transactional information
If you purchase products or services from us or otherwise through the
                        Services, you will have to provide payment information in order to complete
                        your purchase. Reddit uses industry-standard payment processor services
                        (such as Stripe) to handle payment information, and those services are
                        subject to separate terms and conditions and privacy policies. We will
                        collect information about the product or service you are purchasing (for
                        example, purchase dates, amounts paid or received, and expiration and
                        renewal dates).
We may also collect public blockchain data and addresses, such as when you
                        purchase or create a Collectible Avatar, receive or mint an NFT, or create a
                        Reddit Vault. However, we never store Reddit Vault private key information.
Other information
You may choose to provide other information directly to us. For example, we
                        may collect information when you fill out a form, survey, participate in
                        Reddit-sponsored activities, promotions, or programs, apply for a job,
                        request customer support, or otherwise communicate with us.
Information We Collect Automatically
When you access or use our Services, we may also automatically collect
                      information about you. This includes:
Log and usage data
We may log information when you access and use the Services. This may
                        include your IP address, user-agent string, browser type, operating system,
                        referral URLs, device information (such as device IDs), device settings,
                        mobile carrier name, pages visited, links clicked, the requested URL, and
                        search terms. Except for the IP address used to create your account, Reddit
                        will delete any IP addresses collected after 100 days.
Information collected from cookies and similar technologies
We may receive information from cookies, which are pieces of data your
                        browser stores and sends back to us when making requests, and similar
                        technologies. We use this information to deliver and maintain our Services,
                        improve your experience, understand user activity, personalize content and
                        advertisements, measure the effectiveness of advertising, and improve the
                        quality of our Services. For example, we store and retrieve information
                        about your preferred language and other settings. See our
Cookie Notice
for more
                        information about how Reddit uses cookies. For more information on how you
                        can disable cookies, please see “Your Choices” below.
Location information
We may receive and process information about your location. We may receive
                        location information from you when you choose to share such information on
                        our Services, including via the Location Customization setting or by
                        associating your content with a location, or we may derive an approximate
                        location based on your IP address.
Information Collected from Other Sources
We may receive information about you from other sources, including from other
                      users and third parties, and combine that information with the other
                      information we have about you. For example, we may receive demographic or
                      interest information about you from third parties, including advertisers (such
                      as the fact that an advertiser is interested in showing you an ad), and
                      combine it with data you have provided to Reddit, using a common account
                      identifier such as a hash of an email address or a mobile-device ID. You can
                      control how we use this information to personalize advertisements for you by
                      visiting the User Settings menu in your account, as described in the section
                      titled “Your Rights and Choices” below.
Linked services
If you authorize or link a third-party service, such as an unofficial mobile
                        app client, to access your Reddit account, Reddit receives information about
                        your use of that service when it uses that authorization. Linking services
                        may also cause the other service to send us information about your account
                        with that service. For example, if you sign in to Reddit with a third-party
                        identity provider, that provider may share an email address with us. To
                        learn how information is shared with linked services, see “How Information
                        About You Is Shared” below.
Information collected from integrations
We also may receive information about you, including log and usage data and
                        cookie information, from third-party sites that integrate our Services,
                        including our embeds and advertising technology. For example, when you visit
                        a site that uses
Reddit embeds
,
                        we may receive information about the web page you visited. Similarly, if an
                        advertiser incorporates Reddit’s ad technology, Reddit may receive limited
                        information about your activity on the advertiser’s site or app, such as
                        whether you bought something from the advertiser. You can control how we use
                        this information to personalize the Services for you as described in “Your
                        Choices - Controlling Advertising and Analytics” below.
Information Collected by Third Parties
Embedded content
Reddit displays some linked content in-line on the Services via embeds. For
                        example, Reddit posts that link to YouTube or X may load the linked video or
                        tweet within Reddit directly from those services to your device so you don't
                        have to leave Reddit to see it. In general, Reddit does not control how
                        third-party services collect data when they serve you their content directly
                        via these embeds. As a result, embedded content is not covered by this
                        privacy policy but by the policies of the service from which the content is
                        embedded.
Audience measurement
We partner with service providers that perform audience measurement to learn
                        demographic information about the population that uses Reddit. To provide
                        this demographic information, these companies collect cookie information to
                        recognize your device.
Information Collected from Advertisers and Potential Advertisers
Information Collected from Advertisers and Potential Advertisers If you use
                      Reddit Ads (Reddit’s self-serve ads platform at ads.reddit.com), on behalf of
                      your business or organization, we collect some additional information. To sign
                      up for Reddit Ads, you must provide your name, email address, and information
                      about your company. Reddit may make information about your company public to
                      comply with applicable law. If you purchase advertising services, you will
                      need to provide transactional information as described above, and we may also
                      require additional documentation to verify your identity. When using Reddit
                      Ads, we may record a session replay of your visit for customer service,
                      troubleshooting, and usability research purposes.
Information Collected from Reddit Pro Users
If you sign up for Reddit Pro, on behalf of yourself, your business or
                      organization, we may collect some additional information from you, including
                      your profile type, name, industry category, website, and organization size, if
                      applicable. If you request certain limited Reddit Pro features, we may request
                      additional documentation to verify your identity.
Information Collected from Reddit Program Participants and Potential
                        Participants
If you sign up to participate in a Reddit Program (for example, our
                      Contributor Program), we collect, directly or indirectly through our
                      providers, some additional information from you (such as your name, date of
                      birth, address, email, tax, government ID, and payment information). This
                      additional information is used and shared with our third-party payment and
                      compliance providers to determine your eligibility to participate in the
                      applicable Reddit Program, facilitate payments, and comply with law. Those
                      providers and their services are subject to separate terms and conditions and
                      privacy policies.
How We Use Information
We use information about you to:
Provide, maintain, and improve the Services;
Personalize services, content, and features that match your activities, preferences, and
      settings;
Help protect the safety of Reddit and our users, which includes blocking suspected spammers,
      addressing abuse, and enforcing the Reddit User Agreement and our
other terms and policies
, as well as comply
      with applicable law;
Provide, optimize, target, and measure the effectiveness of ads shown on our Services;
Research and develop new services;
Send you technical notices, updates, security alerts, invoices, and other support and
      administrative messages;
Provide customer service;
Communicate with you about products, services, offers, promotions, events, and programs, and
      provide other news and information we think will be of interest to you (for information about
      how to opt out of these communications, see “Your Choices” below); and
Monitor and analyze trends, usage, and activities in connection with our Services.
How We Share Information
In addition to the content that is displayed publicly as described above, we may share
    information in the following ways:
With your consent
. We may share information about you with your consent or at your
      direction. For example, at your direction through social sharing features that allow you to
      share content with third party sites like Tumblr and X.
With linked services
. If you link your Reddit account with a third-party service,
      Reddit will share the information you authorize with that third-party service. You can control
      this sharing as described in "Your Rights and Choices" below.
With our service providers
. We may share information with vendors, consultants, and
      other service providers who need access to such information to carry out work for us. Their
      use of personal data will be subject to appropriate confidentiality and security measures. A
      few examples: (i) payment processors who process transactions on our behalf, (ii) cloud
      providers who host our data and our services, (iii) third-party ads measurement providers who
      help us and advertisers measure the performance of ads shown on our Services, and (iv)
      compliance providers who help us determine your eligibility to participate in Reddit Programs.
To comply with the law
. We may share information if we believe disclosure is in
      accordance with, or required by, any applicable law, regulation, legal process, or
      governmental request, including, but not limited to, meeting national security or law
      enforcement requirements. To the extent the law allows it, we will attempt to provide you with
      prior notice before disclosing your information in response to such a request. Our
Transparency Report
has
      additional information about how we respond to government requests.
In an emergency
. We may share information if we believe it's necessary to prevent
      imminent and serious bodily harm to a person.
To enforce our rights and promote safety and security
. We may share information if we
      believe your actions are inconsistent with our User Agreement,
rules
, or
other Reddit terms and policies
, or to
      protect the rights, property, and safety of the Services, ourselves, and others.
With our affiliates
. We may share information between and among Reddit, and any of
      our parents, affiliates, subsidiaries, and other companies under common control and ownership.
Aggregated or de-identified information
. We may share information about you that has
      been aggregated or anonymized such that it cannot reasonably be used to identify you. For
      example, we may show the total number of times a post has been upvoted without identifying who
      the visitors were, or we may tell an advertiser how many people saw their ad.
How We Protect Your Information
We take measures to help protect information about you from loss, theft, misuse and
        unauthorized access, disclosure, alteration, and destruction. For example, we use HTTPS
        while information is being transmitted. We also enforce technical and administrative access
        controls to limit which of our employees have access to non-public personal information.
You can help maintain the security of your account by configuring
two-factor authentication
.
We store the information we collect for as long as it is necessary for the purpose(s) for
        which we originally collected it. We may retain certain information for legitimate business
        purposes and/or if we believe doing so is in accordance with, or as required by, any
        applicable law. For example, if you violate our policies and your account is suspended or
        banned, we may store the identifiers used to create the account (such as phone number) to
        prevent you from creating new accounts.
Your Rights and Choices
You have choices about how to protect and limit the collection, use, and sharing of
        information about you when you use the Services. Depending on where you live, you may also
        have the right to correction/rectification of your personal information, to opt out of
        certain advertising practices, or to withdraw consent for processing where you have
        previously provided consent. Below we explain how to exercise each of these rights. Reddit
        does not discriminate against users for exercising their rights under data protection laws.
Accessing and Changing Your Information
You can access your information and change or correct certain information
                          through the Services. See our
Help Center
page for more information. You can also request a copy of the personal
                          information Reddit maintains about you by following the process described
here
.
Deleting Your Account
You may delete your account information at any time from the user
                          preferences page. For more information, please visit our
Help Center
. When you delete your account, your profile is no longer visible to
                          other users and disassociated from content you posted under that account.
                          Please note, however, that the posts, comments, and messages you submitted
                          prior to deleting your account will still be visible to others unless you
                          first delete the specific content. After you submit a request to delete
                          your account, our purge script commences the deletion process within 90
                          days. After running our purge script, Reddit will not be able to provide
                          access to deleted data. We may also retain certain information about you
                          for legitimate business purposes and/or if we believe doing so is in
                          accordance with, or as required by, any applicable law.
Controlling Linked Services' Access to Your Account
You can review the services you have permitted to access your account and
                          revoke access to individual services by visiting your account’s
Apps page
(for third-party
                          app authorizations), the Connected Accounts section of your
Account Settings
(for Google
                          Sign-In, Sign in with Apple, and connected X accounts), and the Social
                          links section of your
Profile Settings
.
Controlling Personalized Advertising
You may opt out of us using information we collect from third parties,
                          including advertising partners, to personalize the ads you see on Reddit.
                          To do so, visit the Privacy section of the User Settings in your account
here
, if using
                          desktop, and in your Account Settings if using the Reddit mobile app.
Controlling the Use of Cookies
Most web browsers are set to accept cookies by default. If you prefer, you
                          can usually choose to set your browser to remove or reject first- and
                          third-party cookies. Please note that if you choose to remove or reject
                          cookies, this could affect the availability and functionality of our
                          Services. For more information on controlling how cookies and similar
                          technologies are used on Reddit, see our
Cookie Notice
.
Controlling Advertising and Analytics
Some analytics providers we partner with may provide specific opt-out
                          mechanisms and we may provide, as needed and as available, additional
                          tools and third-party services that allow you to better understand cookies
                          and how you can opt out. For example, you may manage the use and
                          collection of certain information by
Google Analytics
via the
Google Analytics Opt-out Browser Add-on
. You can opt out of the Audience Measurement services provided by
Nielsen
and
Quantcast
.
You may also generally opt out of receiving personalized advertisements
                          from certain third-party advertisers and ad networks. To learn more about
                          these advertisements or to opt out, please visit the sites of the
Digital Advertising Alliance
and the
Network Advertising Initiative
, or if you are a user in the European Economic Area,
Your Online Choices
.
Do Not Track
Most modern web browsers give you the option to send a Do Not Track signal
                          to the sites you visit, indicating that you do not wish to be tracked.
                          However, there is no accepted standard for how a site should respond to
                          this signal, and we do not take any action in response to this signal.
                          Instead, in addition to publicly available third-party tools, we offer you
                          the choices described in this policy to manage the collection and use of
                          information about you.
Controlling Promotional Communications
You may opt out of receiving some or all categories of promotional
                          communications from us by following the instructions in those
                          communications or by updating your email options in your account
                          preferences
here
. If you opt
                          out of promotional communications, we may still send you non-promotional
                          communications, such as information about your account or your use of the
                          Services.
Controlling Mobile Notifications
With your consent, we may send promotional and non-promotional push
                          notifications or alerts to your mobile device. You can deactivate these
                          messages at any time by changing the notification settings on your mobile
                          device.
Controlling Location Information
You can control how we use location information for feed and
                          recommendations customization via the
Location Customization
setting in your Account Settings.
If you have questions or are not able to submit a request to exercise your rights using
          the mechanisms above, you may also email us at
redditdatarequests@reddit.com
from the
          email address that you have verified with your Reddit account, or submit them
here
.
Before we process a request from you about your personal information, we need to verify
          the request via your access to your Reddit account or to a verified email address
          associated with your Reddit account. If we deny your request, you may appeal our decision
          by contacting us at
redditdatarequests@reddit.com
.
International Data Transfers
Reddit, Inc. is based in the United States and we process and store information on servers
      located in the United States. We may store information on servers and equipment in other
      countries depending on a variety of factors, including the locations of our users and service
      providers. By accessing or using the Services or otherwise providing information to us, you
      consent to the processing, transfer, and storage of information in and to the United States
      and other countries, where you may not have the same rights as you do under local law.
When we transfer the personal data of users in the EEA, UK and/or Switzerland, we rely on the
      Standard Contractual Clauses approved by the European Commission for such transfers or other
      transfer mechanisms deemed ‘adequate’ under applicable laws.
EU-U.S., UK Extension, and Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Frameworks Disclosure
Reddit complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) and the UK Extension to
      the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by
      the U.S. Department of Commerce. Reddit has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that
      it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with
      regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union and the United
      Kingdom in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Reddit has
      certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy
      Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal
      data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict
      between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S.
      DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework
      (DPF) Program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
Reddit’s compliance with the DPF is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the
      U.S. Federal Trade Commission. In accordance with the DPF, Reddit is also liable for onward
      transfers to third parties that process personal information in a way that does not follow the
      DPF unless Reddit was not responsible for the event giving rise to any alleged damage.
In some situations, the DPF Framework gives you the right to invoke binding arbitration. You
      can do this to resolve complaints not resolved by other means, as described in Annex I to the
      DPF
framework
. In compliance
      with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S.
DPF
, Reddit commits to
      refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on
      the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF to JAMS, an
      alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States. If you do not receive
      timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not
      addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
https://www.jamsadr.com/dpf-dispute-resolution
for more information or to file a complaint. The services of JAMS are provided at no cost to
      you.
Additional Information for EEA and UK Users
If you live in the European Economic Area (“EEA”), Reddit Netherlands B.V., is the controller
      of information processed in connection with the Reddit platform and this policy. If you live
      in the United Kingdom (“UK”), Reddit, Inc., is the data controller and Reddit UK Limited is
      Reddit’s UK GDPR Article 27 Representative.
Users in the EEA and UK have the right to request access to, rectification of, or erasure of
      their personal data; to data portability in certain circumstances; to request restriction of
      processing; to object to processing; and to withdraw consent for processing where they have
      previously provided consent. These rights can be exercised as described in the “Your Rights
      and Choices section above. EEA users also have the right to lodge a complaint with their local
      supervisory authority.
As required by applicable law, we collect and process information about individuals in the EEA
      and UK only where we have a legal basis for doing so. Our legal bases depend on the Services
      you use and how you use them. We process your information where:
It is necessary to fulfill our contract with you, including
to provide, operate, and improve the Services, provide customer support, personalize
        features and to protect the safety and security of the Services;
It satisfies a legitimate interest (which is not overridden by your data protection
        interests), such as preventing fraud, ensuring network and information security, enforcing
        our rules and policies, protecting our legal rights and interests, research and development,
        personalizing the Services, and marketing and promoting the Services;
You have consented for us to do so for a specific purpose; or
We need to process your information to comply with our legal obligations.
Additional Information for California Users
The California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”), as amended, requires us to provide California
      residents with some additional information, which we address in this section.
In the last 12 months, we collected the following categories of personal information from
      California residents, depending on the Services used:
Identifiers and account information, like your Reddit username, email address, phone number,
        IP address, and cookie information.
Commercial information, including information about transactions you undertake with us.
Internet or other electronic network activity information, such as information about your
        activity on our Services and limited information about your activity on the services of
        advertisers who use our advertising technology.
Geolocation information based on your IP address.
Your messages with other users (for example, private messages, chats, and modmail).
Audiovisual information in pictures, audio, or video content submitted to Reddit.
Professional or employment-related information or demographic information, but only if you
        explicitly provide it to us, such as by applying for a job or filling out a survey.
Inferences we make based on other collected data, for purposes such as recommending content,
        advertising, and analytics.
You can find more information about (a) what we collect and sources of that information in the
      “Information We Collect” section of this notice, (b) the business and commercial purposes for
      collecting that information in the “How We Use Your Information” section, and (c) the
      categories of third parties with whom we share that information in the “How We Share
      Information” section.
If you are a California resident, you have additional rights under the CCPA, including the
      right to opt out of any sales or sharing of your personal information, to request access to
      and information about our data practices, and to request deletion or correction of your
      personal information, as well as the right not to be discriminated against for exercising your
      privacy rights. Reddit does not “sell” or “share” personal information as those terms are
      defined under the CCPA. We do not use or disclose sensitive personal information except to
      provide you the Services or as otherwise permitted by the CCPA.
You may exercise your rights to access, delete, or correct your personal information as
      described in the “Your Rights and Choices” section of this notice. When you make a request, we
      will verify your identity by asking you to sign into your account or if necessary by
      requesting additional information from you. You may also make a rights request using an
      authorized agent. If you submit a rights request from an authorized agent who does not provide
      a valid power of attorney, we may ask the authorized agent to provide proof that you gave the
      agent signed permission to submit the request to exercise rights on your behalf. In the
      absence of a valid power of attorney, we may also require you to verify your own identity
      directly with us or confirm to us that you otherwise provided the authorized agent permission
      to submit the request. If you have any questions or concerns, you may reach us using the
      methods described under “Your Rights and Choices” or by emailing us at
redditdatarequests@reddit.com
.
Children
Children under the age of 13 are not allowed to create an account or otherwise use the
      Services. Additionally, if you are located outside the United States, you must be over the age
      required by the laws of your country to create an account or otherwise use the Services, or we
      need to have obtained verifiable consent from your parent or legal guardian.
Changes to This Policy
We may change this Privacy Policy from time to time. If we do, we will let you know by
      revising the date at the top of the policy. If the changes, in our sole discretion, are
      material, we may also notify you by sending an email to the address associated with your
      account (if you have chosen to provide an email address) or by otherwise providing notice
      through our Services. We encourage you to review the Privacy Policy regularly to stay informed
      about our information practices and the ways you can help protect your privacy. By continuing
      to use our Services after Privacy Policy changes go into effect, you agree to be bound by the
      revised policy.
Contact Us
If you have other questions about this Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
Reddit, Inc.
548 Market St. #16093
San Francisco, California 94104
For email inquiries, you may reach our Data Protection Office at
dpo@reddit.com
.
Users in the European Economic Area may contact us at:
Reddit Netherlands B.V.
Euro Business Center
Keizersgracht 62, 1015CS Amsterdam
Netherlands
dpo@reddit.com
United Kingdom Users may contact us at:
Reddit UK Limited,
5 New Street Square,
London, United Kingdom,
EC4A 3TW
ukrepresentative@reddit.com
Sub-policy 9
https://www.discourse.org/privacy:
Skip to content
Privacy Information
This notice describes how
Civilized Discourse Construction Kit, Inc.
, or CDCK for short, collects and uses personal information. This notice also provides information about the legal rights individuals have concerning their personal information and how you can exercise those rights.
Jump to:
What is CDCK?
Who is responsible for data collected about me?
How does CDCK collect data about me?
Does CDCK sell my personal information?
What personal information does CDCK collect, and why?
Does CDCK use personal information for marketing purposes?
How can I make choices about data collection?
Where does CDCK store data about me?
Does CDCK comply with the EU General Data Protection Regulation?
How does CDCK safeguard international data transfers after Schrems II?
Does CDCK comply with the California Consumer Privacy Act and other US state comprehensive privacy laws?
Where can I access data about me?
How can I change or erase data about me?
Does CDCK make automated decisions based on data about me?
Does CDCK share data about me with others?
How does CDCK document compliance for forum hosting customers?
How can I contact CDCK about privacy?
What if this privacy notice changes?
What is CDCK?
CDCK is the company home and primary developer of
Discourse
, open source software for hosting Internet discussion forums. As a company, CDCK hosts forums using Discourse for customers, as well as:
meta.discourse.org
, a discussion forum about Discourse itself,
discourse.org
, a website marketing Discourse and CDCK’s hosting service,
blog.discourse.org
, CDCK’s blog,
and
rubytalk.org
, a mirror of the “Ruby-Talk” mailing list for the Ruby programming language.
Who is responsible for data collected about me?
CDCK is the responsible party, or controller, for the data we collect and process for our own purposes. For instance, CDCK is responsible for data about our customers, employees, open source contributors, and visitors to our own websites and forums.
Importantly, CDCK sets only its own privacy practices, not the privacy practices of CDCK customers or others who host forums using our open source software. You should ask all of those involved in administering and hosting Discourse forums that you use for information about their privacy practices.
Privacy inquiries or notices you send to CDCK about forums we host on behalf of our customers will be referred to the appropriate responsible party.
How does CDCK collect data about me?
CDCK collects data about you:
when you browse a forum that CDCK hosts
when you create and use an account on a forum that CDCK hosts
when you post, send private messages, and otherwise participate in a forum that CDCK hosts
when you visit our website at
discourse.org
when you sign up for mailing lists and announcements
when you purchase services from us
when you contribute to our open source software
CDCK collects data when you use forums that Discourse hosts, whether you use the forums using a web browser on your own computer, or use CDCK’s Discourse apps for mobile devices.
CDCK does not buy or otherwise receive data about you from data brokers.
Does CDCK sell my personal information or share it to serve behavioral advertising?
No, CDCK does not sell personal information or share it with third parties for the purpose of cross-context behavioral advertising.
What personal information does CDCK collect, and why?
CDCK collects data about visits to forums and to its websites.
When you visit one of CDCK’s websites or a forum that CDCK hosts, whether you have an account or not, we use
cookies
, server logs, and other methods to collect data about what pages you visit and when.
CDCK uses data about how you use the website to:
optimize the forum, so that it’s quick and easy to use
diagnose and debug technical errors
defend the forum and CDCK’s websites from abuse and technical attacks
compile statistics on forum and topic popularity
compile statistics on the kinds of software and computers visitors use
CDCK usually stores the data identified above for just a few weeks. In special circumstances, like extended investigations about technical attacks, CDCK may preserve log data longer, for analysis. CDCK stores aggregate statistics about use of the forum for as long as CDCK hosts the forum, but those statistics don’t include data identifiable to you personally.
CDCK collects forum account data.
Many features of forums that CDCK hosts require a forum account. For example, most forums that CDCK hosts require an account to post and reply to topics.
To sign up for a forum account, Discourse requires your name, a user name, and an e-mail address.
CDCK uses your account data to identify you on the forum and to create pages specific to you, such as your profile page. If the forum is public, CDCK publishes your account data according to the forum administrator’s configuration. If the forum is access-restricted, CDCK makes your account data available to everyone who can access the forum, according to the forum administrator’s configuration.
CDCK uses your e-mail address to:
notify you about posts and other activity on the forum
reset your password and help keep your account secure
contact you in special circumstances related to your account
contact you about legal requests, like DMCA takedown requests
You may provide additional data for your account, like a short biography, your location, or your birthday, on the profile settings page for your account. CDCK makes that data available to others who can access the forum. You don’t have to provide this additional information, and you can erase it at any time.
CDCK stores your account data as long as your account remains open.
CDCK collects customer account data.
When you purchase hosting from CDCK, we require certain information from you, including your email address and the information we require to process payments, such as your name and credit card information. We use this information to perform the contract between us, and store it as long as your customer account remains open.
CDCK collects data about posts and other activity on the forum.
CDCK collects the content of your posts, plus data about bookmarks, likes, and links you follow in order to share that data with others, through the forum. If the forum is public, CDCK publishes your activity. If the forum is access-restricted, or access restrictions apply to the specific post, CDCK makes your activity available only to users permitted to see it.
CDCK also collects data about private messages that you send through the forum. CDCK makes private messages available to senders and their recipients, and also to forum administrators.
CDCK stores your posts and other activity as long as your account remains open.
CDCK collects data you give to sign up for mailing lists and announcements.
When you fill out and submit a web form to sign up for mailing lists or announcements, CDCK collects the information you put in the form, such as your e-mail address.
CDCK does not collect sensitive personal information.
CDCK does not intentionally collect or process sensitive personal information, such as government identification numbers, information on racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, genetic data, biometric data, health data, or any of the special categories of personal data specified by the GDPR.
CDCK collects data about open source contributors
Contributors to CDCK’s open source software may be asked to provide identifying and contact information such as your name, email address, telephone number, and mailing address. CDCK also collects and stores information concerning your agreement to our contributor license agreement.
CDCK uses this information to maintain the integrity of our software and software licenses, as well as the integrity of the license agreement between CDCK and our contributors. CDCK stores contributor information for as long as related contributions are incorporated into CDCK’s open source software.
CDCK uses cookies.
HTTP cookies
are small bits of data that websites, like Discourse forums, send to your computer when you visit.  When you return to those websites, your computer sends the cookies on your computer back to the website.
Discourse.org uses these cookies:
Name
Essential
Expires
Purpose
coupon_code
Yes
24 hours
Applies the corresponding discount to a trial signup via promotional campaign
referral_code
Yes
24 hours
Applies the corresponding referral code to a trial signup via referral URL
In addition, look at the privacy notice for your specific forum to find out which cookies that forum uses.  By default, all Discourse forums use these cookies:
Name
Essential
Expires
Purpose
email
Yes
Session
remembers your e-mail as you create an account
destination_url
Yes
Session
helps redirect you to your requested page after logging in
sso_destination_url
Yes
Session
helps redirect you to your request page after single sign on
sso_payload
Yes
Session
used during SSO authentication when two-factor authentication is enabled
authentication_data
Yes
Next Page View
temporarily stores user information during login flows
theme_ids
Yes
1 year
remembers your theme personalization if you don’t tick “Make this my default theme on all my devices”
color_scheme_id
Yes
1 year
remembers your color personalization if you don’t tick “Set default colour scheme(s) on all my devices”
dark_scheme_id
Yes
1 year
remembers your color personalization if you don’t tick “Set default colour scheme(s) on all my devices”
cn
Yes
Session
temporarily stores notification read state
_bypass_cache
Yes
Session
allows the server-side cache to be bypassed during login flows
_t
Yes
1440 Hours
remembers who you are when you log in
_forum_session
Yes
Session
associates an ID, and other security-related information, with your browsing session
dosp
Yes
Next Page View
enables client denial of service protection, a security protection
text_size
Yes
1 year
remembers default text size when a user wants to change it on only one device
cookietest
Yes
Session
checks if cookies are enabled when authentication fails
__profilin
No
Session
used by software developers to bypass rack-mini-profiler
Discourse forums that configure
Google Analytics
, such as
meta.discourse.org
, also use cookies from Google.  Refer to
Google’s page on Google Analytics cookies
for the latest details.
Discourse forums that serve advertisements, such as with the
ads plugin
, may also set cookies used to track you and serve advertisements.
Your
web browser
can show you the cookies you have for any website and help you manage them.
Does CDCK use personal information for marketing purposes?
CDCK may use personal information about our customers and prospective customers in order to directly market our own services and inform you about new products and features that we offer.  We also use the information you give to sign up for our mailing lists and announcements to send those messages.
You can always opt out of marketing communications from us, and you have the
right to object
to any processing of your information for marketing purposes.
How can I make choices about data collection?
You can make choices about how data about you is used on the settings page for your account. When a forum uses access restrictions that vary by category, you can choose who will see your post by choosing the appropriate category.
Most web browsers let you make choices about whether to accept cookies, for specific websites or more generally.
aboutcookies.org
has instructions for many different web browsers.
youronlinechoices.eu
and
aboutads.info
have more information specifically about cookies used for advertising.
CDCK does not respond to the
Do Not Track HTTP header
.
Where does CDCK store data about me?
Most forums that CDCK hosts store data in CDCK’s data centers and Amazon Web Services S3 in the United States. Some forums that CDCK hosts store data in data centers in other jurisdictions, such as Canada and the European Union. Refer to the Privacy Policy of the forum on which your account exists for detailed information.
Does CDCK comply with the EU General Data Protection Regulation?
CDCK respects privacy rights under
Regulation (EU) 2016/679
, the European Union’s General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR). Information that GDPR requires CDCK to give can be found throughout this privacy notice, including information on the
rights of data subjects
.
What are my rights under the GDPR?
The GDPR provides the following rights with respect to personal information about you that we collect or process:
the right to
access
your personal data
the right to
rectification
of inaccurate or incomplete personal data
the right to
erasure
of your personal data
the right to
data portability
the right to restrict the processing of your personal data
the right to object to certain processing of your information, including
automated decision-making
and
direct marketing
the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority
Information on how to exercise these rights is provided throughout this notice and linked above. While CDCK strives to make these rights easy to exercise on your own through your account settings, for more complicated inquiries the best option will be to
contact us
.
How does CDCK safeguard international data transfers after Schrems II?
CDCK relies on the European Commission’s
standard contractual clauses for international transfers
(SCCs) to legally transfer personal data out of the European Economic Area. Because national security and surveillance laws may be in conflict with European data protection rules, CDCK continually reassesses the practical reach of these laws to ensure our data transfers are adequately safeguarded.
Currently:
CDCK
processes personal data on servers located outside the European Union
.
CDCK
uses subprocessors
with personnel and computers outside the European Union.
CDCK has
personnel
in the United States, Australia, and other non-EU countries without EU adequacy decisions under GDPR. These people need access to forum personal data in order to keep forums running, address security concerns, respond to privacy-related requests from users, field technical support requests, and otherwise assist customers.
CDCK no longer participates in Privacy Shield, following its invalidation as an adequate safeguard for EU-US data transfers.
CDCK’s
standard data processing addendum
incorporates the standard contractual clauses.
CDCK is very likely subject to section 702 of the Foreign Intelligence Surveillance Act in the United States, a law that the European Court of Justice has found inadequately protects the rights and freedoms of data subjects.
CDCK has never received any order or request for personal data under FISA 702 or any similar national security or surveillance law of any other country. CDCK is not subject to any court order or legal obligation that would prevent it from disclosing the existence or non-existence of such an order or request.
CDCK has adopted a policy for how we will respond to those orders and requests, in case we ever receive one.  CDCK will suspend processing, notify any customer for forums we host for others, minimize disclosure, and resist disclosure of personal data, all as the law allows.
Does CDCK comply with the California Consumer Privacy Act and other US state comprehensive privacy laws?
CDCK is not presently a “business” for the purposes of the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA) or a “controller” directly subject to other US state comprehensive privacy laws. But we may act as a service provider for CCPA “businesses” or as a processor for “controllers” subject to other US state comprehensive privacy laws when we host forums on behalf of customers. We offer standard data processing terms for customers who are CCPA “businesses” or “controllers” subject to other US state comprehensive privacy laws.
Where we process personal information for our customers, CDCK complies with its obligations as a service provider under the CCPA and as a processor under other US state comprehensive privacy laws. CDCK
does
not
sell
your personal information.
If we process your personal information on behalf of one of our customers and you would like to make a related inquiry or exercise choices that customer may provide, please contact the customer that you interact with directly. Information on features that our customers may offer, depending on their settings, with respect to your personal information — such as
accessing
personal information,
requesting disclosure about information CDCK collects
, and
requesting deletion of your personal information
— can be found throughout this privacy notice.
Where can I access data about me?
You can see your account data at any time by visiting your account page on the forum. Your account page also lists your posts and other activity on the forum.
Your account activity page also includes a link to download all of your activity in standard
comma-separated values
format.
If you do not have account with us but have a data access request, please
contact us
.
How can I change or erase data about me?
You can change your account data at any time by visiting the profile settings page for your account. The settings for a particular forum may also allow you to close your account, on the settings page for your account. Closing your account starts a process of erasing or anonymizing CDCK’s records of data you provided for your account. Forum administrators can also erase and anonymize accounts.
Depending on the settings for your particular forum, you may also be able to edit, anonymize, or erase your posts. When you edit posts, CDCK will keep all versions of your posts. Forum administrators can view old versions of posts, and optionally make them visible to other forum visitors.
Does CDCK make automated decisions based on data about me?
CDCK classifies posts as spam automatically.
CDCK uses data about your posts and other activity on many forums to make automated decisions about whether your posts to
meta.discourse.org
and most forums that CDCK hosts are spam. When
Akismet
decides that a post is likely spam, the forum refuses to accept the post.
If you think a post has been wrongly blocked or removed, contact an administrator of your forum. They can override the decision that a post was spam.
CDCK uses data about posts and activity to set trust levels automatically.
Depending on how administrators of your forum configure the forum, the forum may use data about your posts and activity to award you badges and calculate a trust level for your account. Your trust level may affect how you can participate in the forum, such as whether you can upload images, as well as give you access to moderation and management powers in the forum. Your trust level therefore reflects forum administrators’ confidence in you, and their willingness to delegate community management functions, like moderation.
If you think your trust level has been set incorrectly, contact an administrator of your forum. They can manually adjust the trust level of your account.
CDCK uses community flags to hide posts and silence users automatically.
Depending on how administrators of your forum configure it, your posts may be automatically hidden, or your ability to post automatically suspended, as a result of your posts being flagged by other users.
Does CDCK share data about me with others?
CDCK shares account data with others as
mentioned in the section about account data
.
CDCK shares data about your posts and other forum activity with others as
mentioned in the section about forum data
.
CDCK uses the
subprocessors listed on our subprocessors page
when providing forums on behalf of our customers. We may also share personal data with the service providers we use in order to transact with customers, host our website, deliver content, secure our services, store data, host and manage our open source project, market our services, and provide customer support. These service providers include:
Akismet
, for spam filtering
Amazon Web Services
, for storage
GitHub
, for open source development
Google
, for analytics and storage
Stripe
, for processing payments
Plausible
, for anonymous, aggregate website analytics
How does CDCK document compliance for forum hosting customers?
CDCK provides a
standard data processing addendum
for European Union General Data Protection Regulation compliance on request.  The addendum incorporates the non-EU/non-EEA processor standard contractual clauses of
Commission Decision 2010/87/EU
for any regulated transfers.
How can I contact CDCK about privacy?
You can send questions, requests, and complaints via email to privacy@discourse.org.
European Users with questions or complaints about GDPR compliance can also contact CDCK via mail to:
Civilized Discourse Construction Kit, Inc.
ATTN: GDPR Inquiry
Vijzelstraat 68
1017HL Amsterdam
The Netherlands
For complaints under GDPR, European Union users may lodge complaints with their local data protection supervisory authorities.
How can I find out about changes?
This version of CDCK’s privacy questions and answers took effect January 21, 2025.
CDCK will post the next version at
https://meta.discourse.org/privacy
. CDCK may change how it announces changes in future versions.
In the meantime, CDCK may update
its contact information
without announcing a change. Please refer to
https://meta.discourse.org/privacy
for the latest contact information at any time.
Sub-policy 10
https://automattic.com/privacy/:
Privacy Policy
Your privacy is critically important to us. At Automattic, we have a few fundamental principles:
We are thoughtful about the personal information we ask you to provide and the personal information that we collect about you through the operation of our services.
We store personal information for only as long as we have a reason to keep it.
We aim to make it as simple as possible for you to control what information on your website is shared publicly (or kept private), indexed by search engines, and permanently deleted.
We help protect you from overreaching government demands for your personal information.
We aim for full transparency on how we gather, use, and share your personal information.
Below is our Privacy Policy, which incorporates and clarifies these principles.
Who We Are and What This Policy Covers
Howdy! We are the folks behind a variety of products and services designed to allow anyone — from bloggers, to photographers, small business owners, and enterprises — to take full advantage of the power and promise of the open web. Our mission is to democratize publishing and commerce so that anyone with a story can tell it, and anyone can turn their great idea into a livelihood. We believe in powering the open internet with code that is open source and are proud to say that the vast majority of our work is available under the General Public License (“GPL”). Unlike most other services, because our GPL code is public, you can actually download and take a look at that code to see how it works.
This Privacy Policy applies to information that we collect about you when you use:
Our websites (including automattic.com, wordpress.com, jetpack.com, woocommerce.com, crowdsignal.com, gravatar.com, intensedebate.com, vaultpress.com, akismet.com, simplenote.com, simperium.com, leandomainsearch.com, cloudup.com, longreads.com, atavist.com, mailpoet.com, automatewoo.com, jetpackcrm.com, happy.tools, wpcourses.com, wpscan.com, newspack.pub, and wp.cloud);
Our mobile applications (including the WordPress mobile app for Android and iOS);
Our other Automattic products, services, and features that are available on or through our websites (for example, WordPress.com plans, the Payments feature, the Pay with PayPal block, WordPress.com, Jetpack, Woo Shipping, Woo Tax, Gravatar, the IntenseDebate comment management system, Akismet plans, Simplenote, Simperium, Cloudup, Longreads, MailPoet, AutomateWoo, Jetpack CRM, Happy Tools, WordPress.com Courses, WPScan and Newspack); and
Other users’ websites that use our Services, while you are logged in to your account with us.
This Privacy Policy also applies to information we collect when you apply for a job at Automattic or one of our subsidiaries.
Throughout this Privacy Policy we’ll refer to our websites, mobile applications, and other products and services collectively as “Services.” And if you’d like to learn more about which Automattic company is the controller of information about you, take a look at the section below on
Controllers and Responsible Companies
.
Please note that this Privacy Policy does not apply to any of our products or services, like Tumblr, that have a separate privacy policy.
Below we explain how we collect, use, and share information about you, along with the choices that you have with respect to that information.
Creative Commons Sharealike License
We’ve decided to make this Privacy Policy available under a
Creative Commons Sharealike
license. You can grab a copy of this Privacy Policy and other legal documents on
GitHub
. You’re more than welcome to copy it, adapt it, and repurpose it for your own use. Just make sure to revise the language so that your policy reflects your actual practices. If you do use it, we’d appreciate a credit and link to Automattic somewhere on your site.
Information We Collect
We only collect information about you if we have a reason to do so — for example, to provide our Services, to communicate with you, or to make our Services better.
We collect this information from three sources: if and when you provide information to us, automatically through operating our Services, and from outside sources. Let’s go over the information that we collect.
Information You Provide to Us
It’s probably no surprise that we collect information that you provide to us directly. Here are some examples:
Basic account information:
We ask for basic information from you in order to set up your account. For example, we require individuals who sign up for a WordPress.com account to provide an email address and password, along with a username or name — and that’s it. You may provide us with more information — like your address and other information you want to share — but we don’t require that information to create a WordPress.com account.
Public profile information:
If you have an account with us, we collect the information that you provide for your public profile. For example, if you have a WordPress.com account, your username is part of that public profile, along with any other information you put into your public profile, like a photo or an “About Me” description. Your public profile information is just that — public — so please keep that in mind when deciding what information you would like to include.
Payment and contact information:
There are various ways in which you may provide us payment information and associated contact information. For example, if you buy something from us or earn revenue through your site, we’ll collect information to process those payments and contact you. If you buy something from us — a subscription to a WordPress.com plan, a premium theme, a
custom domain
, some Longreads swag — or if you pay fees to a person or business through their WordPress.com site (for example via the Payments feature or the Pay with PayPal block), you’ll provide additional personal and payment information like your name, credit card information, and contact information. We also keep a record of the purchases you’ve made. If you use our Ecommerce Services (including Woo Shipping, Woo Tax, and WooPayments), you’ll have to create a WordPress.com account or connect an existing account and, for some Services, provide your site URL. You may also provide us with financial details to set up a payments integration, like the email address for your Stripe or PayPal account or your bank account information. Additionally, if you use
WooPay
to make purchases on other sites, we will store the contact information and payment information you provide to that service. And if you participate in a revenue sharing opportunity for your site, like
WordAds
, you’ll provide some additional information — for example, a tax ID or other identifier so we can process payments to you.
Business Profile:
Some of our products collect additional information from you as part of creating a user/customer profile. For example, if you are a Jetpack CRM customer we may add you to our customer relationship database (powered by Jetpack CRM!) using information you provide us including your name, your employer, your job title or role, your contact information, and your communications with us. If you are a Happy Tools user, we use information you provide us like your timezone and location information, your company and team information, and your contact information, to set up your account and power the Service’s features.
Content information:
You might provide us with information about you in draft and published content (a blog post or comment that includes biographic information about you, or any media or files you upload).
Credentials:
Depending on the Services you use, you may provide us with credentials for your self-hosted website (like SSH, FTP, and SFTP username and password). Jetpack and VaultPress users may provide us with these credentials in order to use our one-click restore feature if there is a problem with their site, or to allow us to troubleshoot problems more quickly.
Communications with us (hi there!):
You may also provide us with information when you respond to surveys, communicate with our Happiness Engineers about a support question, post a question in our public forums, or sign up for a newsletter like the one we send through Longreads. When you communicate with us via form, email, phone, WordPress.com comment, or otherwise, we store a copy of our communications (including any call recordings as permitted by applicable law).
Job applicant information:
If you apply for a job with us — awesome! You may provide us with information like your name, contact information, resume or CV, professional or personal references, similar professional and employment-related data, and work authorization verification as part of the application process. We may also collect additional information about you during the process, like background and credit checks (in applicable jurisdictions and only for certain job roles).  You may also provide us with demographic information when required by law or to support our diverse workplace initiatives, such as your gender, racial or ethnic origin, veteran status, and disability status if you voluntarily submit such information as part of your application. We collect demographic information in accordance with applicable law, and do not request demographic information in jurisdictions where it may be prohibited. We will only use this sensitive information to accommodate a disability or illness, comply with legal obligations, protect the health and safety of our employees, and facilitate our internal programs relating to diversity, inclusion, and anti-discrimination.
Information We Collect Automatically
We also collect some information automatically:
Log information:
Like most online service providers, we collect information that web browsers, mobile devices, and servers typically make available, including the browser type, IP address, unique device identifiers, language preference, referring site, the date and time of access, operating system, and mobile network information. We collect log information when you use our Services — for example, when you create or make changes to your website on WordPress.com.
Transactional information:
When you make a purchase through our Services, we collect information about the transaction, such as product details, purchase price, and the date and location of the transaction. This includes when you purchase something we sell or when you use our Services (like
WooPay
) to buy something from a third party.
Usage information:
We collect information about your usage of our Services. For example, we collect information about the actions that site administrators and users perform on a site using our WordPress.com or Jetpack services — in other words, who did what and when (e.g., [WordPress.com username] deleted “[title of post]” at [time/date]). Our
WooCommerce Usage Tracker
also tracks information like your email address, WooCommerce settings, and PHP settings, along with information about your online store, like the aggregate number of orders and customers. We also collect information about what happens when you use our Services (e.g., page views, support document searches at en.support.wordpress.com, features enabled for your website, interactions with our
Admin Bar
and other parts of our Services) along with information about your device (e.g., screen size, name of cellular network, and mobile device manufacturer). We use this information to, for example, provide our Services to you, get insights on how people use our Services so we can make our Services better, and understand and make predictions about user retention.
Location information:
We may determine the approximate location of your device from your IP address. We collect and use this information to, for example, calculate how many people visit our Services from certain geographic regions. We may also collect information about your precise location via our mobile apps (like when you post a photograph with location information) if you allow us to do so through your mobile device operating system’s permissions.
Stored information:
We may access information stored on your mobile device via our mobile apps. We access this stored information through your device operating system’s permissions. For example, if you give us permission to access the photographs on your mobile device’s camera roll, our Services may access the photos stored on your device when you upload a really amazing photograph of the sunrise to your website.
Interactions with other users’ sites:
We collect some information about your interactions with other users’ sites while you are logged in to your account with us, such as your “Likes” and the fact that you commented on a particular post, so that we can, for example,
recommend posts
we think may interest you. As another example, we collect information about the comments IntenseDebate users make while logged in and use that information to, for example, tally up statistics about your comments (check them out in your dashboard!) and display information about your comments in your IntenseDebate public profile.
Information from cookies & other technologies:
A cookie is a string of information that a website stores on a visitor’s computer, and that the visitor’s browser provides to the website each time the visitor returns. Pixel tags (also called web beacons) are small blocks of code placed on websites and emails. Automattic uses cookies and other technologies like pixel tags to help us identify and track visitors, usage, and access preferences for our Services, as well as track and understand email campaign effectiveness and to deliver targeted ads. For more information about our use of cookies and other technologies for tracking, including how you can control the use of cookies, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
Information We Collect from Other Sources
We may also get information about you from other sources. For example:
Third Party Login:
If you create or log in to your WordPress.com account through another service (like Google) we’ll receive associated login information (e.g. a connection token, your username, your email address)
Social Sharing Services:
If you connect your website or account to a social media service (like Twitter) through our
Publicize feature
, we’ll receive information from that service (e.g., your username, basic profile information, friends list) via the authorization procedures for that service.
Financial Account Info
:
If you use WooPayments, we’ll receive information relating to your Stripe account, such as your email address and phone number. If you use WooPay, we’ll receive your payment information from Stripe.
Google Account Information:
When you connect your Google account to your Newspack powered site, we may access certain Google user data such as your Google Ad Manager Configuration (the network code and your ad units) and your Google Analytics data to allow you to access and manage features more seamlessly. For example, you may be able to manage your Google ads and see your Google Analytics data directly within the dashboard of your Newspack powered site.
The information we receive depends on which services you use or authorize and what options are available.
Third-party services may also give us information, like mailing addresses for individuals who are not yet our users (but we hope will be!). We use this information for marketing purposes like postcards and other mailers advertising our Services.
How and Why We Use Information
Purposes for Using Information
We use information about you for the purposes listed below:
To provide our Services.
For example, to set up and maintain your account, host your website, backup and restore your website, provide customer service, process payments and orders, and verify user information.
To ensure quality, maintain safety, and improve our Services.
For example, by providing automatic upgrades and new versions of our Services. Or, for example, by monitoring and analyzing how users interact with our Services so we can create new features that we think our users will enjoy and that will help them create and manage websites more efficiently or make our Services easier to use.
To place and manage ads in our advertising program.
For example, to place ads on our users’ sites and some of our own sites as part of our advertising program, and understand ad performance.
To market our Services and measure, gauge, and improve the effectiveness of our marketing.
For example, by targeting our marketing messages to groups of our users (like those who have a particular plan with us or have been users for a certain length of time), advertising our Services, analyzing the results of our marketing campaigns (like how many people purchased a paid plan after receiving a marketing message), and understanding and forecasting user retention.
To protect our Services, our users, and the public.
For example, by detecting security incidents; detecting and protecting against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity; fighting spam; complying with our legal obligations; and protecting the rights and property of Automattic and others, which may result in us, for example, declining a transaction or terminating Services.
To fix problems with our Services.
For example, by monitoring, debugging, repairing, and preventing issues.
To customize the user experience.
For example, to personalize your experience by serving you relevant notifications and advertisements for our Services, recommending content through our Reader post suggestions, and providing new essays and stories through Longreads for your reading pleasure.
To communicate with you.
For example, by emailing you to ask for your feedback, share tips for getting the most out of our products, or keep you up to date on Automattic; texting you to verify your payment; or calling you to share offers and promotions that we think will be of interest to you. If you don’t want to hear from us, you can opt out of marketing communications at any time. (If you opt out, we’ll still send you important updates relating to your account.)
To recruit and hire new Automatticians.
For example, by evaluating job applicants (including verifying their identity, experience, and other information submitted) and communicating with them by phone, email, or social media platforms.  If the application progresses, we may also collect interview information and background check information.  This may also include verifying information required to initiate employment, for purposes such as confirming ability to legally work in a specific location, setting up payroll, and complying with statutory reporting requirements.
Legal Bases for Collecting and Using Information
A note here for those in the European Union about our legal grounds for processing information about you under EU data protection laws, which is that our use of your information is based on the grounds that:
(1) The use is necessary in order to fulfill our commitments to you under the applicable terms of service or other agreements with you or is necessary to administer your account — for example, in order to enable access to our website on your device or charge you for a paid plan; or
(2) The use is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation; or
(3) The use is necessary in order to protect your vital interests or those of another person; or
(4) We have a legitimate interest in using your information — for example, to provide and update our Services; to improve our Services so that we can offer you an even better user experience; to safeguard our Services; to communicate with you; to measure, gauge, and improve the effectiveness of our advertising; and to understand our user retention and attrition; to monitor and prevent any problems with our Services; and to personalize your experience; or
(5) You have given us your consent — for example before we place certain cookies on your device and access and analyze them later on, as described in our
Cookie Policy
.
Sharing Information
How We Share Information
We share information about you in limited circumstances, and with appropriate safeguards on your privacy. These are spelled out below, as well as in the section called
Ads and Analytics Services Provided by Others
:
Subsidiaries and independent contractors:
We may disclose information about you to our subsidiaries and independent contractors who need the information to help us provide our Services or process the information on our behalf. We require our subsidiaries and independent contractors to follow this Privacy Policy for any personal information that we share with them.
Third-party vendors:
We may share information about you with third-party vendors who need the information in order to provide their services to us, or to provide their services to you or your site. This includes vendors that help us provide our Services to you (like Stripe, which powers WooPayments, payment providers that process your credit and debit card information, payment providers you use for your own ecommerce operations, fraud prevention services that allow us to analyze fraudulent payment transactions, cloud storage services, postal and email delivery services that help us stay in touch with you, customer chat and email support services that help us communicate with you, registrars, registries, data escrow services that allow us to provide domain registration services, and your hosting provider if your site is not hosted by Automattic); those that assist us with our marketing efforts (e.g., by providing tools for identifying a specific marketing target group or improving our marketing campaigns, and by placing ads to market our services); those that help us understand and enhance our Services (like analytics providers); those that make tools to help us run our operations (like programs that help us with task management, scheduling, word processing, email and other communications, and collaboration among our teams); other third-party tools that help us manage operations; and companies that make products available on our websites (like the extensions on woocommerce.com), who may need information about you in order to, for example, provide technical or other support services to you. We require vendors to agree to privacy commitments in order to share information with them. Other vendors are listed in our more specific policies (e.g., our
Cookie Policy
).
Legal and regulatory requirements:
We may disclose information about you in response to a subpoena, court order, or other governmental request. For more information on how we respond to requests for information about WordPress.com users, please see our
Legal Guidelines
. Additionally, if you have a domain registered with WordPress.com, we may share your information to comply with the Internet Corporation for Assigned Names and Numbers’ (ICANN) regulations, rules, or policies. For example, your information relating to your domain registration may be available in the WHOIS database, or we may be required to share your information with ICANN-approved Dispute Resolution Service Providers. Please see our
Domain Registrations and Privacy support document
for more details.
To protect rights, property, and others:
We may disclose information about you when we believe in good faith that disclosure is reasonably necessary to protect the property or rights of Automattic, third parties, or the public at large. For example, if we have a good faith belief that there is an imminent danger of death or serious physical injury, we
may disclose information related to the emergency without delay
.
Business transfers:
In connection with any merger, sale of company assets, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business by another company, or in the unlikely event that Automattic goes out of business or enters bankruptcy, user information would likely be one of the assets that is transferred or acquired by a third party. If any of these events were to happen, this Privacy Policy would continue to apply to your information and the party receiving your information may continue to use your information, but only consistent with this Privacy Policy.
With your consent:
We may share and disclose information with your consent or at your direction. For example, we may share your information with third parties when you authorize us to do so, like when you connected your site to a social media service through our Publicize feature.
Aggregated or de-identified information:
We may share information that has been aggregated or de-identified, so that it can no longer reasonably be used to identify you. For instance, we may publish aggregate statistics about the use of our Services, or share a hashed version of your email address to facilitate customized ad campaigns on other platforms.
Site owners:
If you have a WordPress.com account and interact with another site using our Services, your information may be shared with the administrators of the site. For example, if you leave a comment on a site created on WordPress.com or running Jetpack, your IP address and the email address associated with your WordPress.com account may be shared with the administrator(s) of the site where you left the comment. Or if you make a payment (like via the
Payments feature
) to a site, your public display name, user name, and email address may be shared with the administrator(s) of the site. Or if you follow/subscribe to another WordPress.com site we will share your email address with the site owner.
Published support requests:
If you send us a request for assistance (for example, via a support email or one of our other feedback mechanisms), we reserve the right to publish that request in order to clarify or respond to your request, or to help us support other users.
Information Shared Publicly
Information that you choose to make public is — you guessed it — disclosed publicly.
That means information like your public profile, posts, other content that you make public on your website, and your “Likes” and comments on other websites are all available to others — and we hope they get a lot of views!
For example, the photo that you upload to your public profile, or a default image if you haven’t uploaded one, is your
G
lobally
R
ecognized Avatar, or Gravatar — get it? :) Your Gravatar, along with other public profile information, displays alongside the comments and “Likes” that you make on other users’ websites while logged in to your WordPress.com account. Your Gravatar and public profile information may also display with your comments, “Likes,” and other interactions on websites that use our Gravatar service, if the email address associated with your account is the same email address you use on the other website.
We also provide a “Firehose” stream of public data (like posts and comments) from some sites that use our Services to provide that data to Firehose subscribers, who may view and analyze the content (all subject to our Terms of Service), but do not have rights to re-publish it publicly. Find out more about opting out of the Firehose for
WordPress.com
and
Jetpack
sites. Public information may also be indexed by search engines or used by third parties.
Please keep all of this in mind when deciding what you would like to share publicly.
How Long We Keep Information
We generally discard information about you when it’s no longer needed for the purposes for which we collect and use it — described in the section above on How and Why We Use Information — and we’re not legally required to keep it.
For example, we keep web server logs that record information about a visitor to one of Automattic’s websites, like the visitor’s IP address, browser type, and operating system, for approximately 30 days. We retain the logs for this period of time in order to, among other things, analyze traffic to Automattic’s websites and investigate issues if something goes wrong on one of our websites.
As another example, when you delete a post, page, or comment from your WordPress.com site, it stays in your Trash folder for thirty days in case you change your mind and would like to restore that content, because starting from scratch is no fun. After the thirty days are up, the deleted content may remain on our backups and caches until purged.
If you are a job applicant, we will keep your personal data during the application process, and for a certain period thereafter. To determine that period, we take into account a number of factors, like our legal and regulatory obligations (such as equal opportunity obligations) and whether we may need to retain personal data for internal business purposes like analyzing our applicant pool.
Security
While no online service is 100% secure, we work very hard to protect information about you against unauthorized access, use, alteration, or destruction, and take reasonable measures to do so. We monitor our Services for potential vulnerabilities and attacks.
To enhance the security of your account, we encourage you to enable our advanced security settings, like
Two Step Authentication
.
Choices
You have several choices available when it comes to information about you:
Limit the information that you provide:
If you have an account with us, you can choose not to provide the optional account information, profile information, and transaction and billing information. Please keep in mind that if you do not provide this information, certain features of our Services — for example, premium themes that carry an additional charge — may not be accessible. If you are a job applicant, and you choose not to provide certain data elements to us, we may not be able to proceed with the recruitment process.
Limit access to information on your mobile device:
Your mobile device operating system should provide you with the option to discontinue our ability to collect stored information or location information via our mobile apps. If you choose to limit this, you may not be able to use certain features, like geotagging for photographs.
Opt out of marketing communications:
You may opt out of receiving promotional communications from us. Just follow the instructions in those communications or let us know. If you opt out of promotional communications, we may still send you other communications, like those about your account and legal notices.
Set your browser to reject cookies:
At this time, Automattic does not respond to “do not track” signals across all of our Services. However, you can
usually choose
to set your browser to remove or reject browser cookies before using Automattic’s websites, with the drawback that certain features of Automattic’s websites may not function properly without the aid of cookies.
Opt out of our internal analytics program:
You can do this through your user settings. By opting out, you will stop sharing information with our analytics tool about events or actions that happen after the opt-out, while you’re logged in to your WordPress.com account. For more information, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
Close your account:
While we’d be very sad to see you go, you can close your account if you no longer want to use our Services. (
Here
are account closure instructions for WordPress.com accounts.) Please keep in mind that we may continue to retain your information after closing your account, as described in How Long We Keep Information above — for example, when that information is reasonably needed to comply with (or demonstrate our compliance with) legal obligations such as law enforcement requests, or reasonably needed for our legitimate business interests.
Your Rights
If you are located in certain parts of the world, including some US states and countries that fall under the scope of the European General Data Protection Regulation (aka the “GDPR”), you may have certain rights regarding your personal information, like the right to request access to or deletion of your data.
European General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR)
If you are located in a country that falls under the scope of the GDPR, data protection laws give you certain rights with respect to your personal data, subject to any exemptions provided by the law, including the rights to:
Request access to your personal data;
Request correction or deletion of your personal data;
Object to our use and processing of your personal data;
Request that we limit our use and processing of your personal data; and
Request portability of your personal data.
You also have the right to make a complaint to a government supervisory authority.
US Privacy Laws
Laws in some US states require us to provide residents with additional information about the categories of personal information we collect and share, where we get that personal information, and how and why we use it. You’ll find that information in this section (if you are a California resident, please note that this is the Notice at Collection we are required to provide you under California law).
In the last 12 months, we collected the following categories of personal information, depending on the Services used:
Identifiers (like your name, contact information, and device and online identifiers);
Commercial information (your billing information and purchase history, for example);
Characteristics protected by law (for example, you might provide your gender as part of a research survey for us or you may choose to voluntarily disclose your race or veteran status as part of your job application);
Internet or other electronic network activity information (such as your usage of our Services, like the actions you take as an administrator of a WordPress.com site);
Geolocation data (such as your location based on your IP address);
Audio, electronic, visual or similar information (such as your profile picture, if you uploaded one);
Professional or employment-related information (for example, your company and team information if you are a Happy Tools user, or information you provide in a job application); and
Inferences we make (such as likelihood of retention or attrition).
If you are a job applicant, we may have also collected:
Education information, such as the education you disclose in your job application.
You can find more information about what we collect and sources of that information in the
Information We Collect section
above.
We collect personal information for the business and commercial purposes described in the
How and Why We Use Information section
. And we share this information with the categories of third parties described in the
Sharing Information section
. We retain this information for the length of time described in our
How Long We Keep Information section
.
In some US states you have additional rights subject to any exemptions provided by your state’s respective law, including the right to:
Request a copy of the specific pieces of information we collect about you and, if you’re in California, to know the categories of personal information we collect, the categories of business or commercial purpose for collecting and using it, the categories of sources from which the information came, and the categories of third parties we share it with;
Request deletion of personal information we collect or maintain;
Request correction of personal information we collect or maintain;
Opt out of the sale or sharing of personal information;
Receive a copy of your information in a readily portable format; and
Not receive discriminatory treatment for exercising your rights.
You can find detailed metrics about Automattic’s compliance with these rights in
our Privacy Report
.
Right to Opt Out
We never directly sell your personal information in the conventional sense (i.e., for money).
We may share your information as necessary with our third-party service providers to provide our services to you. To the extent that we share your information with certain advertising, marketing, or analytics vendors, this can be considered a “sale” or “share” in certain U.S. States, which you may have the right to opt out of.
You can learn more about this sharing and how to opt out by clicking the “Do Not Sell My Personal Information” link in the footer of our websites, or from the settings page within our apps. Note that in some instances this link will only display to individuals visiting our sites from within the relevant states.
Our opt-out is managed through cookies, so if you delete cookies, your browser is set to delete cookies automatically after a certain length of time, or if you visit sites in a different browser, you’ll need to make this selection again.
We also respect the GPC browser signal and will treat it as a valid means of communicating your desire to opt out.
We do not collect or process your sensitive (and potentially sensitive) personal information except where it is strictly necessary to provide you with our service, where the processing is not for the purpose of inferring characteristics about you, or for other purposes that do not require an option to limit under California law. We don’t knowingly sell or share personal information of those under 16.
Your Information & Personalized Advertising
Our mission is to democratize publishing and commerce, and that means making our Services accessible to as many people as possible. We show ads on some of our users’ sites as well as some of our own sites, and the revenue these ads generate lets us offer free access to some of our Services so that money doesn’t become an obstacle to having a voice. Our ads program also allows our users to earn revenue to support and grow their own sites. As part of our advertising program, we and our users do use cookies to share certain device identifiers and information about your browsing activities with our advertising partners, and those advertising partners may use that information to show you personalized ads on some of our users’ sites and some of our own.
The personal information we share includes online identifiers; internet or other network or device activity (such as cookie information, other device identifiers, and IP address); and geolocation data (approximate location information from your IP address). These disclosures may be considered a “sale” or “share” of information under some US state privacy laws. We do not sell (or share) information through our ads program that identifies you personally, like your name or contact information. Learn how you can opt out by going to
Advertising on WordPress.com Sites and Sites in the WordAds Program
.
Contacting Us About These Rights
You can usually access, correct, or delete your personal data using your account settings and tools that we offer, but if you aren’t able to or you’d like to contact us about one of the other rights, scroll down to “
How to Reach Us
” to, well, find out how to reach us.
When you contact us about one of your rights under this section, we’ll need to verify that you are the right person before we disclose or delete anything. For example, if you are a user, we will need you to contact us from the email address associated with your account. You can also designate an authorized agent to make a request on your behalf by giving us written authorization. We may still require you to verify your identity with us.
Appeals Process for Rights Requests Denials
In some circumstances we may deny your request to exercise one of these rights. For example, if we cannot verify that you are the account owner we may deny your request to access the personal information associated with your account. As another example, if we are legally required to maintain a copy of your personal information we may deny your request to delete your personal information.
In the event that we deny your request, we will communicate this fact to you in writing. You may appeal our decision by responding in writing to our denial email and stating that you would like to appeal. All appeals will be reviewed by an internal expert who was not involved in your original request. In the event that your appeal is also denied this information will be communicated to you in writing.  Please note that the appeal process does not apply to job applicants.
If your appeal is denied, in some US states you may refer the denied appeal to the state attorney general if you believe the denial is in conflict with your legal rights. The process for how to do this will be communicated to you in writing at the same time we send you our decision about your appeal.
Controllers and Responsible Companies
Automattic’s Services are worldwide. Different Automattic companies are the controller (or co-controller) of personal information, which means that they are the company responsible for processing that information, based on the particular service and the location of the individual using our Services.
Depending on the Services you use, more than one company may be the controller of your personal data. Generally, the “controller” is the Automattic company that entered into the contract with you under the Terms of Service for the product or service you use. In addition, Automattic Inc., our US-based company, is the controller for some of the processing activities across all of our Services worldwide.
The chart below explains the current controllers for processing your personal information. We use the term “Designated Countries” to refer to Australia, Canada, Japan, Mexico, New Zealand, Russia, and all countries located in Europe (including the UK and ROI).
Automattic Services (except Woo)
If you reside outside of the Designated Countries:
Automattic Inc.
60 29th Street #343
San Francisco, CA 94110
If you reside in the Designated Countries:
Aut O’Mattic A8C Ireland Ltd.
Grand Canal Dock, 25 Herbert Pl
Dublin, D02 AY86
IrelandAutomattic Inc. is also the controller for some of the processing activities related to Services provided by Aut O’Mattic A8C Ireland Ltd.
Woo Services
Woo services includes WooCommerce, WooPayments, Woo Shipping, Woo Tax, MailPoet, and other products and services available at woocommerce.com.
If you reside outside of the Designated Countries:
WooCommerce, Inc.
60 29th Street #343
San Francisco, CA 94110Automattic Inc. is also the controller for some of the processing activities related to Services provided by WooCommerce, Inc.
If you reside in the Designated Countries:
WooCommerce Ireland Ltd.
Grand Canal Dock, 25 Herbert Pl
Dublin, D02 AY86
IrelandAutomattic Inc and WooCommerce, Inc are also the joint controllers for some of the processing activities related to Services provided by WooCommerce Ireland Ltd.
How to Reach Us
If you have a question about this Privacy Policy, or you would like to contact us about any of the rights mentioned in the
Your Rights section
above, please contact us through our
web form
or via
email
. These are the fastest ways to get a response to your inquiry, but you can also contact us by telephone at 1-877-273-3049.
Other Things You Should Know (Keep Reading!)
Transferring Information
Because Automattic’s Services are offered worldwide, the information about you that we process when you use the Services in the EU may be used, stored, and/or accessed by individuals operating outside the European Economic Area (EEA) who work for us, other members of our group of companies, or third-party data processors. This is required for the purposes listed in the
How and Why We Use Information section
above.
When providing information about you to entities outside the EEA, we will take appropriate measures to ensure that the recipient protects your personal information adequately in accordance with this Privacy Policy as required by applicable law. These measures include entering into European Commission approved standard contractual arrangements with entities based in countries outside the EEA.
You can ask us for more information about the steps we take to protect your personal information when transferring it from the EU.
Ads and Analytics Services Provided by Others
Ads appearing on any of our Services may be delivered by advertising networks. Other parties may also provide analytics services via our Services. These ad networks and analytics providers may set tracking technologies (like cookies) to collect information about your use of our Services and across other websites and online services. These technologies allow these third parties to recognize your device to compile information about you or others who use your device. This information allows us and other companies to, among other things, analyze and track usage, determine the popularity of certain content, and deliver ads that may be more targeted to your interests. Please note this Privacy Policy only covers the collection of information by Automattic and does not cover the collection of information by any third-party advertisers or analytics providers.
Third-Party Software and Services
If you’d like to use third-party plugins or embeds, WooPayments (powered by Stripe), Woo extensions that enable services provided by third parties, or other third-party software or services, please keep in mind that interacting with them may mean providing information about yourself (or your site visitors) to those third parties. For example, some third-party services may request or require access to your (yours, your visitors’, or customers’) data via a pixel or cookie. Please note that if you use the third-party service or grant access, your data will be handled in accordance with the third party’s privacy policy and practices. We don’t own or control these third parties, and they have their own rules about information collection, use, and sharing, which you should review before using the software or services.
Visitors to Our Users’ Websites
We also process information about visitors to our users’ websites, on behalf of our users and in accordance with our user agreements. Please note that our processing of that information on behalf of our users for their websites isn’t covered by this Privacy Policy. We encourage our users to post a privacy policy that accurately describes their practices on data collection, use, and sharing of personal information. If you’d like, you can also read more about the data we collect on behalf of our users in our
Privacy Notice
.
Users control the content posted on their sites, so any disputes regarding content on a user’s site should be made directly to the site owner, through their “contact us” page, at an email address they provide, or by leaving a comment on the site.
Privacy Policy Changes
Although most changes are likely to be minor, Automattic may change its Privacy Policy from time to time. Automattic encourages visitors to frequently check this page for any changes to its Privacy Policy. If we make changes, we will notify you by revising the change log below, and, in some cases, we may provide additional notice (like adding a statement to our homepage or the
WordPress.com Blog,
or sending you a notification through email or your dashboard). Your further use of the Services after a change to our Privacy Policy will be subject to the updated policy.
Other Information and Resources
Jetpack Privacy Center
Woo and the GDPR
Translation
Our Privacy Policy was originally written in English (US). We may translate it into other languages. For example:
French:
https://automattic.com/fr/privacy
Spanish:
https://automattic.com/es/privacy
German:
https://automattic.com/de/privacy
In the event of a conflict between a translated version of our Privacy Policy and the English version, the English version will control.
That’s it! Thanks for reading.
Change log
April 22, 2024:
Removed the outdated list of specific US states covered by the US Privacy Laws section
October 31, 2023:
Changed instances of “WooCommerce” to “Woo.”
July 12, 2023:
Added new example of information shared with site owners.
March 17, 2023:
Removed references to WPVIP.
December 30, 2022:
Updated the California rights section to apply to additional US states.
October 18, 2022
: Added wp.cloud to the list of our websites.
April 26, 2022:
Included information regarding WooPay.
November 22, 2021:
Included information for WPScan.
October 8, 2021:
Included information for WordPress.com Courses and Newspack. Updated the “Information we Collect from Other Sources” section with new examples.
January 1, 2021
: Included information for AutomateWoo and Jetpack CRM. Updated the “Controllers and Responsible Companies” section to reflect changes affecting WooCommerce users.
December 7, 2020:
Included information for MailPoet.
October 12, 2020
: Renamed WooCommerce Services to WooCommerce Shipping & Tax.
August 1, 2020
: Renamed some Payments features and updated the “Controllers and Responsible Companies” section to reflect changes affecting WooCommerce users.
February 21, 2020:
Updated for WooCommerce Payments and added a new section: “Other Information and Resources.”
December 31, 2019
: Updated for California Consumer Privacy Act and miscellaneous clarification throughout.
October 2, 2019:
A few miscellaneous changes, such as new sections about translations of this Privacy Policy and how to opt out of our internal analytics program.
May 31, 2019:
Included information for the Recurring Payments feature.
April 1, 2019:
Included information for Happy Tools.
March 13, 2019:
Added clarifications and additional details to existing sections, for example about ICANN policies and what we may store when you communicate with us.
February 1, 2019:
Included information for Longreads and additional information regarding Longreads accounts.
November 6, 2018:
Removed references to Polldaddy, which has been rebranded as Crowdsignal.
September 24, 2018:
Included information for Simplenote, Simperium, Cloudup, and Lean Domain Search.
May 25, 2018:
Added more specific information to help clarify our practices, included information for Crowdsignal and Woocommerce.com services, and added information to reflect the requirements of the EU’s General Data Protection Regulation.
January 3, 2018:
Revised and reorganized language throughout to help simplify the policy and clarify our practices.
August 22, 2017:
Added “Information We Collect from Other Sources” section.
November 2, 2016
: Added that comments submitted as missed spam are retained by Akismet to improve future performance.
February 18, 2015:
Updated Creative Commons license from 2.5 to 4.0.
September 18, 2013:
Added that blog commenter email addresses are disclosed to administrators of the blog where the comment was left.
February 1, 2011:
Clarified subpoena language and added Business Transfers paragraph.
January 3, 2011:
Added court order and subpoena clarification.
July 1, 2010:
Revised paragraph about IP addresses to explain when they are collected and that commenter IPs are visible to blog administrators.
October 29, 2009:
Added Comments paragraph to explain Akismet comment storage policy.
March 10, 2009:
Added Ads paragraph to alert users that ads from third parties may use cookies.
Sections
▼
Who We Are and What This Policy Covers
Creative Commons Sharealike License
Information We Collect
Information You Provide to Us
Information We Collect Automatically
Information We Collect from Other Sources
How and Why We Use Information
Purposes for Using Information
Legal Bases for Collecting and Using Information
Sharing Information
How We Share Information
Information Shared Publicly
How Long We Keep Information
Security
Choices
Your Rights
European General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR)
US Privacy Laws
Contacting Us About These Rights
Appeals Process for Rights Requests Denials
Controllers and Responsible Companies
How to Reach Us
Other Things You Should Know (Keep Reading!)
Transferring Information
Ads and Analytics Services Provided by Others
Third-Party Software and Services
Visitors to Our Users’ Websites
Privacy Policy Changes
Other Information and Resources
Translation
Change log
Subscribe
Subscribed
Automattic
Join 10,673 other subscribers
Sign me up
Already have a WordPress.com account?
Log in now.
Privacy
Automattic
Subscribe
Subscribed
Sign up
Log in
Copy shortlink
Report this content
View post in Reader
Manage subscriptions
Collapse this bar